Authors
Luke Buckmaster
Number of Reviews
148

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
ROUNDERS
Cast: Matt Damon, Edward Norton, Gretchen Mol, Martin Landau, John
Malkovich, John Turturro, Famke Janssen, Vernon E. Jordan Jr., Melina
Kanakaredes, Michael Rispoli
Director: John Dahl
Screenplay: David Levien & Brian Koppelman
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
When gambling isn't used to illustrate amazing streaks of luck, it is
often used in association with society's criminals and lowlifes.    Well
there are plenty of criminals and lowlifes in Rounders, a film that is
careful to keep its priorities in the right order.  Card games and risky
bets take the spotlight, but the harsh game of surviving in a world full
of crooks always seems significantly more important.  When players take
to the table in the desperate hope of winning some serious dough,
Rounders provides great entertainment.  Away from the table, however, a
compelling dramatic core is missing.
Mike McDermott (Matt Damon) learns the valuable lessons of playing
high-stake card games the hard way.  One night he plays against Russian
card shark KGB (John Malkovich, in a role that seems a little too easy
for him) and loses a cool thirty grand.  So from then on, Mike works
hard in legitimate jobs, swearing that he will never return to the
gambling table again.  But when his loser best friend Worm (Edward
Norton) is released from jail, Mike is dragged into the game once again
in order to help Worm repay his debts.
One refreshing aspect of Rounders is that it treats its subject matter
with respect.  Not endorsing gambling yet not discouraging it either,
the film chronicles a realistic (though somewhat sensational) account of
two men's triumphs and misfortunes.  It not only examines gambling as a
hobby and a sport, but as a way of life - as a source for putting bread
on the table.  John Turturro is given the difficult task of portraying
the only sensible gambler, a man who "grinds" the game by playing smart
and playing safe.  Turturro has a knack for taking simple characters and
giving them complexity (Exhibit A, Barton Fink, Exhibit B, Quiz Show),
and serves as an integral (although small) part in Rounders.  As Mike
and Worm welcome the chaos that eventually engulfs them, Turturro's
character stands strong and tall, silently knowing that although he has
taken a smaller spotlight, he has outplayed both of them.
Matt Damon is solid in the lead role but is overshadowed by some
terrific performances from the supporting cast.  Norton plays Worm with
sleaziness and extravagance, but also brings an eerie sense of
repression and sadness.  Malkovich and Turturro are excellent, and
Gretchen Mole (playing Mike's girlfriend Jo) is also fine, although
debut scriptwriters David Levien and Brian Koppelman have written her
part predictably and blandly.
Director John Dahl has an obvious fascination with professional
gambling.  On numerous occasions Rounders feels like a fun documentary
on the sport, with human diversions along the way. It is then
disappointing that Dahl rarely gives his gambling scenes more than just
visual interest.  As Matt Damon says during the film, the game is not
about playing the cards, its about playing the people. Dahl shoots card
scenes much better than he examines characters.
The success of the drama between Mike and Worm is off and on, whilst
Mike's relationship with Jo is purely a tool to get a female actor into
the picture.   The writing and direction of Rounders is impressive, but
the sports side of the picture is so much better than its dramatic side
that the film becomes unbalanced in the quality of its scenes.  Whilst
Rounders occasionally touches on themes with meaning and relevance, this
is ultimately just a good and enjoyable sports film.  Had it focused a
little more on the players, it may have been great one.


Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
The advertising line on Spice Worlds poster reads: They cant
just sing. Which is news to me  because I never knew they could
sing anyway.
Having now seen their film, my opinion has differed considerably: the
obvious talent they possess in vocals and dance (not to mention their
looks) is what has earned them a position at the top of the music
industry.  Fortunately, acting was never part of the groups forte -
until now
Before the film started I was shocked - shocked I tell you, when I
realized that I had been suckered into a devious scheme to cram as
much advertising as possible into a two hour experience.  First came
the Polaroid Spice Cam, then the Impulse Spice Deodorant, and
when the film began it didnt even stop there.
For what else is Spice World than a movie length endorsement of this
mega popular group?  The soundtrack is from the groups latest album
(of the same name), and after seeing the movie who wouldnt want to
spice up their life? However, spicing up your life means slicing
up your wallet.  Its just a good thing that Spice World is more than
worth its admission price.
The group of five consists of Emma (Baby Spice), Geri (Ginger Spice),
Melanie B (Scary Spice), Victoria (Posh Spice) and Melanie C (Sporty
Spice).  Their clichi characters come through sharp and clear, and
although they are obviously exaggerated to suit the needs of fans and
mammoth commercialism, this is all the more fun.
The film follows the pressure, tension and adventure leading up to the
Spice Girls first live concert ever.  The girls are faced with their
own set of dilemmas, including making time for their pregnant friend
(of which they are the Godmothers of) and avoiding a nasty scheme to
split them up, concocted by a lunatic newspaper owner.  But the
documentary style of this film is almost deceiving - this is by no
means a serious or even accurate account of the girls experiences.
The biggest surprise in stall for viewers is the elements of tame
slapstick humor that Spice World welcomes with open arms, and
occasionally is not unlike what we have seen in films such as Austin
Powers or even Robin Hood: Men in Tights.  But whereas those films
based their entire plot around that kind of humor, Spice World
contains it as an added bonus  so the comedy aspect of this film
wont bore or patronize the audience.  Celebrities Richard E. Grant,
Meatloaf and Roger Moore help the plot move swiftly along its
entertaining ride of comedy and music.  As for the girls themselves;
their performances are naturally not of the highest standard, but
thankfully their acting time is limited and impressive dance/music
scenes occur numerously.  There is no doubt in my mind that the Spice
Girls were perfect characters for a movie ever since the start of
their career - Spice World knows this and often parodies that idea and
the sketchy structuring of the film.
During the movie girls are able to appreciate the music and
exaggerated personalities of their idols whilst the guys will have
more than a good time, as their eyes will no doubt wander across the
screen depending on where the Spice Girls are sitting, crouching or
dancing.
Its somewhat surprising that Spice World turned out to be such a
clever contraption of comedy and song, and whilst the obvious strength
of the movie is its fabulous music scenes, everything shown is sexy,
catchy and great fun for teens of both sexes.

Title
Review for Welcome To Sarajevo (1997)
REVIEW: Welcome to Sarajevo
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Stephen Dillane, Woody Harrelson, Marisa Tomei, Emira Nusevic,
Kerry Fox, Goran Visnjic, Emily Lloyd, James Nesbitt
Director: Michael Winterbottom
Screenplay: Frank Cottrell Boyce, based on the book "Natasha's Story" by
Michael Nicholson
Australian theatrical release date: June 25
If any film has perfectly pitched exactly the right characters for both
Stephan Dillane and Woody Harrelson, Welcome to Sarajevo would be it.
Both as arrogant yet genuinely devoted reporters; Dillane sums up both
of their roles with the smug quote  "We're not here to help, we're here
to report."  Sadly, they both end up woefully incomplete performances -
Dillane's due to the film's disoriented script, Harrelson's because of
limited screen time.  Perfect in concept perhaps, but all over the place
in execution (chalk that down for a good description of the film also).
Shortly after the opening credits, we witness a group of citizens on
their way to a wedding.  Unexpectedly, one of them is shot dead by an
unseen sniper.  The press are there in no time, working from a
distance - taking photographs and pointing cameras.  Led by Michael
Henderson (Dillane), these brave reporters scour the streets of
Sarajevo, searching for stories that will not only fare well in ratings
but also bring home a powerful message that something needs to be done.
They soon discover that the western world is concerned with other
matters, illustrated when their report comes in second place to Fergie's
divorce.  And when UN troops arrive in the war-torn city, one soldier
offers little inspiration by pointing out that "Sarajevo is only the
14th most dangerous place on Earth."
Welcome to Sarajevo will no doubt find an audience of content critics
and audiences alike, who will no doubt dub the film as a powerful,
horrifically realistic documentary.  I grudgingly agree to some extent
with that statement - the film is powerful and realistic - but only as a
documentary.  When director Michael Winterbottom attempts to incorporate
an emotional core to the story - subsequently distracting us from his
Big Political Message - most of the strength he builds in the film's
opening half hour is lost.
I cannot understand why on Earth Winterbottom could let the plot decline
so severely - maybe this is due to the film's writing (based on the
novel "Natasha's Story"), but even then, Welcome to Sarajevo could have
been anyone's story and still have worked well.  The maverick American
journalist Flynn (Harrelson) would have made a great central character;
whilst cameraman Gregg (James Nesbitt) and native driver Risto (Goran
Visnjic) are at times very intriguing to watch.  This is not to say that
the main character in the film, Henderson, is not wonderfully
portrayed - he is - but his tale is not conceived enough to have a
lasting impact.
The emotional core of the story is centered on Henderson becoming
personally attached to a young orphan, and whilst this is potentially
riveting stuff, the benefits of a well-written screenplay simply are not
here. Frank Cottrell Boyce (and the novels author, Michael Nicholson)
has written a complex, beaming documentary but a crumbling, apathetic
drama.  Welcome to Sarajevo tries too hard to be a contemporary film -
Winterbottom has made sure that it has clear-cut film "necessities,"
with a definite focal story and obvious supporting roles.  Ironically, a
documentary type creation would have been much more successful for this
kind of subject matter.  There was no need for a focal story when there
were countless civilian lives to explore, and no need to define a main
role when every journalist character had a fascinating story to tell.
For a film that pitches at the right note but executes way off mark, we
can perhaps respect the fact that Welcome to Sarajevo may have been
victim to mainstream cliches had it fallen on lesser hands.  But Stephan
Dillane is just too talented for this type of work; ditto for Woody
Harrelson and Michael Winterbottom.  All may have their heart in the
right place, but Welcome to Sarajevo is a film that pitches but not
hits, thus drastically reducing the impact of it's Big Political
Message.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Good Burger (1997)
>From zero stars (bomb), to five stars (a masterpiece): One star
With every new children's film comes a regurgitated fear that lurks
inside my hate-bone.  A fear of plot failure and cornball acting.   Of
flat jokes - and even flatter dialogue.  Yes indeed, these are the
movies that squeeze every last gag from a worn out sponge - praying that
the critics will label them as "kids material" so that adults will be
blissfully ignorant of them.  In Good Burger, a Nickelodeon film, my
fears were back as I witnessed a tasteless, immature and half-fried glob
of film-fat.
If that comment sounded a little farcical, then you'll have to forgive
me - but Good Burger deserves it entirely.  You see, I work at a
McDonalds store (no joke).  I know what it's like to accidentally open a
packet of sundae mix at the wrong time and have it dripping off my body
from shoulder to toe.  I know what a burger looks like with a litre of
ketchup on top of it, because I've dropped a container of it on one.  I
know the satisfaction of giving a hungry customer the meal he was been
waiting on, just for him to say "Tell you're manager that he's fucking
useless if he can't produce a Big Mac."
But I've still been able to look back and laugh in disbelief - at those
good memories that were actually nightmares to experience at the time.
But I look back on Good Burger in exactly the same frame of mind as to
when I watching it - disgruntled, irritated. It's not that I have a deep
and profound respect for my job (you don't get much as a burger cooker
or chicken fryer), but rather that Good Burger had a potential gold mine
of gags to play with but doesn't utilize any of them.
The basic scenario of Good Burger goes something like this: the lazy,
self-seeking Dexter (Kenan Thompson) finds himself in dept of more money
than he can possibly repay after wrecking his school teachers car on the
first day of summer vacation.  After much reluctance, he vows to get a
job until the dept is paid off.  Enter "Good Burger," a no frills fast
food outlet that becomes the hippest place to be when extravagant worker
Ed (Kel Mitchell) unleashes a secret sauce to the public.  But the
store's scandalous competitor, "Monolith Burger," will stop at nothing
to get hold of the ingredients of Ed's sauce.
Dexter and Ed also find themselves in other unpredictable situations
including being trapped in an insane asylum with their 77-year-old pal
Otis (Abe Vigoda).  This in particular is a cruel and insensitive
scenario, which demonstrates the film's tendency to make fun of
everything and anyone just for the hope of drawing a laugh.
The director, Brian Robbins (who co-created the Nickelodeon show for
which the film is based, "All That"), is only partially to blame for
Good Burger's lack of raillery and effective composition.  In the end,
it boils down to the team of writers responsible for All That - they
have not succeeded to sufficiently convert the television show to the
big screen.  Whilst it may be appropriate to occasionally show a
"Nickelodeon sketch comedy" style gag, too many becomes plain annoying -
and if they aren't very good from the start - well, the fats in the
fryer.  If I want to watch an hour and a half of Nickelodeon, I'll
arrange to get cable TV - but if I'm going to the cinema, I need
something better.  I need something that will hold my attention -
something that is worthy of being on the silver screen in the first
place.
I have no doubt that even my McDonalds manager, Steve, would be able to
shed more light on this greasy, pointless film.
To give you some sort of idea of how bad Good Burger's gags come; I'll
leave you with a scene involving Ed and an evil Monolith Burger
employee:
Monolith Burger Guy: You better watch your butt!
Ed: [Tries for 5 minutes, spinning round and round in circles] I give
up. There is no way a guy can watch his own butt.

"How ironic - my crusade against television has come to an end so
formulaic it could have spewed from the power book of the laziest
Hollywood hack."  --Sideshow Bob
Subscribe to my movie reviews mailing list!  Simply reply to this email
with the subject as "Subscribe:newsletter"

Title
Review for Anaconda (1997)
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
For the Hollywood industry, a giant snake really isn't that big a deal.
We've already been treated to rampaging dinosaurs, vicious lions, hungry
sharks and even human devouring aliens - so a snake, or "anaconda",
doesn't seem that appealing amongst the crowd of successful thriller
vehicles.  But people love to be scared; the fear industry is profitable
as movie goers constantly flock to the cinema in the hope of being
scared witless.
Anaconda does in many ways complete all that it sets out to do; it has
an eerie and sinister approach and has the same sort of tension, and
corniness, that Jaws and many others have been infamous for.  However
this alone is not even close to adequate for the dismal plot to got
unnoticed, leaving a lot to be desired even in this type of film.
The Anaconda heroes and villains are all together trapped inside a
Jaws-like boat, which leaves no room for decent character development,
or more to point, it shows none.  The entire film is not protective of
its main characters nearly as much as it should be - many die but nobody
really cares because we all came to see the snakes anyway, which are
quite obviously the stars of the movie.
Aside from all of this, I must admit that I did enjoy watching most of
Anaconda.  Amongst all the disappointing acting and horrific animation
of the water bound beasts, this film is surprisingly appealing due to
the sheer innocence and almost kiddish style in which it's portrayed.
Anaconda follows in the footsteps of just about every scary film
created, bringing the true essence of fear and suspense to the silver
screen the traditional and effective way.  I guess the only difference
is after walking away from Jaws you feared the water and creatures
within it, but after seeing Anaconda I sneered at the thought of a 3
metre computer-generate piece of fluff ever existing.  But that just
makes it all the more fun.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Anastasia (1997)
Featuring the voices of: Meg Ryan, John Cusack, Kelsey Grammer, Angela
Lansbury, Christopher Lloyd, Hank Azaria, Bernadette Peters, Kirsten
Dunst
Directors: Don Bluth, Gary Goldman
Screenplay: Susan Gauthier & Bruce Graham, Bob Tzudiker & Noni White
Australian theatrical release date: June 25, 1998
Due to what we have been witness to in the past, it's hard to label any
animated movie as anything except a "family film." Such is the story
with Anastasia - which has a mature, adult-like plot but some weaker
moments for the kids which in the end distracts the viewer from the
power of the film. It's almost as if an animated film must have people
walking away smiling, ready to buy new Happy Meal toys.  But, even when
observing it in an adult frame of mind, it's still damn good as a
distraction from ordinary, less stimulating films.  It also serves as a
reminder than animated features can indeed have a good amount of
substance, and can genuinely stir your emotions.
In its most shallow moments, Anastasia is just a simple tale told well.
In 1916, the Romanov family are celebrating their 300th anniversary as
the ruling dynasty in Russia.  The evil, party-crashing Rasputin (who
sold his soul to the Devil) puts a curse on the Romanov's, and goes on a
killing spree across the nation, slaughtering all members of the family
except two.  Anastasia (Meg Ryan) and her grandmother the Dowager
Empress  (Angela Landsbury) manage to escape the evil hands of Rasputin,
but are separated along the way.
Flash forward ten years and Anastasia is 18 years old, with only
glimpses of her tragic past.  The Empress, now residing in Paris, is
offering ten thousand dollars to anyone that can deliver her
granddaughter to her.  Anastasia joins con men Dmitri (John Cusak) and
Vlad (Kelsey Grammer) on their trip to Paris.  Meanwhile in the
underworld, Rasputin learns that she is still alive, and hatches various
plots to murder her.
The inevitable romance between Anastasia and Dmitri is the vehicle for
many of the film's gags; but is also its emotional core.  The
relationship between these two characters is truly enticing, and a lot
more interesting and mature than many of the recent animated romances.
Perhaps this is why Anastasia can effectively appeal to adults - it
works as a drama as much as it does a comedy.  It's a film that you can
imagine in a non-animated form, unlike Disney classics like Aladdin, The
Lion King and Beauty and the Beast.  Whilst many have dubbed Anastasia
as simply an attempt for a different company to cash in on animated
successes, directors Don Bluth and Gary Goldman have been careful not to
mimic Disney films.  Much to their credit, it looks, feels and sounds
genuinely original, bar the occasional exception.
Most of Anastasia's duration is filled with healthy, skillful moments,
but like most animated films it does have its flaws.  Strangely, most of
the scenes involving Rasputin fail to impress or innovate - making the
viewer wish that he had never been included in the first place.
Rasputin could have been a wonderfully complex, religious character but
instead appears cliché and predictable; appearing every so often just so
the heroes of the story could have someone to fight against.
If previous animated features have taught us anything, it's that there
has to be a bad guy, a hero and a final confrontation.  In fact, the
only film of this type that I can think of that was not afraid to show
complex scenes and characters was The Hunchback of Notre Damn, which I
still regard as the best exhibit of film animation ever.
But in all fairness, Anastasia shouldn't be compared to all the other
cartoon classics because, as I mentioned before, it does stand out as an
original piece of work.  And more than that - it's a beautiful,
unexpectedly touching experience that will make you wonder how on Earth
an animated film can be so moving.
If only Bluth and Goldman could have dared to forget the "family film"
tradition and make a genuinely adult, mature film - perhaps then we
would have a clear-cut masterpiece.
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Cast: David Duchovny, Gillian Anderson, Martin Landau, Blythe Danner,
William B. Davis, Armin Mueller-Stahl, John Neville, Terry O'Quinn
Director: Rob Bowman
Producers: Chris Carter, Daniel Sackheim
Screenplay: Chris Carter
Cinematography: Ward Russell
Australian release date: July 23, 1998
As a devoted X-Files viewer, I am (like millions of others) familiar
with the adventures of FBI special agents Fox Mulder and Dana Scully,
government conspirators "The Cigarette Smoking Man" and "The Well
Manicured Man," plus a host of other arcane characters.  But the
question everybody is asking is what separates the film from the
television episodes?  The answer, not surprisingly, is that our two
favorite agents delve further than ever before into a worldwide
conspiracy, discovering that a global Armageddon may not be far away.
In terms of budget, special effects and novelty, the movie is certainly
far bigger than any episode aired on television.  But strangely, it
feels just a little too big - the full-scale plot, the menacing alien
monsters and a semi-ridiculous climax all contribute to make this appear
as simply a pumped up and over-bloated version of the TV show.  But,
like always, creator Chris Carter has taken some bold risks and, also
like always, he manages to pull it off with the precision of a skilled
writer and the subtlety of a bull in a China chop.  After all, what
would the X-Files be without its pumped up and over-bloated themes?
Capping off where the series left finds Mulder and Scully with no
They investigate a terrorist bomb threat in Washington, but only after a
building is blown to smithereens do they begin to realize that
everything is not as simple as it seems.  It appears as if two firemen
and a young boy were intentionally killed in the blast, to cover up a
deadly alien virus that has the potential to wipe the human race out of
existence.  Thus a new conspiracy is discovered, in which we find that
The Cigarette Smoking Man (William B. Davis), The Well-Manicured Man
(John Neville) and a mysterious abettor (Armin Mueller-Stahl, whom you
may remember from Shine) are cleverly orchestrating.  Oh yeah, and The
Truth is Out There.
I guess it goes without saying that watching The X-Files on the big
screen is a dream come true for many devoted followers.  But, it isn't
just a flick made for fans - although the movie thankfully doesn't
re-introduce the characters, anyone who hasn't seen an episode on TV can
easily get the gist of what's been going on for the last few years.
However, the more dedicated fan will probably be disappointed by the
absence of some characters (in particular, the elusive Agent Alex
Krycek), and, most of all, the lack of the show's "leave it to your own
imagination" approach.
Rob Bowman (who has directed multiple episodes of the show, plus
episodes from others series' including Star Trek: Next Generation and
Macgyver) has taken the directors helm and guides the film smartly, if
not instinctively.  He follows the screenplay (written by Chris Carter
and a couple of others) with a dark, twisted grace, much to the help of
cinematographer Ward Russel (Lawnmower Man II, The Last Boy Scout) who
supplies some all-too-real looking visuals.  Along with Mike Oldfield
and Mark Snow's eerie editing to the already eerie title music, The
senses.
For a movie that isn't bolder, better or smarter than many of its
previous episodes on TV (especially the cliff hanger season finale),
it's a wonder it still works.  Perhaps it is because the sexual tension
between Mulder and Scully has stood the test of time, and the full truth
is still not found, even when it is closest to them.  Should there will
be another X-Files movie in the future (and I very much hope there will
be), I would prefer to see Chris Carter direct it.  Maybe then we would
not only have another very good film, but perhaps he could also make
something that tops anything we've seen before - making sure that the
show's pumped up and over-bloated themes are dealt with in exactly the
right hands.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
REVIEW:  My Best Friends Wedding
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Julia Roberts, Dermot Mulroney, Cameron Diaz, Rupert Everett,
Philip Bosco, M. Emmet Walsh, Carrie Preston, Rachel Griffiths
Director: P.J. Hogan
Producers: Ronald Bass and Jerry Zucker
Screenplay: Ronald Bass
Cinematography: Laszlo Kovacs
Music: James Newton Howard
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 4
stars
Weddings, one of the most treasured events in human life, have proven to
be immensely popular on the silver screen.  Just look at the record of
unbridled (get it, un-bridled) successes throughout the last decade -
Father of the Bride I and II, Muriels Wedding, Four Weddings and a
Funeral, the list goes on
However, My Best Friends Wedding skillfully departs the tedious track
record of two people falling in love and getting married in love-a-dove
feel good films.  Instead the movie takes an entirely different angle of
holy matrimony, show casing not only two peoples love for each other but
also for another who regrets having lost her one true love.
It's a story of jealousy.  The charming and charismatic Julianne (Julia
Roberts) is a restaurant critic with a short attention span for most
things in life - whether that is lovers, food or friendship.
Determined, wearisome and courageous, she is the modern working class
woman with an attitude.
Not long into the film we are exposed to Julianne's almost selfish but
adorable character, and in no time she finds herself caught in an
intriguing situation of mixed emotions and life long secrets.  It seems
that Michael, her best friend since early high school years, has just
decided to get married.  Julianne is not in any way pleased for him, as
she suddenly realizes that she has loved the man for 20 years - and has
"four days to break up a wedding and win her man.".  But the cocky
Julianne has some lessons to learn.
Michael's fiancé Kimmy Wallace (Cameron Diaz) is quickly realized by
Julianne as being "irritatingly perfect", and with good cause - she's
beautiful, polite, understanding and entirely lovable.  And to further
Julianne's problems, Kimmy asks her to be the bride's maid minutes after
meeting her.  Whilst this may be nice and rosy, Julianne still has a
mission to achieve - and she's not about to give up.
Until this point (as you may have noticed), the film doesn't take itself
too seriously, but the best jokes are still to be seen as the plot takes
its most interesting turn upon the arrival of Julianne's gay friend
George (played by the appealing Rupert Everett).  Advising her in
moments of need, George confronts Julianne with the most important
question yet: "Do you really love him, or is this just about winning?"
The scenes to follow are lovely, clever slabs of comedy and romance
including a sing-a-long restaurant scene bound to put anyone in
stitches.
When watching this film, I couldn't help but keep my eyes glued to the
screen in the hope for more quality gags; something that it does with
class and poignancy.  But before too long, a familiar critical factor
put my mind into fearful overdrive.  This was, of course, the
all-important ending.  After all, the entire movie was of such a high
standard that a disappointing ending would have been disastrous to the
film; and Australian director P.J Hogan (Muriels Wedding) was faced with
a do or die situation.  Fortunately, he was able to conquer up a
skillful and very beneficial (and very unexpected) ending, without a
bias towards the film's protagonist.
If most Hollywood pictures turned out as rock solid and well rounded off
as this one, us critics wouldn't have nearly as much to say, and if we
would the chances are it would be something pleasing.  For Jerry Maguire
fans, you'll love this film, and for those put off by the feminine
sounding title rest assured - there's definitely something special in
the air.
Witty, charming and funny, My Best Friends Wedding is a definite winner.
However, one over riding question still remains: do I have the
confidence to recommend this film to my friends and family through
sickness and health, till death do us part?  I do.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Red Corner (1997)
I was recently told that in China their had been strong protests against the
release of Red Corner  and this is apparently because of the way it shows the
injustice of many Chinese laws.  But if you ask me, the real truth of the matter
is that the Chinese Critics Association were determined not to punish the
population into viewing Richard Gere running across rooftops in search for a
fellow American.  Or more the point, anyone that allows him to bask in his own
less-than-subtle presence.
This is not an insult to Gere, as I consider him to be a rather talented actor 
but more the choice of character and responsibility of his role.
If a film is solely about one person, the main actor must give a faultless
performance in order for it to really work.  Although Geres performance is in
no way poorly acted, it is far from perfect  and I look forward to seeing him
star with other talented actors that can reduce the need for him to carry a film
by himself.  This is where he truly belongs, and if you are reluctant to believe
me than look no further that Primal Fear (with the sensational Edward Norton),
The Jackal (with Bruce Willis) and Pretty Woman (with the delightful Julia
Roberts).
In Red Corner Gere plays classy lawyer Jack Moore, who is guilty of the same
personality traits as his character Martin Vail in Primal Fear  bold and up
front, who thinks he is three steps ahead of everybody else but is actually two
steps behind.  It is with invulnerability of both mental and physical kind that
the character of Moore is portrayed, which left me barracking for the Chinese to
haul his sorry ass into jail.
It doesnt take long from the films beginning for Jack Moores charm to work on
a pretty Chinese lady, and in no time they are in bed together in a hotel room 
drunk and cheerful.  Yet instead of a hangover, poor Jack finds himself covered
in blood and the Chinese chick dead on a couch.  He is arrested and hauled into
a Chinese prison.  His cell, food and rights  all terrible.
Now trapped in a foreign land without adequate aid from the American embassy,
lawyer Shen Yuelin (Bai Ling) defends his case by initially pleading guilty to
the charge of murder.  Jack and Shen argue about their countries different laws;
Shen stating that they will shoot you in the back and charge the cost of the
bullet to your family.
As the plot thickens, scenes get progressively more ridiculous  ranging from
Richard Gere running over rooftops in search of the US embassy to a Scooby Doo
ending where the least expected but-you-knew-along criminal is discovered.
Red Corner is one of those films where you sneer, laugh or vomit youre way
through all of its minutes.  What should have been a politically taunt thriller
is little more than a pointless expedition to see how stressed out Richard Gere
can act.
This is not to say that the film does not have its moments  there are some
tense court room scenes that are shrewdly created  telling the tale of foreign
injustice and government corruption.   But what they amount to spoils the effect
of having them in the first place  perhaps this is why Red Corner is so
frustrating to watch.
If you look at the films overall concept fairly broadly, the basic idea is quite
tangible.  It is upon the films execution where the diminutive plot twists and
developments fail to impress or innovate - the evidence that goes missing, the
high powered officials shielding the truth and intolerable love angles have all
been done so many times before.
If that wasnt bad enough, Red Corners dialogue is purely laughable on many
occasions.  Shen Yuelin attempts to gain sympathy by reciting renaissance of a
destitute relationship with her deceased father, whilst Jack Moore is eager to
talk about Chinese musical instruments when he could have been working on a plan
to free himself.
Taking itself far too seriously, Red Corner is not half the film it intends to
be.  Although it would have benefited from the help of a more valuable
supporting cast, the films main fault is in the bizarre (and often out of
place) way of unfolding a story which isnt that meritorious anyway.
Whilst Richard Gere still proves that has what it takes to be known as a decent
actor, I would think twice before going to see him attempt to manage such a
serious yet hollow drama again.  Martin Vailwhere are you?


Title
Review for Night at the Roxbury, A (1998)
A NIGHT AT THE ROXBURY
Cast: Will Ferrell, Chris Kattan, Dan Hedaya, Molly Shannon, Richard
Grieco, Loni Anderson, Elisa Donovan, Gigi Rice, Meredith Scott Lynn,
Chazz Palminteri
Director: John Fortenberry
Screenplay: Steve Koren and Will Ferrell & Chris Kattan
Australian theatrical release: May 13, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
1 and a half stars
If you fart-ass around all your life, it seems, you will be led to
greater things.  At least, that's what happens in A Night at the
Roxbury, a comedy of errors that was a big one to begin with.  There was
barely enough material here to maintain a five minute skit, let alone a
ninety minute feature that bumbles, stumbles and fumbles through its
running time. If you're akin to this type of silly, silly humor, the
film might be goofy enough to warrant a sitting - but otherwise, I'd
advise everybody to stay well clear of this tiresome piece of humdrum
filmmaking.  In defense of the film, I can honestly say that I did enjoy
it, before the ridiculously unintelligent characters became irritating,
and before the script became boring and problematic.  Trouble is, that
happened about fifteen minutes in.
The Butabi brothers - Steve (Will Ferrel) and Doug (Chris Kattan) - are
the coolest disco regulars around.  At least, they think they are.
Steve and Doug spend most of their nights waiting outside of nightclubs,
fantasizing that one day they might run their own club.  One night they
are particularly frustrated for not being allowed inside the prestigious
'The Roxbury,' - the number one spot in Los Angeles - and it becomes
their ultimate mission to get inside the building and party-hardy.
After a lucky mishap, Steve and Doug find themselves dancing in the
bright lights of The Roxbury, with two women (Elisa Donovan and Gigi
Rice) who mistake them for high rollers.  The story plods along, and
Steve gets caught in a marriage he doesn't really want to commit to, and
Doug becomes even greater a social outcast.
The acting by Saturday Night Live regulars Will Ferrel and Chris Kattan
is predictably awful; the only time they appeal is amongst the bright
and blurring lights of discos.  Granted, there is not much they could
have done with their irritatingly simplistic dialogue.  Most prominent
in the film's many flaws is its script, which succeeds in creating two
daft characters who appear as foreigners even in their own environments.
What it doesn't do is make their wacky adventures very interesting.
Unlike the colorful escapist film Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas, the
world in A Night at the Roxbury doesn't offer Steve and Doug enough
obstacles to encounter.   That makes the film's jokes rely almost
entirely on dialogue, which is rarely funny.  To give you an example of
the type of humor A Night at Roxbury generates, I'll close with a short
conversation between the two main characters:
Doug: You can take our car, and you can take our keys, but you cannot
take away our dreams!
Steve: Yeah, because we're sleeping when we have them!


Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
Cast: Antonio Banderas, Anthony Hopkins, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Stuart
Wilson, Matt Letscher
Director: Martin Campbell
Screenplay: John Eskow and Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
There are old films, and then there are films that capture the spirit of
decades ago perfectly.  The Mask of Zorro is one of these; it is
spellbinding and old fashioned, containing every element of a
traditional superhero film.  It is how these elements are balanced by
director Martin Campbell that makes Zorro a non-stop feast for the
senses, and the clever handling of its script makes it one of the
unexpected highlights of 1998.
Colombia Tri-Star delayed the release of Zorro for well over a year,
allegedly due to the success of Titanic.  I don't see why, since this
film is better than blockbusters Godzilla and Armageddon put together,
and I haven't been this mesmerized by a purebred action flick since John
Woo's Face/Off in 1997.  Much of the credit goes to Martin Campbell, who
made 1995's Goldeneye - one of the best James Bond films ever.  Campbell
refrains from using crafty camera angles and excessive special effects;
instead he focuses on genuine, exciting action.  The result is breath
taking.  Zorro's many sword fights are captured incredibly on screen,
with clashes and clangs bringing hoots and thrills from the audience.
Anothony Hopkins plays Don Diego de la Vega, an elderly Zorro, who is a
masked hero that fights for the people of Mexico.  After a plight to
save innocent peasants,
Don Diego's archenemy Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson) captures and
imprisons him, and forcefully adopts his daughter Elena (Catherine Zeta
Jones) and raises her as his own. Two decades later Mexico has still not
forgotten the legend of Zorro, but when Don Diego escapes from jail, he
realizes he is far too old to continue the never-ending fight for
independence and justice.  Enter Alejandro Murieta (Antonio Banderas), a
bandit who suffers from the death of his brother at the hands of Captain
Harrison Love (Matt Letscher).  Don Diego transforms Murieta into the
new Zorro, and teaches him that the best way to avenge his brother's
death is to live to celebrate it.
Campbell balances the spectacular action with drama and comedy, and the
mixture is always entertaining.  Whilst Murieta learns how to sword
fight, he also learns how to be a gentlemen, and that revenge can often
lead to good things.  In one of the film's touching moments, the primary
meaning behind wearing a black mask is revealed, and Murieta learns that
not only does the mask hide his identity, it also hides his hatred.
Few actors can maintain a respectable presence while working with
Anthony Hopkins, one of the true masters of American cinema.  He gives
power, presence and experience to his roles and is a lifeboat for many
movies.  Hopkins saved Amistad from being a total disaster, and is still
remembered for his difficult (and Oscar winning) part in Silence of the
Lambs.  However as the young Zorro, Antonio Banderas almost steals the
show, with a sparkling and exciting performance that is almost always on
cue (though sometimes he seems all too aware of his heroic guise).  The
beautiful Catherine Zeta-Jones is charming in her first film role, and
the sexual chemistry between her and Banderas is successfully steamy.
The key to how very gratifying The Mask of Zorro is lies in Campbell's
mixture and pace of plot elements.  With a running time of 137 minutes,
he paces the story slowly and allows setting and character to be
developed at a comfortable speed.  How he achieved that without making
one boring moment is quite amazing, but Zorro has more immediate
benefits than just a pleasing atmosphere.  This celebrated tale is told
with pizzazz and artistry, and never pretends to be anything more than
it is - an old fashioned tale of love, hatred, devotion and revenge.
The Mask of Zorro has all the spectacle of an epic, and all the heart of
a classic tale that will never be outdated.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Urban Legend (1998)
This is a multi-part message in MIME format.
URBAN LEGEND
(Columbia Tristar)
Cast: Jared Leto, Alicia Witt, Rebecca Gayheart, Michael Rosenbaum, Loretta
Devine, Joshua Jackson, Tara Reid, John Neville, Robert Englund, Danielle
Harris, Natasha Gregson Wagner
Director: Jamie Blanks
Screenplay: Silvio Horta
Australian theatrical release: January 28, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
Melbourne born newcomer Jamie Blanks delights in telling spooky modern
fables; the kind which are told by children in tree houses on Halloween.
These are urban legends, stories that evoke fear from people because a
friend of a friend of someone you know has experienced one.  There's a
killer in your back seat, or a maniacal driver chasing you down a deserted
road - whatever the story may be, Blanks has a visual illustration.  Urban
Legend milks that gimmick for all it's worth, which is the best and worst
reason to see this film.  Those interested in this ever so slight twist of
the standard shock-horror formula should by all means take a look, but
ultimately, this is yet another horror film that misses its mark
considerably.
The way Jamie Blanks directs is interesting in comparison to someone like
Wes Craven.  Craven has been around long enough to know exactly what works
and what doesn't, and although many of his pieces are far from perfect, they
provide calculated shrieks and squeals.  Blanks doesn't have that same
knowledge, so the most he can do is give it a gutsy effort.  Consequently,
some moments of Urban Legend are dumb and boring, whilst others are exciting
and strangely compelling.  Like its final few scenes, which are remarkably
more satisfying than the endings of both Scream and Scream 2.  But this is
escaping the fact that Urban Legend fails to complete even the most basic
requirements for a scary movie: it just isn't scary.
At New England's Pendleton College, somebody is bringing urban legends to
life.  As students begin die off, the assertive Natalie (Alicia Witt)
attempts to make sense of the frightening scenario.  Helping her is Paul
(Jared Leto), a selfish and conniving journalist for the school paper.
Natalie's best friend Brenda (Rebecca Gayheart) is dis-interested; she is
more concerned in flirting with Paul.  Natalie and Paul primarily suspect
their American folklore teacher Professor Wexler (Robert Englund), but there
are lots of other suspects - Natalie's sex crazed room mate, the eerie
school janitor, a Pam Grier look a like security guard, a dim-witted
practical joker, and many more.
Blanks keeps us guessing who-done-it is by creatively cheating - the same
jacket that the killer wears appears in almost everybody's wardrobe.  On one
occasion he uses an entire scene to bluff the audience, and on others he
uses the shock-horror formula which Scream 2 did so well (music builds up,
then a character bumps into somebody else who is - much to our
disappointment - not trying to kill him/her).  It works to reasonable
success, although the line up of suspects are an uninteresting bunch and for
that matter, so are all the characters.  The identity of the killer should
have evoked a fun guess-then-guess-again game with the audience, but after
not long I just wanted to get the revealing process over with.
Alicia Witt's performance is a change in character for most horror heroines.
She offers something that Neve Campell and Jenniffer Love Hewitt haven't:
Witt seems to have a reasonable idea of what's going on.  Though appearing
as moderately aggressive, Witt doesn't have the sexual flamboyancy and zest
that is an assumed trait of these type of roles.  Portraying intelligence is
not enough; she lacks excitement. Rebecca Gayheart gives flamboyancy and
confidence to her part, but she suits a more eccentric thriller like Scream
(although she did have a small part in Scream 2 as an annoyingly cheerful
student). Veteran John Neville - famous for his role as "The Well-Manicured
Man" in The X Files movie and television series - can be seen in a small and
unrewarding part as the Dean.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any inquiries or
feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
To model a human's DNA would be the ultimate of playing God - and director 
Andrew Nicol pretends its all ahead of us "in the not too distant future."  But 
in the cold world of Gattaca, a society that creates a race of "super" people, 
the word "perfection" has been taken one step too far.  
Any person who enters the world from a "faith birth" (without use of DNA 
structuring) becomes known as an "In Valid", an outcast who often will end up 
with the lowest possible occupation and living conditions.  As the movie so 
bluntly states, it's technically not discrimination - but who would hire an In 
Valid over a person structured to perfection?  This is one of the many themes 
that is raised in the most engrossing Science Fiction film this year, that not 
only presents us with raw creativity and imagination but also intelligence and 
emotion on equal terms.
The film follows the narrative life of Vincent Freeman (Ethan Hawke), a child 
born the old fashioned way; with values and morals that would be respected in 
the 90's but scorned at in the society of Gattaca. At the time of his birth 
Vincent's life expectancy was estimated at a lousy 30 years; so after 
discovering this and realizing that he would have to live the life of a third 
rate citizen, his parents agree for genetics to decide the fate of his future 
brother Hugo.  Once Hugo is "born", Vincent begins to realize just weak he is, 
and despite his never ending determination to function successfully in society 
he is continuously outclassed and outmatched by people who proclaim that there 
is no way to defy genetics.  Luckily for Vincent, there is no gene for the 
human spirit.
As Vincent grows up, and his desire for social acceptance is spurred on by his 
dream to be an astronaut, he realizes that the only way to hide his identity is 
to borrow someone else's.  Enter Jeromre, a very contrasting character to 
Vincent, who was structured as an extraordinarily high-class citizen - perfect 
in every way.  But, after a failed suicide attempt, Jerome is left a paraplegic 
and is now useless in Gattaca's unforgiving society.  Deciding to cash in on 
his injury, Jerome forfeits his identity to Vincent for a large paycheck that 
will ensure a comfortable life for him. 
Of course with every person there is unique DNA and blood types, so Vincent 
quickly learns to follow a set of important activities to ensure that his 
identity remains a secret.  Brushing as much hair as possible off his body, 
using Jerome's blood and vicariously cleaning everything around him soon become 
necessary for survival and placement amongst the society which surrounds him.
Vincent soon becomes attracted to fellow worker Sally Ed (Uma Thurman), a 
beautiful young women with a terminal heart disease. A lively romantic subplot 
emerges between these two characters, and as Vincent becomes more and more 
desperate to conceal his identity their relationship will almost certainly end 
in disaster.
But Gattaca has much more in stall for viewers than just a Sci Fi drama with a 
romantic flavor - twists and developments in its story provide constant 
entertainment of a fulfilling and rewarding kind.
The claustrophobic and all too modern sets of Gattaca give an eerie 
representation of Niccol's futuristic world, perhaps making you feel that this 
sort of place may be around the corner - but it's impossible - impossible tell 
you, for anything like Gattaca to ever exist.  The very thought of DNA 
structuring society is laughable, however the illustrious mind of Niccol surely 
has created something truly special in a genre which surely produces more 
mindless duds then masterpieces.  So Gattaca's basic idea may appear to be a 
little silly - who cares?  It is not so much a film's plot that makes it great; 
rather the way it is executed, and although this film doesn't score many 
brownie points in believability it more than makes it up with maturity and 
style.
Many may argue that this "believability" factor is it's ultimate downfall, but 
anyone who does not have the imagination to fill in the blanks should steer 
clear of Gattaca all together.
For example in Steven Spielberg's Jurassic Park, we almost believed that 
rampaging dinosaurs could exist - simply because the exact theory behind it was 
presented from the start and shown in a society we can recognize and relate 
with.  But Gattaca quite obviously steers clear from all the hows and whys, and 
presents us not with theories, beliefs and assumptions, but with cold hard 
imagination and a touch of wonder.
The all-important question - is this necessarily bad?  For the scientific 
minded perhaps yes - but those who value physiological effects more than absent 
minded mathematics will appreciate Gattaca's character's on going relationships 
and the way they react in a society obsessed with perfection.
When creating a film, it is one thing to hand out emotion on a platter (ala 
Jerry Maguire, where the movie's surroundings allow for a loving relationship 
between certain characters), but where the basic setting is a cold and 
unforgiving society it is entirely different.  It truly takes skill to produce 
characters that people care about, situations which people think about and 
issues that people can relate with when apparent boundaries are set. Andrew 
Nicol does this beautifully, and not for one minute does the science side of 
things replace Gattaca's superb story and its brilliance in fabulously crafted 
scenes.
As an avid fan of numerous reviewers, it has been bluntly obvious to me that 
many different opinions have been expressed about this film - a film that does 
something different, strays off the track of clichi characters and events and 
presents us with something truly brilliant indeed.  If you are able to open 
your mind and absorb only a fraction of what Gattaca has to offer, a very 
memorial experience is to be had.  Its still early days but I have no doubt in 
proclaiming Gattaca as one of the best films of 1997.
Daring to be different, Gattaca stands strong as a modern masterpiece.


Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
REVIEW:  Scream 2 (1997 - USA, 1998 - Australia)
As the horror movie expert Randy (Jamie Kennedy) states: There are certain
rules one must abide by in order to create a successful sequel.  Scream 2; just
like its predecessor, structures itself as a parody to all those predictable
horror films that have filtered through Hollywood for decades.  But as the wise
Randy also remarks  No sequels are good as the first.
Set two years after the original killings in Scream, Sidney (Neve Campbell) and
Randy are now in university and have put the tormenting memories of their past
behind them.  TV Reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) has written a book based
around the killings two years ago, and its just recently been made into a
popular film named Stab.
Just as we witnessed Drew Barrymore killed off in the opening scenes of Scream,
another celebrity (if you can call Jada Pinkett one) is iced early on in the
sequel whilst attending Stab.  So begins a spree of copycat killings on campus.
Goofy small town cop Dewey (David Arquette) also returns, and along with Gale
and Randy attempts to figure out who the killer is.  One particularly engaging
conversation with himself and Randy occurs, where the rules of sequels are
observed.
Number one, the body count is always bigger.  Number two, the death scenes are
always much more elaborate.  Number three, never ever, under any circumstances
assume that the killer is dead.  Although the more attentive viewer of Scream
would have noticed that some of the rules were obviously broken, this is not
the case for Scream 2, as everything mentioned is carried out to the fullest
degree.
The nine killings in Scream compared to fourteen in the sequel speaks for
itself, but statistics are unfortunately limited to what happens rather than how
it happens.  Scream 2 is considerably less scarier than the first, and although
director Wes Craven (infamous for the Nightmare on Elm Street series and Scream)
follows the same shock-commotion formula, much of the seductiveness and charm
that its predecessor has seems to have been lost.  That is, as much charm as a
gruesome horror film can have.
If youre put off by the promise of good looking teens acting irrationally and
predictably, rest assured  the characters slip up but the film rarely does.
The only major stab-in-the-foot that Scream 2 gives itself is the huge amount of
gore yet marginally small amount of fear that is bestowed to the audience.
Also, as many horror films tend to do, Scream 2 kills off its most interesting
character long before credits fill the screen.  As to whom this character is I
will leave you guessing  but allow me also add that he gave both films a sense
of structuring and originality  so it would be incredibly hard to make a
successful third installment (which is currently in consideration) without him.
Although not as thrilling or classy as the original, Scream 2s Scooby Doo
who-done-it style proves to be a cut above the rest, and Wes Craven has once
again given a much-needed refreshment to the horror genre of which he has
successfully mastered.


Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
To model a human's DNA would be the ultimate of playing God - and director 
Andrew Nicol pretends its all ahead of us "in the not too distant future."  But 
in the cold world of Gattaca, a society that creates a race of "super" people, 
the word "perfection" has been taken one step too far.  
Any person who enters the world from a "faith birth" (without use of DNA 
structuring) becomes known as an "In Valid", an outcast who often will end up 
with the lowest possible occupation and living conditions.  As the movie so 
bluntly states, it's technically not discrimination - but who would hire an In 
Valid over a person structured to perfection?  This is one of the many themes 
that is raised in the most engrossing Science Fiction film this year, that not 
only presents us with raw creativity and imagination but also intelligence and 
emotion on equal terms.
The film follows the narrative life of Vincent Freeman (Ethan Hawke), a child 
born the old fashioned way; with values and morals that would be respected in 
the 90's but scorned at in the society of Gattaca. At the time of his birth 
Vincent's life expectancy was estimated at a lousy 30 years; so after 
discovering this and realizing that he would have to live the life of a third 
rate citizen, his parents agree for genetics to decide the fate of his future 
brother Hugo.  Once Hugo is "born", Vincent begins to realize just weak he is, 
and despite his never ending determination to function successfully in society 
he is continuously outclassed and outmatched by people who proclaim that there 
is no way to defy genetics.  Luckily for Vincent, there is no gene for the 
human spirit.
As Vincent grows up, and his desire for social acceptance is spurred on by his 
dream to be an astronaut, he realizes that the only way to hide his identity is 
to borrow someone else's.  Enter Jeromre, a very contrasting character to 
Vincent, who was structured as an extraordinarily high-class citizen - perfect 
in every way.  But, after a failed suicide attempt, Jerome is left a paraplegic 
and is now useless in Gattaca's unforgiving society.  Deciding to cash in on 
his injury, Jerome forfeits his identity to Vincent for a large paycheck that 
will ensure a comfortable life for him. 
Of course with every person there is unique DNA and blood types, so Vincent 
quickly learns to follow a set of important activities to ensure that his 
identity remains a secret.  Brushing as much hair as possible off his body, 
using Jerome's blood and vicariously cleaning everything around him soon become 
necessary for survival and placement amongst the society which surrounds him.
Vincent soon becomes attracted to fellow worker Sally Ed (Uma Thurman), a 
beautiful young women with a terminal heart disease. A lively romantic subplot 
emerges between these two characters, and as Vincent becomes more and more 
desperate to conceal his identity their relationship will almost certainly end 
in disaster.
But Gattaca has much more in stall for viewers than just a Sci Fi drama with a 
romantic flavor - twists and developments in its story provide constant 
entertainment of a fulfilling and rewarding kind.
The claustrophobic and all too modern sets of Gattaca give an eerie 
representation of Niccol's futuristic world, perhaps making you feel that this 
sort of place may be around the corner - but it's impossible - impossible tell 
you, for anything like Gattaca to ever exist.  The very thought of DNA 
structuring society is laughable, however the illustrious mind of Niccol surely 
has created something truly special in a genre which surely produces more 
mindless duds then masterpieces.  So Gattaca's basic idea may appear to be a 
little silly - who cares?  It is not so much a film's plot that makes it great; 
rather the way it is executed, and although this film doesn't score many 
brownie points in believability it more than makes it up with maturity and 
style.
Many may argue that this "believability" factor is it's ultimate downfall, but 
anyone who does not have the imagination to fill in the blanks should steer 
clear of Gattaca all together.
For example in Steven Spielberg's Jurassic Park, we almost believed that 
rampaging dinosaurs could exist - simply because the exact theory behind it was 
presented from the start and shown in a society we can recognize and relate 
with.  But Gattaca quite obviously steers clear from all the hows and whys, and 
presents us not with theories, beliefs and assumptions, but with cold hard 
imagination and a touch of wonder.
The all-important question - is this necessarily bad?  For the scientific 
minded perhaps yes - but those who value physiological effects more than absent 
minded mathematics will appreciate Gattaca's character's on going relationships 
and the way they react in a society obsessed with perfection.
When creating a film, it is one thing to hand out emotion on a platter (ala 
Jerry Maguire, where the movie's surroundings allow for a loving relationship 
between certain characters), but where the basic setting is a cold and 
unforgiving society it is entirely different.  It truly takes skill to produce 
characters that people care about, situations which people think about and 
issues that people can relate with when apparent boundaries are set. Andrew 
Nicol does this beautifully, and not for one minute does the science side of 
things replace Gattaca's superb story and its brilliance in fabulously crafted 
scenes.
As an avid fan of numerous reviewers, it has been bluntly obvious to me that 
many different opinions have been expressed about this film - a film that does 
something different, strays off the track of clichi characters and events and 
presents us with something truly brilliant indeed.  If you are able to open 
your mind and absorb only a fraction of what Gattaca has to offer, a very 
memorial experience is to be had.  Its still early days but I have no doubt in 
proclaiming Gattaca as one of the best films of 1997.
5 stars out of 5
Daring to be different, Gattaca stands strong as a modern masterpiece.


Title
Review for One True Thing (1998)
ONE TRUE THING
Cast: Meryl Streep, Renée Zellweger, William Hurt, Tom Everett Scott
Director: Carl Franklin
Screenplay: Karen Croner based on the novel by Anna Quindlen
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and a half stars
It's hard to know whether One True Thing should be classified as a
mainstream or art house production.  There are definite Hollywood
touches in the film, evident in its opening and closing images that
tinker on the verge of portraying glossy sentimentality.  But the
majority of the film is habituated with emotional resonance, both
profound and unsophisticated, that philosophizes about the togetherness
of a family that is, by social definition, far from faultless.
Scriptwriter Karen Croner - who adapted the screenplay from Anna
Quindlen's novel - succeeds so well in crafting her very domestic
characters by realizing that there is nothing incredibly unique about
them.  Even in Meryl Streep's dying character - a woman who is suffering
from terminal cancer - the 'one true thing' in her life is the simple
fact that she is related by blood and love to the rest of her family.
She is neither a self-pronounced nor a publicly proclaimed hero; she
doesn't arrive at a conclusion that puts the rest of her life in
perspective.  She is simply a mother, a wife, a decent person, and
somebody who finds joy from establishing happy relationships.  This
passionate view on motherhood and families is at times given a cynical
edge by director Carl Franklin, who generally achieves what he intends
to.  At its best, One True Thing explores the isolation and unity of a
family, and the things that bring them together as well as the things
that tear them apart.
Kate Gulden (Meryl Streep) is cheerful mother who lives a peaceful life
in a small American town with husband George (William Hurt).  After Kate
is admitted into hospital for an operation that will hopefully remove a
terminal cancer from her body, George asks daughter Ellen (Renée
Zellweger) to take leave from her busy New York life as a journalist so
she can take care of her mother.  Ellen reluctantly obliges, and soon
learns the demanding requirements for being the maintainer of a
household.  She experiences first-hand the life in which Kate lives, and
as her cancer worsens, Kate relies on Ellen for physical and emotional
support.  But Ellen also has matters of her own to take of, including
her desperate attempts to keep her job and her growing suspicion and
frustration of her father, who is seldom at home.
The story is more of a mediation than a narrative, and that suits the
film's direction, which relies heavily on the strength of its
performers.  Thankfully Franklin draws exceptional performances from his
talented cast, ranging from Renée Zellwege's subtle portray of emotional
pain to Meryl Streep's display of physical suffering.  William Hurt is
also very fine, and displays a knack for questioning the audience as to
whether they should love or hate his character.  One True Thing's
ensemble cast lifts the film to heights that would have been otherwise
impossible to reach.
One True Thing does have its drawbacks, though, as not everything in the
film is as bittersweet as perhaps I have made it out to be.  Franklin's
direction sometimes feels like he is trotting over the same ground again
and again, not really going anywhere, but rather building a more
reclusive and isolated atmosphere for his characters to revolve in.
Strangely, it does pay off well, with an ending that is quite satisfying
considering that we know roughly what is going to happen from the very
first scene.
"Less is more," says William Hurt in the film, and that quote is
appropriate to Franklin's use of Karen Croner's script.  Some of the
power he exemplifies comes from the things that he doesn't explain or
elaborate on, which perhaps motivated him to refuse to round off One
True Thing in the happy and resolved way that made Stepmom - this year's
other film about a woman dying of cancer - pretentious and irritating.
This is one piece that intelligently illustrates the faults and merits
of reasonable people.  None are squeaky clean, and there are no heroes
or enemies.  But the very humane message that powers this film is,
although a touch too simplistic, enough to instigate an emotional
reaction from viewers.  It wants to conclude with a happy ending, but,
like life, happiness is in the eye of the beholder.


Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
SIMON BIRCH
Cast: Joseph Mazzello, Ian Michael Smith, Ashley Judd, Oliver Platt,
David Strathairn, Dana Ivey, Jan Hooks, Jim Carrey
Director: Mark Steven Johnson
Screenplay: Mark Steven Johnson suggested by "A Prayer for Owen Meany"
by John Irving
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and half stars
"Time is a monster that cannot be reasoned with," says one character in
Simon Birch, and that quote sums up much of the meaning of this film -
but there's more to it than that. Simon Birch grasps one extraordinary
character and shapes him in a good-natured and solidly made film.  It is
a film with meaning and significance, and one that uses emotion to keep
its audience interested.  For the most part, it works like a charm.
Simon Birch is an involving and gratifying experience, one that tunnels
its way into your heart and leaves you feeling uplifted.  The only
significant flaw in the production is its stark simplicity - the
storytelling here is straightforward and obvious, but compelling
nonetheless.
During the film's opening scene, we know that it will not end entirely
happily from the sight of a young boy's gravestone.  Simon Birch (Ian
Michael Smith) is the smallest delivery in the history of the Gravestown
Memorial Hospital, pronounced a miracle by doctors.  Simon is physically
stunted but intelligent and witty - during church he interrupts the
sermon: "If God's made the church bake sale a priority, we're in a lot
of trouble."  Simon's best friend is Joe (Joseph Mazzello), and together
they strive to answer the questions that plague their lives.  For Joe,
the disclosed identity of his father lies somewhere in the town, and
Simon firmly believes that he is an instrument from God who will, one
day, become a hero.
The film would have succeeded more on a dramatic level had it taken a
greater focus on Simon's personal life.  His parents neglected him since
birth, ashamed at how society considers him a freak and oblivious to the
incredible person he has become.  But I guess that is another story.
Simon Birch is really about the friendship between two very different
people, and young actors Ian Michael Smith and Joseph Mazzello bring
that friendship to life.  Smith especially is incredible in his first
film role - his performance is the most unique act you'll see this side
of Roberto Benigni.  The supporting cast is also splendid.  Ashley Judd
makes a believable homely mother to Joe, and Jim Carrey has a small but
special part as Joe's adult, present day self.
Simon Birch is simplistic in formation and unashamedly sentimental, yet
it deserves to be respected and admired for its insights into the human
endeavors of faith, devotion and friendship.  Director Mark Steven
Johnson (who wrote Grumpy Old Men and its sequel) paces his film well,
and at no point does it become boring or intimidating.  It is an honest
and good-natured relationship study with clarity and precision.  A
lovely little film that wears its heart on its shoulders, Simon Birch is
a charming journey to the heart of one of societies lovable misfits, and
a "normal" boy whose life will be altered forever thanks to a small,
"meaningless" outcast.


Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Featuring the voices of: Dave Foley, Kevin Spacey, Julia Louis-Dreyfus,
Phyllis Diller, Brad Garrett, Jonathan Harris, Bonnie Hun, David Hyde
Pierce, Madeline Kahn, Richard Kind, Denis Leary, Hayden Panettiere, Joe
Ranft, John Ratzenberger
Directors: John Lasseter, Andrew Stanton
Screenplay: Andrew Stanton, Donald McEnery, Bob Shaw
Australian theatrical release: December 3, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and a half stars
Critics everywhere have compared Disney Pixar's A Bug's Life to
Dreamworks' Antz.  Don't expect me to be any different; it is virtually
impossible not to compare these two pretty special films.  As I was
wracking my brain trying to figure out why I liked Antz more than this,
it suddenly hit me: Antz deals with its themes in more of a theoretical
sense, whilst A Bug's Life is very practical.  For example, in Antz, the
enemy was depicted as the colony itself - their inability to think for
themselves.  But in this film, the enemy is in the very practical form
of ruthless grasshoppers.
It is rare for Disney films to have a good amount of depth and meaning
(The Hunchback of Notre Damne is the only in recent memory), but A Bug's
Life - a potentially brilliant film - is just a little too thin an
experience.  But without being hyper critical, this is a very good and
solid film, which will no doubt score big with the Christmas box office.
The dangerous Hopper (voice of Kevin Spacey) and his ruthless band of
grasshoppers threaten to wipe out a colony of ants, which is led by the
ant queen (Phyllis Diller) and Princess Atta (Julia Louis-Dreyfus).
Flik (Dave Foley, of TV's NewsRadio) is an ant whose experimental views
on technology get him in deep trouble, but he rises to the challenge of
saving the colony by enlisting the help of "warrior bugs."
Unfortunately, he mistakes circus-performing insects for warriors, and
disaster brews as Hopper's threats become closer to reality.
One of the foremost reasons to see A Bug's Life is its clever jokes,
some of them parodies of our modern world.  When a fallen leaf
interrupts a group of ants collecting food, one ant screams "I'm lost!
Where's the line?"  Rescue workers quickly arrive at the scene.  "This
is nothing compared to the twig of '93!"
Many other gags, courtesy of script writers Andrew Stanton, Donald
McEnery and Bob Shaw, evolve around the crazy personalities of the
circus performers.  A repressed stick insect, a male ladybug and a
chubby caterpillar (who is eager to transform into a "beautiful
butterfly") are among the delightful characters delivering the jokes.
Kevin Spacey plays Hopper with a wickedly placid presence.  His voice is
controlled but his anger is fierce, a little reminiscent of his role as
a serial killer in Se7en.   Spacey is the best part of A Bug's Life, as
this superb actor proves that not being seen doesn't remove any power
from his performances.  Dave Foley plays a similar role to his part in
NewsRadio; acting as the sane center - the instigator that all the other
characters can react around.  David Hyde Pierce's voice is instantly
recognizable from the hit sitcom Frasier, and is a welcomed presence who
delivers his trademark personality of intelligence amongst confusion.
Almost everyone else seems uniformly average, ranging from the lifeless
Julia Louis-Dreyfus to the over the top Madeline Kahn (playing the
caterpillar).
A Bug's Life may have had it a little easy from critics.  Its plot is
lightweight, but it is not hard to be sucked into the films illustrious
computer animation.  These visuals are often a delight, although I was
surprised to find that they are significantly less detailed than those
in Antz (especially when we get a peek at the world beneath the ground).
A Bug's Life also looks much more spherical, with a smooth and shiny
design.
Definitely the best moments of A Bug's Life are near its end, in the
final battle between Flick and Hopper, and the delightful roll of film
through the credits (when an original gag is staged, which gives us an
insight into the film's real actors).  Whether you prefer these types of
films as theoretical or practical, sophisticated or slim, Antz and A
Bug's Life are both terrifically entertaining.  Now it's just a case of
whether or not Disney can provide depth and meaning in the same package.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Knock Off (1998)
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
1 star
The films of Jean-Claude Van Damme are not exactly listed on the AFI's
top 100, but they sure have provided us with a few chuckles and hoots.
John Woo's 1993 piece Hard Target built at least a couple of genuinely
entertaining scenes, and even 1998's Legionnaire had too much energy and
atmosphere to be ridden off completely.  But even Van Damme - a veteran
of bad movies - deserves better than Knock Off.  Writer Steven De Souza
gave Beverly Hills Cop III charm and excitement, but none of that is on
show here.  Knock Off bumbles and fumbles its way through a messy plot,
advancing from each dreary subplot to the next with no hint of a
coherent storyboard.   It's almost as if director Hark Tsui's plan was
to baffle viewers so he could disguise the film's paper-thin scripting.
Granted, there are some nice touches.  The editing and camera work is
sometimes stylish (especially in the first half), and the screen absorbs
Van Damme's lively presence with appropriate egotistical flair.  But the
visual novelties of Knock Off quickly wear thin, leaving virtually
nothing to counterbalance.  To make matters worse, the few scenes in
which Knock Off succeeds on a visual level are derivative, and serve no
relevance to the central story.  A well-staged chase scene through the
streets of Hong Kong is pretty much pointless, as is a Jackie Chan like
idea to position Van Damme amongst a building full of attacking Asians.
Marcus Ray (Jean-Claude Van Damme), a tough but friendly meathead, works
as a sales representative for a jeans company in Hong Kong.  His partner
is Tommy Hendricks (Rob Schneider), who is a loud mouth wimp.  Through
one of the film's flimsy plot connections, these two suddenly find
themselves in the midst of a worldwide conspiracy.  This conspiracy
involves the use of micro bombs the size of watch batteries (which, for
some strange reason, produce green flames).  Ray and Hendricks risk
their lives to stop the possible worldwide distribution of these new
devastating gadgets.
There's nothing direly wrong with Van Damme as an actor; his energetic
roles are entirely welcome in a film of this nature.  But his dialogue,
of course, suffers from intoxicatingly simplistic formation, to the
point where he becomes little more than a walking talking joke.  And he
isn't the only one.  Rob Schneider is given the tough job of providing
comic relief with only one or two one-liners that are actually funny.
Chris Tucker provided a nice bit of playful acting in Rush Hour, as did
Steve Buscemi in Armageddon.  Whereas those performers had punchy
dialogue aiding them, Schneider is witless and unfunny - he's just plain
irritating.
Just when action films appeared to be heading in the right direction,
along comes Knock Off, the dumbest film this side of Species 2.  Sure -
many bad movies are entertaining pieces of cinematic fluff - but this is
not one of them.  Irritating and silly, Knock Off is the kind of movie
that gives bad movies a bad name.


Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
THE THIN RED LINE
Cast: Sean Penn, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, Elias Koteas, Nick Nolte,
Adrien Brody, Jared Leto, Dash Mihok
Director: Terrence Malick
Screenplay: Terrence Malick based on the novel by James Jones
Australian theatrical release: January 18, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and a half stars
If you could imagine Quentin Tarantino refusing to make another film
after Reservoir Dogs and Pulp Fiction, you can understand why Hollywood
is fussing over the return of Terrence Malick.  Malick performed one of
the industry's greatest disappearing acts; his last film was made in
1978 and he has since been absent from the directors chair.  But now in
the cinema, when the lights dim and The Thin Red Line reels through the
projector, not much has changed.  This visionary director has not lost
any of his confidence or energy, but seems not to know exactly how to
channel them.  As much as Steven Spielberg told in Saving Private Ryan,
some of the film's power came from the things he didn't tell.  To
Malick's credit, The Thin Red Line is one of the most poetic and
extraordinary films likely to be released this year; but to his
condemnation, it fails to maintain a steady pace and a consistently
absorbing atmosphere.  But on a visual level, this film is beautifully
textured, and it has enough moving moments to make all of its
frustrations bearable.
The Thin Red Line could certainly be described as "experimental."
Ingeniously, Malick informs us that something is not quite right through
powerful imagery.  The film opens with a shot of a crocodile gliding
beneath algae-covered water; later, that same crocodile is shown tied up
and teased by a group of soldiers.  Feral dogs feast on dead bodies.
The face of a dead Japanese man is shown buried in mud; bringing to mind
that perhaps the enemy is not a distant race of people, perhaps the
enemy is ourselves. Soldiers contemplate what part of humanity could
possibly create something as dreadful as war.  Some find war as a test
of bravery and courageousness; others just want to get out of it alive.
When The Thin Red Line touches on these themes of mortality and human
nature, it achieves something that Saving Private Ryan never really did:
powerful metaphorical expressions.  When a film is able to draw emotion
from simply using representation, though, it usually will sacrifice
something to get there.  In the case of The Thin Red Line, a coherent
story is nothing more than an afterthought.
The film is based on a novel of the same name written by James Jones,
which tells the story of a group of men fighting during World War II in
the Pacific.  Brave troublemaker Witt (Jim Caviezel) fantasizes about a
different world, a "paradise" where peace dominates.  Bell (Ben Chaplin)
finds energy to fight from his visions of his wife back home.  Sergeant
Edward Welsh (Sean Penn) is a focused and courageous hard-knocker whose
views on war are as negative as they come.  Lieutenant Colonel Gordon
Tall (Nick Nolte) is intent on winning even if it means losing many
lives to achieve it.  These men and many others like them are forced to
bond together, to overcome the many distressing and life-threatening
scenarios they encounter.
I guess the major selling point for The Thin Red Line (apart from its
seven Oscar nominations) is the star-studded cast, which features some
of the world' s awesome talents.  Sean Penn is particularly memorable,
and plays his complex character with appropriate authority, and a subtle
love for the lives of Welsh's men occasionally shines through. Jim
Caviezel is fine, and Nick Nolte looked like he was going to burst a
vein at any moment - his character is an arrogant authoritarian, and he
plays the part well.  I found it hard to accept that John Travolta and
George Clooney were cast; they both have insignificant small roles that
serve as distractions to the story.  Travolta especially looks
ridiculous wearing what looks like a Mr Potato Head moustache.
For all its faults, The Thin Red Line is much more than just another
average World War II movie.  Some occasions in the film feature
voice-overs from the cast (this reminded me of Wim Wender's Wings of
Desire), in which they philosophize about the nature of war.  Often,
Terrence Malick finds power and poignancy in these moments.  The lush
jungle environments in the background aid these scenes incredibly,
making them not just powerful, but powerful and beautiful.  Out of the
norm and unpredictable, The Thin Red Line is often so gratifying that
its many lesser moments become huge letdowns.
While watching this film, Malick intends viewers to search for meaning
in war, but no doubt more people will be searching for meaning in
Malick's direction.  A picture can indeed tell a thousand words, but it
often feels like The Thin Red Line has a thousand too many pictures (a
170 minute running time is just a little too hard to fathom, especially
when the film often feels like it is going nowhere).  This is definitely
a hard movie to make a call on, but The Thin Red Line's absence of plot
makes it an easy target.  Malick ponders about his material and the plot
meanders along, not knowing exactly where he wants to end up, but
nonetheless carves some tragic and frightfully realistic images.  The
great thing is, his pondering is fascinating to watch, even if it is a
little inconsistent.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or for any inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Gary Sinise, Kevin Dunn, Carla Gugino, Luis Guzman,
John Heard, Stan Shaw
Director: Brian De Palma
Screenplay: David Koepp
Cinematography: Stephen H. Burum
Australian theatrical release date: October 1 1998
Snake Eyes is a perfect example of a cinematic roller coaster: the film
rises to an all time, thrilling high and then plummets right down into
dull and monotonous scenarios.   In fact, the only thing that director
Brian De Palma proves with this rather tame who done it is that he is a
better scene maker than he is a filmmaker.  Make no mistake - the first
half-hour or so of Snake Eyes is dynamite cinema.  And most of the rest
is absolute trash.
Nicholas Cage, one the screens most pleasing performers, and Gary
Sinise, a man who often brings third dimensions into 2D characters,
should have been together on screen a long time ago. It came as a
massive disappointment to me that these two fine actors - who share
between them such titles as The Rock, Face/Off, Forrest Gump and
Ransom - have chosen such a bumpy and inconsistent vehicle for their
first joint effort.
Cage is Rick Santoro, a gleeful American cop whose morals are easily
corrupted at the sight of dollar bills.  At a heavyweight championship
fight, Santoro is having a night off, and his best friend Naval
Commander Kevin Dunne (Sinise) is guarding the US Secretary of Defense.
Shots are fired from somewhere in the stadium - seconds after one of the
boxers gets knocked out - and Dunne is off chasing a suspicious red
head.  Another mysterious woman is at the scene, and gets showed by the
blood of the now shot Secretary.
De Palma begins the film with a lengthy sweeping shot of the stadium;
the cameras following Santoro everywhere as he moves around the venue.
Cinematographer Stephen Burum captures the atmosphere of the sports
arena perfectly, and De Palma never lets the excitement drop before
introducing the mystery.  And what a disappointing mystery it is, since
the screenwriters - De Palma and David Koepp (Jurassic Park, Men in
Black) - haven't written the film smartly enough to maintain a high
amount of tension, but smartly enough to add an occasional glimpse of
tension.  It's all pretty frustrating to watch, since Snake Eyes
constantly changes its pace and style; at one time being a heart-pumping
thriller and another a bland and predictable "thriller".
Perhaps the most daunting of all flaws in this film is its unsatisfying
and apathetic ending; where something as stupid as a change in weather
determines the fate of one particular character. Another commits
suicide, having spent the entire duration as a potentially interesting
character but still seems distanced from the audience.
If people are going to insist on continuing to compare Brian De Palma to
the late and great Alfred Hitchcock, they must remember that it takes a
great director to build a genuinely suspenseful, thrilling and exciting
scenario.  To keep that up for the entire film - now that would be
something special.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
Quentin Tarantino has a remarkable talent.  Not only is he able to director 
cinematic masterpiece and write potent screenplays and stories, but he also 
achieves something that goes beyond experience or credits - he creates a stir. 
Tarantino's knowledge of film came from his experience as a video clerk, and 
because he was never a film school graduate he didn't develop an identical 
style for all his films.  Reservoir Dogs, Pulp Fiction and Jackie Brown are all 
strikingly different.  This is not to say that they don't bear the same 
extraordinary scents - the dialogues in his films are so delightfully original 
that it is hard to label them as anything else except "Tarantino."
Jackie Brown, his third directing attempt, has a much more adult feel to it 
than Quentin's other films.  It's the story of middle aged adults contemplating 
the rest of their life, their health and desires, and everything that develops 
in between.
Jackie Brown (Pam Grier) is a flight hostess who works for a bottom rate 
airline, supplementing her miniscule income by smuggling money into the US for 
gun dealer Ordell Robbie (Samuel L. Jackson).  However, after one flight she is 
caught out by an ATF agent (Michael Keaton) and an LA cop (Michael Bowman).  
They offer her a simple deal: go to prison or rat on Ordell.  Either way, piles 
of money is involved.  Ordell has around half a million dollars tucked away in 
Mexico, and becomes desperate to obtain it before it's too late.  
We are introduced to the eccentric life of Ordell, his dim-witted partner Louis 
Gara  (Robert DeNiro) and one of his girlfriends, the happy-and-high Melanie 
(Bridget Fonda).  Sympathetic bail bondsman Max Cherry (Robert Forster) is 
thrown in the midst of Jackie's situation when Ordell pays him to release her 
from jail.
So let's examine what we have here: there are seven people and half a million 
in cash.  Each has their own plan, each has their own desires - but the real 
question is: who is playing who?
Obviously, whatever Quentin Tarantino comes up with is going to be compared to 
the mosaic masterpiece that was Pulp Fiction.  But as Quentin himself states: 
"Pulp Fiction is an Opera, this is a chamber."  Although Jackie Brown is much 
more straightforward than Pulp, it is in many ways a better picture.  Tarantino 
shows some camera aspects that are so original it is hard to believe that 
anyone would dare attempt them - one time the cinema screen splits in half 
(showing us two parts of the story), anther time an entire scene is shot in 
almost complete darkness. 
It is with a strong passion for effective film making that Tarantino makes 
Jackie Brown, a wonderfully acted and shrewdly put together film delicatessen. 
 It is a stylish, and very cool, middle aged film.
4 and a half stars out of 5
Maybe not Pulp Fictionbut theirs plenty of cult friction


Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
Wim Wenders' 1988 film Wings of Desire was a brilliant and poetic
examination of the human heart - taken from the perspective of angels
who roam the earth.  It enchanted us into feeling, understanding and
almost believing these MIB look a like's through the way Wenders avoided
common cliché's and Hollywood surroundings.  Now, the 90's update
version City of Angels is based on the former film in basic themes only.
And although this new rendition has lost most of the power of Wings of
Desire, it surprising contains a lot of its emotional impact.
Amongst other angels, Seth (Nicholas Cage) roams the streets of the city
of angels, Los Angeles.  He can only see in black and white, cannot feel
pain or hunger, and has a useful skill of reading peoples thoughts.
Whilst Seth is welcoming a hospital patient to the after life, he
notices the beautiful doctor Maggie (Meg Ryan) desperately trying to
save the mans life.  He soon becomes infatuated with her, and eventually
comes to her, appearing as a clueless civilian.
Maggie's fascination with Seth grows until she begins to sense something
abnormal, something unique about him.  She consults a close friend: "I
got this jolt that... something bigger is out there. Something bigger
than me, bigger than you. Does that sound crazy?"
Just as Seth feels that he is doomed to remain at arms length to Maggie
for the rest of her life, he speaks to a former-angel hospital patient
(Dennis Franz, in a role very similar to one played by Columbo's Peter
Falk in Wings of Desire), who explains to him how to "delve" into a
human form.  So (as the film is keen for us to believe) the relationship
between this couple depends on one question: is Seth willing to
sacrifice eternal life for a mere mortal?"
The answer to that question is, naturally, no mystery.  But it doesn't
have to be - with quotes like "I would rather have had one breath of her
hair, one kiss from her mouth, one touch of her hand, than eternity
without it," City of Angels is a tear jerking "chick flick" that gives a
powerful, lasting impact.
But surprisingly, the most impressive aspect of director Brad
Silberling's (who has only Casper under his belt) creation is not its
writing nor acting, but rather the stunning cinematography by Australian
John Seale (The English Patient, Rain Man). The visual impact of City of
Angels is so dazzling that it gives the big screen an angelic, gorgeous
radiance that no amount of Mr. Sheen's could possibly deliver.
Don't get me wrong: the dialogue is sumptuously gentle to inhale, and
the sweetened performances from Nicholas Cage and Meg Ryan are a triumph
in themselves.  But boiled down, City of Angels is sometimes just
good-looking Hollywood claptrap - and that is why it doesn't
convincingly impersonate Wings of Desire.  But it does, as I mentioned
before, have an emotional depth that gets through to the viewer on
multiple levels.
I would have loved to see this film more tightly based on Wim Wenders'
and Peter Handke's original screenplay for Wings of Desire.  Although
this obviously did not happen, City of Angels is far from a slip-up, and
Wenders himself was pleased with the final result.  He was quoted in the
film's promotional material, saying: "It was moving, beautifully
crafted, there was some amazing imagery and an astonishing story.  I had
never seen anything like it, well, except for that one German film
maybe, with the subtitles.  What's its name again?"

"How ironic - my crusade against television has come to an end so
formulaic it could have spewed from the power book of the laziest
Hollywood hack."  --Sideshow Bob
Subscribe to my movie reviews mailing list!  Simply reply to this email
with the subject as "Subscribe:newsletter"

Title
Review for Odd Couple II, The (1998)
REVIEW:  The Odd Couple II
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Walter Matthau, Jack Lemmon, Barnard Hughes, Christine Baranski,
Jonathan Silverman, Lisa Waltz
Director: Howard Deutch
Screenplay: Neil Simon
Australian Distributor: UIP
Australian theatrical release date: August 6 1998
The addition of yet another Jack Lemmon-Walter Matthau combo film will
no doubt bring cheers from many and groans from some. I was optimistic:
the only Matthau-Lemmon films I had seen were Grumpy Old Men and its
sequel, and I enjoyed both.  Whilst The Odd Couple II is not
particularly fresh, funky or funny, it is nice to see these two
old-but-energetic actors up to their usual antics.
Reunited after many years, Felix Ungar and Oscar Madison (Walter Matthau
and Jack Lemmon) are the classic odd couple.  They find themselves on
the open road, and on the way to a wedding.  During their trip, Felix
and Oscar have all kinds of wacky adventures: their car explodes after
rolling off the side of a road, they become imprisoned three times for
three different reasons, and a mate of theirs dies whilst driving
possibly the world's slowest Rolls Royce.  If it could happen to anyone,
it happens to them.
Neil Simon has passively written the screenplay which, at times, is a
touch too simplistic and a lot too dependent on its main characters.
That is the best and the worst thing about the film - Lemmon and Matthau
are wonderful in their roles, but are given way too much screen time.
Thus, the gags and capers end up feeling cramped and forced, as there
are no other characters to lighten the load.  In the two Grumpy Old Men
films, we were not only treated to a terrifically cynical extra-old-man,
but also love interests for the two men.  This is something that is
severely lacking in Odd Couple II, and is most felt about three quarters
of the way through when we start to get a little tired of their
bickering.
But The Odd Couple II is never boring, never intimidating and never
patronizing.  I really got the feeling that I was there because I wanted
to be; and if you know what to expect, you're not likely to be
disappointed.  It's far from perfect - but it's far from boring.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Interview, The (1998)
Cast: Hugo Weaving, Tony Martin, Aaron Jefferey, Paul Sonkkilla, Michael
Caton, Peter McCauley, Glynis Angel
Director: Craig Monahan
Screenplay: Craig Monahan, Gordon Davie, Alison Nisselle
Cinematography: Simon Duggan
Australian distributor: The Globe Films
Australian theatrical release date: Australian 20
Craig Monahan has come a long way from creating music videos and various
documentaries.  He began writing the script for The Interview over eight
years ago, which was finally furnished off with the help of a couple of
co-writers.  Much like Neil LaBute (responsible for the astounding In
the Company of Men), he has been able to ink more pen and film more
cohesively in his first feature than many directors and writers can
achieve in their careers.  Behind all the sticky multiple twists and
unwinding intrigue, his style of film making seems simple enough to me:
he doesn't really give a toss what we think of his characters or what
they do, just as long as we are manipulated enough into believing two
sides of a story, and that knowledge given to us isn't really given at
all.  It's forced; and once we enter the world of dark, repressive crime
life in Melbourne, there's no turning back.  And nor would we want to.
The two main protagonists are plausible and spiteful enough to ensure an
almost perfect amount of chemistry between the two leads. Tony Martin is
familiar with the tough guy role (with his characters in the long
running drama E-Street and Heartbreak High), playing Detective John
Steel, who interrogates the scared and confused Eddie Fleming (Hugo
Weaving).  Fleming seems innocent enough; and perhaps he his, but when
his apartment door is busted down by Steel and his even-tougher-guy
partner Wayne (Aaron Jeffery), he is placed in a darkened interrogation
room in the Melbourne CBD.  The charge: car theft.  Although Fleming is
at first reluctant to talk, when the subject changes from automobiles to
serial killings, he's all words.  And Steel realizes that his
predicament is far more complex than what he once suspected.
Monahan beckons us to ask the questions that he really loves not to
answer.  Is Fleming telling the truth?  Is he manipulating the situation
to his advantage?  Is he a conniving criminal genius, or an average
no-hoper on the dole?  Much to the film's advantage, he's probably a
little of everything, and reminded me of Kevin Spacey in The Usual
Suspects.  Both are unremarkable little men who end up showing their
sinister-but-maybe-not-sinister colours.
Monahan and his team of writers have pushed aside conventional narration
and replaced it with the art of reveal, where the characters are
diffused bit by bit until we can get a reasonable understanding of their
motives.  This is similar for our comprehension of the plot, which puts
our protagonists in entirely different positions. "I've been from Lord
Mayor to shit carter in less than two hours," Martin states when a
heated conversation eventuates.  And whilst on the subject of Martin -
he's a dynamic actor who gives an equally dynamic performance.  With a
subtle Australian flavor to his speech and a vital presence, Martin
burns into the back of our brains the perfect image of a good cop and
bad cop rolled into one.  Weaver is also good - very good - but some of
his dialogue seems a touch too simplistic at times.
It's a shame that Monahan has thrown away some valuable scenes with the
inclusion of Steel's predictable, uncivil macho man partner Wayne.  He
spoils the atmosphere on many occasions by looking, pure and simply,
stupid.  One scene, when Steel gives him firm advice regarding their
case, all effectiveness of this moment is lost when Wayne spits over the
side of a flight of stairs in his frivolous display of anger.
The Interview is perhaps a little over worked, with the production crew
doing everything possible to seduce us into the world of crime
investigation.  However, it is shot with incredible skill and precision
by Simon Duggan, who balances out the film's long pull-backs with
extreme close ups.  Oscar nominee David Hirschfelder (for Shine) also
adds much to the experience with his eerie and abstruse composition.
In the end, The Interview is an excellent gritty Australian flick, with
only a few flaws.  Although the film's climax is a little too passively
written, this is probably a good thing for Craig Monahan - this
explosive new director is already impressionably brilliant behind the
camera.  If he manages to achieve that same feat with his writing, Craig
might just become the new force in Australian cinema.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Dream (1998) (V)
A MIDSUMMER NIGHTS DREAM
Cast: Kevin Kline, Michelle Pfeiffer, Rupert Everett, Stanley Tucci,
Calista Flockhart, Anna Friel, Dominic West, Christian Bale, David
Strathairn, Sophie Marceau
Director: Michael Hoffman
Screenplay: Michael Hoffman, based on the play by William Shakespeare
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
Whilst A Midsummer Night's Dream may not be one of Shakespeare's best
plays, it's arguably his most atmospheric.  Only one previous film
adaptation has been made by a major studio, and that was in the 1930's.
The reason: it's such a big ask for a motion picture.  The Bard intended
his play to be a magical and luminous experience, and these are
qualities that can't be produced through just a script.  Thankfully,
filmmaker Michael Hoffman's take on the well-known production is
pleasing to the senses, and with the aid of cinematographer Oliver
Stapleton (One Fine Day), he has created quite a spectacular mythical
world.  The lively visual energy of A Midsummer Night's Dream is its
selling point both commercially and artistically and it evokes, as
Shakespeare would have would intended, a sense of wonder and magic.
Although some of the film's other elements bring it down - which,
incidentally, are mostly the same things that limited the play's
narrative success - this piece will please the masses, and for all the
right reasons.
Instead of 16th century Greece the setting is 19th century Tuscany, and
the bicycle has just been invented.  Kevin Kline is Nick Bottom, a
comical, obnoxious but courageous actor who is assigned to play Pyramus
in 'Pyramus and Thisby,' an absurd drama from a company of struggling
entertainers.  They are to perform in front of the Duke on his wedding
night.  Meanwhile, four star-crossed lovers are pursuing each other in a
magical forest.  Helena (Calista Flockhart) loves Demetrius (Christian
Bale), who barely acknowledges her existence and is engaged to marry
Hermia (Christian Bale), but Hermia's true object of affection is
Lysander (Dominic West).  The Fairy King Oberon (Rupert Everett) watches
them from a distance, and instructs his mischievous servant Puck
(Stanley Tucci) to find a special kind of flower juice.  A drop of this
juice, once placed on the eyelids of somebody sleeping, will make them
fall instantly in love to the first person they see upon waking.  Puck,
of course, worsens the situation by placing the juice on the wrong set
of eyelids.
Given the nature of his material, Hoffman's direction is quite heavy
handed.  Much of the cast, too, try a little too hard to make it all
work.  Kevin Kline is the only lead performer who looks completely
natural on the screen, and almost effortlessly entertains.  Bottom, as a
comical character, is one of Shakespeare's finest, and Kline fits the
criteria perfectly. Calista "Ally McBeal" Flockhart, on the other hand,
is more unconventional in her approach to Helena's eccentric
personality.  Flockhart overplays her somewhat, obviously intending to
portray love-struck Shakespearean craziness, but she misfires somewhere
along the line.  Perhaps it's because she is the only actor who looks
like she's been dragged from the set of Ally McBeal and asked to read
Shakespeare.  Flockhart, and especially Hoffman, are two production
members who sometimes make A Midsummer Night's Dream feel like it is
taking itself a little too seriously.  Even in the final scene, in which
Puck recites his famous speech ("if we shadows have offended, think but
this, and all is mended"), Hoffman misses the point entirely.  He takes
the speech very seriously, whereas Shakespeare intended it to ask
forgiveness for those who were hoping for another Macbeth or Hamlet.
Be that as it may, A Midsummer Nigh'ts Dream is a solid and entertaining
adaptation with some nice touches, both visually and literately.
Watching cast members wizz around on bicycles is a novel idea, as are a
couple of fun scenes that audiences will get a hoot from, including a
good old fashioned female mud fight and, as Geoffrey Rush in Shakespeare
in Love voiced, a "bit with a dog."  The film's narrative structure,
like the play's, is simplistic if not a little trite, but it was never
intended to be something profound.  A Midsummer Night's Dream is
probably the closest description of Melrose Place in the 16th century
(or, as it is here, the 19th century) that one can find.  If you are
tossing up whether to see Michael Hoffman's beautifully textured,
visually entrancing and charming film or wait for the next high school
production, I know which one I'd choose.


Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
There's a thin line between satire and controversy, and Mike Nichols (The 
Birdcage, Wolf) has directed a sharp and very honest look at a US presidential 
election.  Based on the book written by "Anonymous" (actually former "Newsweek" 
writer Joe Klein), John Travolta plays Governor Jack Stanton. But he doesn't 
actually play Stanton.  He plays Bill Clinton; just the same as Emma Thompson 
no doubt plays the First Lady and Billy Bob Thorton is the campaign manipulator 
James Carville (although the credits will of course say otherwise).
The film is taken from the perspective of Henry Burton (Adrian Lester), a 
morally correct and somewhat hesitant new advisor to Stanton.  He searches for 
justice and dignity in the ugliest possible situations, and whether it be 
keeping the history of his boss' pants under wraps or contemplating digging up 
dirt on another politician, he approaches his work with a keen desire to 
skillfully serve his country and his fellow workers.
Richard Jemmons (Billy Bob Thorton) and Daisy Green (Maura Tierney) team up 
with Henry as the would-be president's advisors, and hire lesbian veteran Libby 
Holden (Kathy Bates) as the campaign's eccentric "tougher than dirt" 
incriminator.  Together they face all sorts of sexual allegations, the 
irritatingly discourteous media and other witty politicians in the election 
race.
In its satire and controversy, Primary Colors is a similar film to Wag the Dog: 
they both are not afraid to wipe their noses in the nitty-gritty and take a 
bold look at something that will never has honesty as a virtue.  But whereas 
Wag showed us how much affect a few people can have on the media, Primary 
Colors is much more concerned with fleshing out it's characters, letting us 
understand what they want and why, and making us truly appreciate the humanity 
and rectitude that they graciously represent. 
Seeing John Travolta play Bill Clinton so confidently and justly is enough to 
make the film more than worth a look.  And the rest of the cast also make 
superb performances - Adrian Lester sharply portrays the intellect of Henry 
whilst Kathy Bates is perfect as the robust and energetic Libby Holden.   
At occasions, you can't help but feel that these terrific characters are going 
to waste.  There are long slabs of time where John Travolta (unquestionably the 
most interesting to watch) is missed from the screen; and since it is awkwardly 
structured as Henry's story we are often forced to watch scenes that perhaps 
are not so necessary to the central plot - or even the point of the film.  
Having said that, make no mistake - Primary Colors is always enjoyable to 
watch.  But frequently we have to ask ourselves - exactly what are we watching?
Most of the first half of its duration is a lightheaded look at melodramatic 
confrontations that seem so genuine we cannot help but laugh, but the way 
Primary Colors chooses to finish tackles aspects that are very contrary, and 
almost unsuitable, to the rest of the film.  But as I mentioned before, there 
is a thin line between satire and controversy - and for the most part, Primary 
Colors delivers an entertaining indulgence of political matters combined with a 
far-from-overpowering look at winning the public's opinion.
Although at occasions the film may jump around a little too freely, focus is 
never lost on how important and vulnerable the subject matter really is.  
Thankfully, it is clear to make the distinction on what is entertaining movie 
cosmetics and what is a provocative documentation of something so really it's 
scary.


Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
REVIEW: John Carpenter's Vampires
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: James Woods, Daniel Baldwin, Sheryl Lee, Thomas Ian Griffith, Tim
Guinee, Maximilian Schell
Director: John Carpenter
Producer: Sandy King
Screenplay: Don Jakoby based on the novel "Vampire$" by John Steakley
Australian theatrical release: December 10, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
The most astonishing thing about John Carpenter's Vampires isn't that it
gives a new spin on the classic legend, nor that its special effects are
particularly glamorous or its acting well performed.  It is how Village
Roadshow managed to produce a twenty-eight-page press kit that amazes
me.  Full of juicy tidbits of information -- including the production
crew's opinions on the sex life of vampires, and how none of the cast
"were particularly crazy about being burned alive" -- the press kit
provides just as many laughs as the movie.  But are we laughing for the
right reasons?
Probably not, given the nature of director John Carpenter's material -
vampires.  But in the cosmos of this film, garlic and crosses are futile
against the blood-sucking enemy.  The easiest way for slayer Jack Crow
(James Woods) and his team to murder the undead is to drag 'em out into
the sunlight.  So you can imagine how they feel when they learn of the
legendary Valek (Thomas Ian Griffith) - the first vampire in recorded
history - and his plan to give vampires the power to walk in daylight.
This plan involves the use of a mysterious religious artifact named the
Berziers Cross, and an eerie ritual using the blood of a slayer.
If you're expecting a tale as entertaining as, say, From Dusk Till Dawn,
or a story board as darkly comic as Blade, think again.  Vampires is a
"real" slayer flick, with only one intention: to showcase as many
vampire hunts as possible, whilst still remaining within the borders of
a basic narrative.
Trouble is, John Carpenter seems to forget that even horror films need
well constructed action scenes.  Even greater a problem is that killing
vampires just doesn't seem enough of an idea to warrant a film, even
though the screenplay was adapted from the novel Vampire$, by John
Steakley.  Valek's quest to give the vampires ultimate power is not much
more than one of the screenplay's many plot props; a set up which
deliberately helps builds up to a heroic climax.
In some ways, James Woods seems perfect for his role.  His western macho
man portrayal is simplistic and one dimensional, but strangely
compelling.   You get the feeling that this is the type of role that
could have gone to Kurt Russel, or Clint Eastwood a couple of decades
ago.  Another interesting screen persona is played by Sheryl Lee, who is
a hooker that gets bitten by Valek, and is irresistible to watch as her
transformation from human to vampire takes place.
Even if Vampires is nothing more than an average genre flick, at least
John Carpenter has been smart enough not to take himself too seriously.
The gothic western setting never seems entirely believable, nor totally
unimaginable.  It's just a place that suits Crow's belt and jacket, and
serves as a modern surrounding to an old fashioned, often-hilarious
tale.  But are we laughing for the right reasons?

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
RONIN
Cast: Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone, Stellan Skarsgard, Sean
Bean, Skipp Sudduth, Jonathan Pryce, Michael Lonsdale, Katarina Witt
Director: John Frankenheimer
Screenplay: J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz
Australian theatrical release: February 4, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 
2 and a half stars
The plot of Ronin relies heavily on a valuable briefcase.  As in Pulp Fiction,
the contents of this briefcase are never revealed, for the simple fact that
what is inside of it is insignificant to the film's overall meaning.   The
briefcase is a tool - or, if you like, an excuse - to give characters the
chance to entertain us.  That theory pretty much works with all that Ronin has
to offer.  Director John Frankenheimer (who has had more than forty years of
experience in the field) sacrifices a potentially powerful film for the sake
of individual, insignificant moments.  Ordinarily that might work in a
simplistic action flick, but in one that tries to tell as much as Ronin does,
success is somewhat limited.
On paper, Ronin certainly has all the assets of a great action film.  The past
has proven that great action films often do not have great action stars, but
rather, solid dramatic actors having a little fun in slightly easier roles.
The gripping crime saga Heat positioned Al Pacino alongside Robert DeNiro, and
equally peculiar combinations were found in Face/Off (John Travolta and
Nicholas Cage) and The Negotiator (Samuel L. Jackson, Kevin Spacey).  I was
pleased to see DeNiro and Jean Reno (two actors who have proven that they can
do more than just look tough, which they do pretty well anyway) form a solid
partnership, although they end up twiddling their thumbs with too much screen
time and too little to do. 
An international team of covert operatives are hired to retrieve a mysterious
briefcase.  The smart and smug Sam (Robert DeNiro) becomes the obvious leader
of the group.  When asked if he had ever killed anybody, Sam answers "once I
hurt somebody's feelings."  The other operatives are French coordinator
Vincent (Jean Reano), driver Larry (Skipp Sudduth), weapons specialist Spence
(Sean Bean, best known for his role as 006 in Goldeneye) and hi-tech gadgets
specialist Gregor (Stellan Skarsgard).  Holding the team together is employer
Deirdre (Natasha McElhone), who is equally as cold as the people working for
her.  
Ignore the stylish backdrops and sophisticated European settings - Ronin makes
little sense.  Its screenplay by J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz sprouts various
developments, ranging from betrayal to even a hint of romance.  There's a
surprise bad guy, another surprise bad guy, a good guy, another good guy, a
coward, and so forth.  Before Ronin develops its primary characters, more
characters are introduced.  Before Ronin allows us to absorb the seriousness
of its scenarios, another one is on the way.  This makes for tense and often
gripping moments, but I feel that the film would have benefited from a little
more breathing space.  Enemy of the State staged a similar intensity, but this
was done intentionally and intelligently, whereas Ronin seems to try too hard
to keep viewers on the edge of their seats.
Frankenheimer deliberately refrains from developing his central characters.
You will walk away from Ronin not knowing much about who they are or what
motivates them, with the exception of some minor details (Sam is there purely
for the money, that's for sure).  For the most part, the coldness and
bitterness of the film's relationships work on exactly the right levels.  Even
when Sam and Vincent develop a loyal friendship, you get the feeling that
something is holding them back.  Their professionalism is unshakable; if one
saves the life of the other, their initial reaction is not to show their
appreciation, but to return the favor.  DeNiro and Reno give convincing
performances in the most likeable parts, and the bittersweet supporting cast
get their moments to shine.
In a silly little voice over at the film's completion, Frankenheimer almost
seems to be asking us not to condemn his film for its lack of emotion.  Whilst
I appreciated the way Ronin captures the spirit of the killer for hire
industry, Frankenheimer spells it out to us in big bright letters, rather than
allowing viewers to walk away with a personal interpretation as to how it
works.  The industry is cold.  C - O - L - D.
"A thinking man's action pic" is the general description that many have given
this film. My two cents says that its creators certainly did think about what
they were doing, but tried to make too much out of too little.  Ronin
certainly has many rewarding moments (including a couple of eye popping chase
scenes), and a handful of performances of an unusually high standard.  But
Frankenheimer never lets his settings or characters come alive in the way they
should have.  Not only does he sacrifice a potentially powerful film for the
sake of some exciting moments, but also a wide range of intriguing characters
for a wide range of inaccessible ones.  


Title
Review for How Stella Got Her Groove Back (1998)
REVIEW: How Stella Hot Her Groove Back
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Angela Bassett, Taye Diggs, Whoopi Goldberg, Regina King, Suzzanne
Douglas, Michael J. Pagan
Director: Kevin Rodney Sullivan
Producer: Deborah Schindler
Screenplay: Ron Bass and Terry McMillan based on the novel by Terry
McMillan
Cinematography: Jeffrey Jur
Music: Michael Columbier
Australian distributor: Twentieth Century Fox
Australian theatrical release date: November 26
When their initial thoughts and ideas have been developed, scriptwriters
are often faced with the well-known problem of what to do next.  From
previous examples, we've discovered that writers can introduce new
characters, change the setting drastically or yield an unexpected
scenario - anything except lay down their guns and die.  But in the case
of How Stella Got Her Groove Back, no innovative artillery was ever
loaded.  And around half way through the film, I was left open-jawed as
I witnessed a horribly under written first half transform into a
horribly over written second.
The first example of how badly under written the beginning of Terry
McMillan's script is lies in the title of the film.  When it reads How
Stella Got Her Groove Back, one must pose the question of whether she
lost it in the first place.  Stella (Angela Bassett) is an amazingly
attractive 40-year-old who has a respectable job, which rakes in the
dollars.  When she takes a much-needed holiday, Stella picks up a
21-year-old Jamaican man, Winston (Taye Diggs), and eventually takes him
back home.  This in itself is not too much to digest, as the notion of
suspending disbelief is welcomed in a romantic fantasy of this sort.
But McMillan expects us to believe that Stella's "groove" is gone by
simply piecing together a few scenes of her at work, and quoting a few
lines of dialogue about her having to get out more.  A major oversight
aren't the words I'm looking for - a half assed job, perhaps, are
better.
By the time the second half begins, we're already more than just a
little fed up.  Stella and Winston sing a boring chorus of "should we or
should we not stay together", and that ultimately lasts for the rest of
the ordeal.
The fact that I saw one of the first prints of this film in Australia is
nothing for me to gloat about.  Of the thirteen or so viewers in the
cinema, only four - including me - were left seated for its final
moments. And who can blame them, since this punishing ordeal never
relents from butt numbing boredom.
To demonstrate the weaknesses in McMillan's screenplay, the film's gags
are simply not funny, and its most serious moments are way too funny.
An ambulance driver casually talking on a phone whilst a patient suffers
inside is not my idea of humor, and my idea of a serious moment does not
involve two adults arguing about whether or not they should stay
together for the tenth time.  That's why I can easily imagine why
McMillan's novel (of the same name) would be a much more pleasurable
experience.  At least, you could probably take it seriously.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
SIMON BIRCH
Cast: Joseph Mazzello, Ian Michael Smith, Ashley Judd, Oliver Platt,
David Strathairn, Dana Ivey, Jan Hooks, Jim Carrey
Director: Mark Steven Johnson
Screenplay: Mark Steven Johnson suggested by "A Prayer for Owen Meany"
by John Irving
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and half stars
"Time is a monster that cannot be reasoned with," says one character in
Simon Birch, and that quote sums up much of the meaning of this film -
but there's more to it than that. Simon Birch grasps one extraordinary
character and shapes him in a good-natured and solidly made film.  It is
a film with meaning and significance, and one that uses emotion to keep
its audience interested.  For the most part, it works like a charm.
Simon Birch is an involving and gratifying experience, one that tunnels
its way into your heart and leaves you feeling uplifted.  The only
significant flaw in the production is its stark simplicity - the
storytelling here is straightforward and obvious, but compelling
nonetheless.
During the film's opening scene, we know that it will not end entirely
happily from the sight of a young boy's gravestone.  Simon Birch (Ian
Michael Smith) is the smallest delivery in the history of the Gravestown
Memorial Hospital, pronounced a miracle by doctors.  Simon is physically
stunted but intelligent and witty - during church he interrupts the
sermon: "If God's made the church bake sale a priority, we're in a lot
of trouble."  Simon's best friend is Joe (Joseph Mazzello), and together
they strive to answer the questions that plague their lives.  For Joe,
the disclosed identity of his father lies somewhere in the town, and
Simon firmly believes that he is an instrument from God who will, one
day, become a hero.
The film would have succeeded more on a dramatic level had it taken a
greater focus on Simon's personal life.  His parents neglected him since
birth, ashamed at how society considers him a freak and oblivious to the
incredible person he has become.  But I guess that is another story.
Simon Birch is really about the friendship between two very different
people, and young actors Ian Michael Smith and Joseph Mazzello bring
that friendship to life.  Smith especially is incredible in his first
film role - his performance is the most unique act you'll see this side
of Roberto Benigni.  The supporting cast is also splendid.  Ashley Judd
makes a believable homely mother to Joe, and Jim Carrey has a small but
special part as Joe's adult, present day self.
Simon Birch is simplistic in formation and unashamedly sentimental, yet
it deserves to be respected and admired for its insights into the human
endeavors of faith, devotion and friendship.  Director Mark Steven
Johnson (who wrote Grumpy Old Men and its sequel) paces his film well,
and at no point does it become boring or intimidating.  It is an honest
and good-natured relationship study with clarity and precision.  A
lovely little film that wears its heart on its shoulders, Simon Birch is
a charming journey to the heart of one of societies lovable misfits, and
a "normal" boy whose life will be altered forever thanks to a small,
"meaningless" outcast.


Title
Review for Antz (1998)
Starring the voices of: Wood Allen, Sharon Stone, Sylvester Stallone,
Jennifer Lopez, Gene Hackman, Dan Aykroyd, Anne Bancroft, Danny Glover,
John Mahoney
Directors: Eric Darnell and Tim Johnson
Screenplay: Todd Alcott, Chris Weitz and Paul Weitz
Australian theatrical release date: October 29
In a country of millions, it's easy to feel insignificant.  In a colony
of billions, it's even easier.
The animation gurus from Dreamworks, including Tim Johnson - who
transformed Homer Simpson into 3D - have taken the standards of computer
generation up a few notches with Antz.  They zoom in and out, and up and
around the huge world of these tiny creatures, giving amazing detail to
items as ordinary as a soft drink can.
Z (voice of Woody Allen) feels that he has had a less than satisfying
childhood - receiving minimal attention from his mother, since he is the
middle child in a family of five million.  Living and working in a
colony which follows strict routine, Z struggles to find his own self
amongst a society that discourages individualism.  Quite a complex theme
to explore in a family film, really, but that just makes it all the
better.
Antz never fails to keep a consistently high level of entertainment,
with the obvious visuals but, less obviously, some fabulous dialogue
that both adults and children can get a lot out of.  Woody Allen was an
absolutely perfect choice for his role, giving Z a lovable and quirky
tone, sounding exactly right on every occasion. Sharon Stone plays
Princess Bala, Z's love interest who is predictably disgusted by him at
first. Meanwhile, Sylvester Stallone also sounds perfect as Z's macho
buddy, with a good heart.
As we all know, there has to be a bad guy; this time it's General
Mandible (Gene Hackman), a power crazed evil ant who hatches a plot to
kill all the workers and start a new colony.  I would have liked to see
Custer developed a little more since he's so fun to watch, but then
again, so is everyone.
The three screenwriters and two directors have made the tale a heroic
one, but not before examining Z's nervous mind.  Once we have a good
idea of what makes him tick, Z's adventures begin and the film starts to
unwind its carefully executed climax.  Which, in every sense of the
word, is terrifically exciting and certainly a benchmark in atmospheric
animated sequences.
The quality of viewing in Antz is rich and illustrious, bringing to life
a whole new world of huge proportions.  Not so much a storm in a tea
cup, but perhaps an epic from an ant.  And if it does become that - an
epic - it would be one of the more justified successes of recent years,
with strong human values and an inspirational story line.  In short,
Antz contains everything that makes an excellent film excellent and,
whilst it doesn't completely blow you away, it's probably the best
family movie so far this year (it's only contender being Mouse Hunt).
I at least speak for myself when I say that I definitely wouldn't mind a
break from Sliding Paltrows, rampaging lizards and frowning Bruce
Willis'.  Z can beat the pants off all of 'em.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
I wont even pretend that I have seen the other 3 alien films.  I saw glimpses
of Alien and Aliens and fragments of Alien 3, but I have by no means actually
sat down and watched any of them.  So take my opinion from an unbiased and
impartial perspective: Alien Resurrection is not worth the large bag of lollies
I was munching into after a hard days work.
I didnt just dislike it so much because the plot was awful; most of the acting
was very average or the special effects got tiresome after 5 minutes of painful
viewing  but also the fact that every tedious ingredient thrown in attempts to
give this pointless dribble some meaning.
Sigourney Weaver, whos role in Alien earned her an Academy Award nomination,
plays the character of Ripley, who died fighting against extraterrestrial scum
in Alien 3.  200 years later, scientists use a sample of blood found at the
site of her death to recreate Ripley - including the alien that was stuck inside
her.  In no time they remove the alien from her body and separate the two; yet
Ripley is now not completely human, possessing strange amounts of strength and
being able to withhold greater pain than a normal being.  Im sure someone can
explain exactly why this is so, but for now well just ignore it and move on.
Why, you ask, would Ripley and the alien inside her be recreated?  Well, the
smart little lab researchers believed that they would be able to discover many
advancements in science from studying the alien creature.  These were the same
people who said they could control the alien and that their was no danger in
their research.  They (yawn) were wrong.
It doesnt take a genius to figure out that the rest of the film is a continuous
cat and mouse chase between the humans who die off one by one and the aliens who
open their mouths on every possible occasion to show off their frightfully scary
un-flossed teeth.
Theres a little saying that goes something like this: If youre going to make
a bad film, do it well.  I have seen plenty of disappointing and underachieving
movies, but they are not the ones that really bother me.  Alien Resurrection, a
good example of a film that really gets up my nose, is not so much a
discouraging experience but an off putting one.
There is no way to describe why the Australian MA rating was given to this film
other than unnecessary and repulsive gore, which attempts to distract us from
the wandering-but-not-going-anywhere plot.  In one scene my stomach churned as I
witnessed a mawkish looking alien put its hand on a characters head and
literally ripped most of his face off.  Another one featured Ripley sticking a
knife through her hand just to impress someone she was talking to.  Fair enough
if it were in a horror film or even if it bared any significance to the story,
but this is unfortunately not the case, and this sort of bizarre gore is
inexcusable.
If you think Im struggling to find one good aspect about the film, then you
thought right.  One exciting scene is a credit (and the only part remotely worth
seeing) to the film, in which an alien chases two men (one a cripple) up a tall
ladder with interesting results.  But of course after that thrilling scene Alien
Resurrection had no problem in returning to its pathetically low standard, and
ends up crashing into the shores of movie dullness more often than Japanese
kamikaze jet fighters fall off their skis.
So in a film where the one liners come as bad as Earth man, what a shit hole
and the primary means for one mans strategic attack is to bounce bullets off
walls to hit an opponent, its no wonder why Alien: Resurrection turned out to be
as off putting and clumsy as it is.
Oh, and in case youre wondering about my bag of lollies  the less I enjoy a
film, the more I eat.  So all the lollies were gone in 15 minutes; but however
empty the bag turned out to be, it was still a long way ahead of the movie


Title
Review for Lolita (1997)
LOLITA
Cast: Jeremy Irons, Dominique Swain, Melanie Griffith, Frank Langella
Director: Adrian Lyne
Screenplay: Stephen Schiff based on the novel by Vladimir Nabokov
Australian theatrical release: April 8, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
One might describe Lolita as simply a road movie with a pedophile and a
young girl - at least, that would be the easy way of explaining it.
There is a bad taste that lingers all through this film; even in its
sweetened moments, there is a sense that nothing will end righteously.
Behind the films characters and behind its doomed central romance, there
is a cynical but simultaneously passionate depiction of the nature of
forbidden love.  Director Adrian Lyne takes a lengthy amount of time
building the relationship between his two protagonists, before coming in
for the kill in the last forty-five or so minutes of the film.  He molds
the bad taste into an immoral atmosphere, all the while making sure that
the sins he examines are told in an engaging and profound manner.  The
result is an enticing and literate mixture of triumph and disaster,
sorrow and pleasure.  Told with subtlety and elegance, Lolita is a
gentle but expressive experience, and one that is portrayed vividly and
openly.
You can bet your bottom dollar that no film this year will have created
as much controversy as this one.  With the large amount of media
spotlight on the film, it's almost as if seeing Lolita is a crime - and
for all the wrong reasons.  I don't understand why many individuals and
organizations were so intent on having the film banned - do they think
that if we ignore the issue of pedophilia, it will go away?  As my
colleague Peter Thompson explained on the Sunday TV program, "if Lolita
discourages even one person from pursuing his or her desires at the
expense of another person, of any age, it will have more than justified
itself."  And justified itself it has.  I don't believe that Lolita
encourages pedophilia at all - it really discourages it, since the film
ends with a painful and heart-breaking tragedy, which is one of the
foremost reasons to see it.
Professor Humbert Humbert (Jeremy Irons) is a quaint middle aged
pedophile, and he's not a monster or a freak as many screen pedophiles
are.  Humbert fell head over heals in love as a teenager, and the death
of his girl friend at a young age marred him for life.  So much so, that
he has never stopped searching for her.  As he matured, his romantic
interests did not, so when he stumbles upon the beautiful 14 year old
Dolores "Lolita" Haze (Dominique Swain) he is instantly mesmerized.
Humbert lodges in the home of Lolita's mother Charlotte Haze (Melanie
Griffith) and then marries her, just to stay close to his true object of
affection.
When Charlotte is conveniently removed from their lives, Humbert and
Lolita's relationship advances.  Lolita realizes the manipulative power
she has over Humbert, and what began as meaningless flirting
materializes into a contingency of sexual manipulation.  As Humbert
becomes obsessed by the seductive young girl, he takes away from her the
very thing he was attracted to - her innocence.
Jeremy Irons is perfectly cast as professor Humbert, a character whose
every action needed to performed with a weighty but gentle presence.
Irons fulfills that criteria beautifully, and gives a performance that's
virtually faultless.  Every look and every move that Humbert makes is
carried with subtle expression and gorgeous artistry; Jeremy Irons is
completely convincing and incredibly moving.  I wouldn't hesitate to say
that he is one of the best actors working today.   On the other side of
the spectrum - in age, and in experience - Dominique Swain (who appeared
in John Woo's Face/Off) is fine.  She animates Lolita with needed
energy, and only ever looks slightly unconvincing in her final scene
(though the damage made is minimal).  Together, Irons and Swain make an
obliging screen couple, although their togetherness is intentionally
never entirely comfortable to watch.
Stephen Schiff's screen adaptation of the classic novel by Vladimir
Nabokov retains its literacy and coherency.  The film never adds
subplots for the sake of having subplots - everything is edited
precisely and its key scenes never run too long.  The photography by
Howard Atherton provides some nice visual touches, especially in the
final few scenes that, together, provide a disturbingly provocative
climax.  Shot, edited and performed with elegance, Lolita is a powerful
and artistic film with a grim core.  Ignore the droves of people who
condemn it, and listen to those who take it seriously - Lolita is a
painfully beautifully piece that, aside from the controversy it has
gathered, is really not about politics at all - its about a relationship
that cannot feasibly end happily.


Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
PRACTICAL MAGIC
Cast: Sandra Bullock, Nicole Kidman, Dianne Wiest, Stockard Channing,
Aidan Quinn, Goran Visnjic
Director: Griffin Dunne
Screenplay: Robin Swicord and Akiva Goldsman and Adam Brooks based on
the novel by Alice Hoffman
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
One star
Many years ago people believed that witchcraft was not something to poke
fun at; witches symbolized evil in its most satanic and scariest form.
But nowadays, witches are funky and cool.  Compare the witchcraft in
Macbeth or The Crucible to that of Bewitched or Sabrina: The Teenage
Witch, and you'll notice an astonishing difference.  Vile old women have
now been replaced by the likes of Nicole Kidman and Sandra Bullock, and
the only thing scary about them is their choice of films.  Attractive
young women may give their characters energy and liveliness, but
witchery has lost its meaning and relevance in cinema.  In the case of
Practical Magic, it doesn't represent evil; it represents very bad
filmmaking.
For centuries, the Owens family of witches has suffered from a
disturbing curse: any man they fall in love with soon ends up dead.
Sisters Sally (Sandra Bullock) and Gillian (Nicole Kidman) deal with
this problem in different ways.  Sally chooses to ignore her family's
past and marries a man she is deeply in love with, whilst Gillian
pursues a life of loveless affairs.  Things get a little tricky when the
sisters kill Gillian's boyfriend, in self-defense.  They attempt to
cover up the murder, whilst likeable cop Gary Hallet (Aidan Quinn)
investigates who done it.
Any chance to pace Practical Magic in a sensible way has been
conveniently ignored.  The story moves from romance, to sanitized
horror, to a murder mystery, then back to romance, then back to
sanitized horror, and then to something even more ridiculous (let's just
say a group of ordinary women become part of an absurd ritual, and leave
it at that).  The three screenwriters who adapted the film from the
novel by Alice Hoffman have shown no talent for unraveling any hint of a
coherent story.  Practical Magic is never evenly faintly believable, and
only occasionally enjoyable.  Sandra Bullock and Nicole Kidman give a
sexy and fun feeling to their roles, but their performances are
simplistic and one-dimensional.
The film never succeeds in finding stable ground, but comes reasonably
close to it when Aidan Quinn arrives on the screen.  Quinn's previous
film was The Assignment, in which he boldly portrayed two different
characters, and was brilliant throughout.  Here, he looks out of place
and ignorant of the idiocy surrounding him, but at least provides the
reason why Practical Magic is (sometimes) tolerable.
Few films insult my intelligence and ever fewer inspire me to walk out
early, but Practical Magic did both those things.  Director Griffin
Dunne seems to have no idea of how to make a solid, respectable product,
largely because of the film's clumsy screenplay.  Condescending,
embarrassing and immature, Practical Magic is practically pathetic.


Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE
Cast: Gwyneth Paltrow, Joseph Fiennes, Geoffrey Rush, Colin Firth, Ben
Affleck, Tom Wilkinson, Imelda Stuanton, Judi Dench, Simon Callow, Rupert
Everett
Director: John Madden
Screenplay: Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard
Australian theatrical release: February 11, 1999
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 
4 and half stars
Shakespeare in Love's recipe for success is a simple one.  Due to the film's
superb screenplay and sound acting, director John Madden is able to pick and
match the best parts of three different genres.  Clever comedy, charming
romance and absorbing drama fit neatly into this period piece, which has a
distinctly contemporary feel.  Ordinarily it would be fair enough to point out
that a director probably shouldn't attempt to have the best of both worlds (so
to speak); but here, Madden has the best of three.  
Will Shakespeare (Joseph Fiennes) has writers block.  He's just begun working
on a proposed play titled "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter," but
struggles to find inspiration to express himself.  But, like the play's title,
Shakespeare's life soon changes for the better.  He finds motivation in the
form of Lady Viola (Gwyneth Paltrow), who is destined to marry the snobby Lord
Wessex (Colin Firth) at the command of Queen Elizabeth herself (Judi Dench, in
a cleverly arrogant performance).  Shakespeare and Viola live out their doomed
romantic fantasy, whilst the formalities (and informalities) of producing a
theatrical production blare in the background.  
Those interested in Shakespearean times will appreciate the film's suggestions
and insights into what happened during this era.  Shakespeare in Love suggests
how the mysterious death of famous playwright Christopher Marlowe (played by
the always dependable Rupert Everett) occurred, and hints at how the
prohibition of women on the stage was eventually revoked (during the era, men
had to play women in drag).  On the other hand, those who desire two hours
worth of solid entertainment will get more than they paid for. Comic
performances from Geoffrey Rush as a struggling theatre owner and The Full
Monty's Tom Wilkinson as the play's producer aid the film in keeping it
accessible for everyone.  
Joseph Fiennes and Gwyneth Paltrow shine in the two meatiest parts.  Scenes in
which Shakespeare puts pen to paper work better than you may expect; each
bringing a magical touch and an involving atmosphere.  As he writes, we can
almost feel the love that inspires him.  Paltrow delivers one of - if not the
- best performances so far in her career. She has always had enough talent to
make a difficult part work, and should have made a performance like this a
long time ago (her roles in A Perfect Murder, Hush, Sliding Doors and others
restricted her charisma).
With so many films nowadays that try to tell too much in too little time (or,
alternatively, films that tell too little in too much time), here is one that
never oversteps the mark.  There are so many paths the film could have taken,
but Madden focuses almost entirely on the central relationship and the first
ever production of "Romeo and Juliet." Shakespeare in Love's recipe for
success is a simple one, but not an easy one to pull off.  Its carefully
crafted screenplay interlaces drama, romance and comedy smartly and
efficiently in this charming and passionate tale.  Shakespeare in Love has a
big heart, but never loses its grasp on reality or the tragedy of forbidden
love.  Not only does it work as an upbeat period piece, but also as just about
anything you want it to be.


Title
Review for Hard Rain (1998)
It was once said that in order to truly enjoy some of todays movies or novels,
you must suspend disbelief.  However, there is a distinct separation between
opening your mind to ridiculous situations and believing a bunch of flat lies.
It came as no surprise to me to learn that Huntingburg, Indiana (where the film
is set), does not have a McDonald's, a Sears store, a statue of a man on a
horse, nor even a dam close by.
Even if you can ignore these somewhat white lies (even though the dam is
crucial to Hard Rains plot); there is still a bunch of things that just dont
gel.  Firstly, Morgan Freeman, possibly the greatest actor alive (after such
films as Driving Miss Daisy, The Shawshank Redemption and Se7en), was cast as a
shifty goon intent on stealing enough money for a healthy retirement.  He
_should_ have played the town sheriff, an experienced and somewhat intriguing
policeman.
As a massive flood started by a dam accident overwhelms Huntingburg, its
residents presumably flee as the water level steadily increases.  I say
presumably simply because we never know what happened to them; and it seems a
tad strange that an entire town (with the exception of some folk who get
introduced along the way) can vanish before the flood has actually started.  But
nether the less, armored guard couriers Tom (Christian Slater) and his Uncle are
carrying three million dollars in the back of their van.  With a heavy rainstorm
causing depressing conditions and slippery roads, it doesnt take long for the
van to end up stuck amongst mud and water off the side of the road.
Jim (Morgan Freeman) and a small gang of thieves locate the van and attempt to
steal the three million dollars.  But of course Tom is more than willing to save
the day, so he takes the money and hides it elsewhere in town.
The local sheriff (Randy Quaid, whom most will remember as the drunken pilot in
ID4) and a couple of police men investigate the situation, but their morals are
soon overpowered by greediness as each character contemplates what he/she would
do with their share of the three million dollars.
Director Mikael Salomon has made sure that Hard Rain ends up turning everything
topsy-turvy, and whilst the film may at first appear to be a definite goodies
versus baddies, there are numerous twists in its plot that make this a
slightly more enjoyable experience.  But by the time these interesting changes
occur, its far too late in the film for them to have much affect.  Hard Rains
continuos corniness and lack of originality washes out whatever hope the script
may have had; and although its cast is somewhat appealing most of its stars act
well below par.
Not at one stage capturing what could have been a fabulous on screen battle
between Slater and Freeman, we are left to reminisce on films that dared to do
something different and achieved more than what was expected.  Such titles as
Broken Arrow (Slater and John Travolta) and Face/Off (Nicholas Cage and John
Travolta) come to mind as films that have mastered silver screen confrontations.
Strangely enough, they were both directed by John Woo and both star John
Travolta.
We can forgive Morgan Freeman for giving a slightly disappointing performance
since he is newish to the action genre, but Christian Slater could have achieved
so much more had the amount of crummy one liners been reduced and some
personality added to his character.  If you had asked me whether Slater could
perform well enough to substantially boost a movie prior to the release of
Broken Arrow, my answer would have been a definite no.  I now know that he has
no excuse, and _can_ do better (if you dont believe me rent a copy of Broken
Arrow from your local video store).
Although Hard Rain never really works from the start, I somehow felt feelings of
missed opportunity when the credits filled the screen.  The addition of an
enticing sub-plot would have given the film time to breathe, rather than try to
cram 96 minutes of action and disaster into a story that cant handle anything
else.  Despite the fact that Hard Rain fails on almost every account, if your
standards are low enough you may find this to be a mildly enjoyable film.
No creative flair and no inventive scenes means that Hard Rain does not stand up
well against its many competitors, but it doesnt really matter since the last
thing you would want to do after shelling about $8.50 is compare this to other
films.


Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
THE MATRIX
Cast: Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburne, Carrie-Anne Moss, Joe
Pantoliano, Hugo Weaving, Julian Arahanga
Directors: Andy Wachowski, Larry Wachowski
Screenplay: Andy Wachowski, Larry Wachowski
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
The first immediately impressive aspect of The Matrix is its spectacular
visual style, the second its fascinating story line.  Directors/writers
Larry and Andy Wachowski have made a dark and often chilling Sci Fi
piece; one that sucks its audience into an incredible futuristic world
and never relents until the final credits roll.  Kudos to the
Wachowski's for providing enough intrigue to disguise some of the film's
weaker moments; intrigue that is created not just from clever scripting
but also from testosterone charged performances.  Keanu Reeves and
Australian Hugo Weaving are exhilarating opponents who face off towards
the end in a few breathtaking action sequences.   Like in 1998's Dark
City, there are significant holes in the plot, but none that can't be
overshadowed by the nightmarish atmosphere that is evoked.  In fact, The
Matrix often feels like a bad dream sweetened by amusing (although
derivative) subplots.
Posters, theatrical trailers and even the film's web site pose the same
question: what is The Matrix?  Well, that would be telling.  Since much
of the interest in this film comes from not knowing what it is about for
a lengthy period, it would be unfair to reveal the diagnostics.  Thomas
Anderson (Keanu Reeves) - a computer hacker known as "Neo" - is told
that he is "the one;" a man who will free the human race from the
clutches of The Matrix.  Anderson joins rebel-warriors Morpheus
(Laurence Fishburne) and Trinity (Carrie Ann Moss) in a journey across
time and reality, all the while battling a group known as "the agents,"
led by Agent Smith (Hugo Weaving).
If that synopsis sounds a little silly, rest assured that the basic
story line makes a reasonable amount of sense.  Bit by bit, we are
eventually told what is wrong with the seemingly ordinary world our
characters are based in, and yes - what The Matrix is.  At more than one
stage I was reminded of "The Force" - The Matrix is also a power that
can be manipulated to the hero's advantage.  Anderson undergoes
Skywalker-esque training, and these scenes provide great bits of martial
arts action and daring stunts including roof-to-roof leaps.  Morpheus is
our Yoda, and he has the right amount of wisdom and courage thanks to
Laurence Fishburne's enigmatic presence.
Filmed and edited entirely in Sydney, The Matrix will help put Australia
on the map as one of the best places in the world to make movies.  It is
rare for special effects to aid story as much as they do here, and it is
equally rare for a Sci Fi blockbuster to build as much premise and
intrigue as this one.  The Matrix is not only a crowd-pleasing success -
it is a fascinating look at reality and how it is perceived.  No doubt
this film, like The Truman Show, will make us look at our world in a
suspicious new light.


Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
Cast: Gregory Smith, Kirsten Dunst, Kevin Dunn, Phil Hartman, Denis
Leary, Ann Magnuson, Wendy Schaal, Jay Mohr, David Cross, voice of Tommy
Lee Jones, voice of Frank Langella
Director: Joe Dante
Screenplay: Ted Elliott, Zak Penn, Adam Rifkin, Terry Rossio, Gavin
Scott
Get ready, get set, go: it's the Commander Elites versus the Gargonites.
The Elites, a group of allegiant US soldiers and the Gargonites, a
collection of mutated monsters from another planet. But this ain't no
battle in space or the future - it's Winslow Corners, Ohio, and the
troops are no more than ten inches tall.  They're toys, you see, and
their elaborate minds kick into high gear to create a bad-ass Toy Story
on steroids.  With all reasonable credibility stacked against it, Joe
Dante (of Gremlins fame) makes it work.  And never since we saw Buzz
Lightyear and Woody on the screen have action figures actually generated
some sort of emotion, mar the fact that all the Elite bastards want to
do is destroy every and anything allied with the Gargonites.
If it all sounds a little childish, a little predictable and a lot
unrealistic, rest assured - it is.  But heck, it's all about fun, and it
comes in bucket loads when you watch the manufactured toys slug it out.
Although it as first seems that Dante is unsure of whom he wants us to
barrack for, the "there will be no mercy" Elites become poised as a
splendid group of baddies, who think that they're the heroes of the
story.
Two bumbling employees of Globe Tech, presumably some sort of high tech
and omnipotent organization, design a new set of toys to impress the
boss.  In order for the toys to think and react by themselves, state of
the art military chips are inserted into them.  The Commando Elites are
programmed to destroy the enemy at any price, and the Gargonites to hide
and search for their home planet Gargon.  Thus a memorable bunch of
misfits are created but with no specific originality - the cliché
characters are well and truly evident, especially in the hard-hitting
leader of the Elite's (voice of Tommy Lee Jones) and the set of bumbling
(but lovable) Gorganites.
I guess it goes without saying that the team from Industrial Light &
Magic have once again created some splendid animation eye candy; the
toys don't move like cartoon characters, they move like toys.  Their
voices are played by a wide range of quirky counterparts: Jones, Frank
Langella, Christopher Guest, Harry Shearer, Sarah Michelle Gellar, and
Christina Ricci amongst others.
The human cast, given the tough job of reacting to our little
instigators, are a fairly lifeless bunch.  The only actor who breathes
much needed energy into his character is the late Phil Hartman, in his
last screen role.  And although Hartman is at his best only when he is
the instigator (take his hilarious character in News Radio, for
example), this is certainly a worthy final performance for someone who
was one of the true funnymen on TV.
The only really discouraging aspect of Dante's unique creation is the
poorly written, poorly executed battle sequences.  The framework for
these scenes is too simplistic and repetitive, as we find our baneful
Elites doing everything possible to strike miniature amounts of terror
into the audience.  They squirm, wriggle and twist their way into vapid
scenarios, which mostly involve a large catapulting device or a speedy
flying contraption.  Not even the addition of hundreds of aggressive
Barbie dolls manages to give the scenes more credibility. But in all
fairness, the final moments make some great viewing - who would have
thought that a showdown between two toys on top of a telephone pole
would be one of the most memorable action sequences this year?
Despite the fact that Small Soldiers might well be one of the most
grisly kids flicks in recent years, Dante seems unclear whom to market
it for, with its childlike moments of super-happy-fun and its
particularly gruesome end to the team of Elites.  But still, he does
make it work, and in an industry where action figures can be a huge
slice of the market, it's refreshing to see a film which subtly parodies
the commercialism of mainstream cinema.   Or perhaps, Dante is just
having some fun.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
REVIEW: Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Jason Flemyng, Dexter Fletcher, Nick Moran, Jason Statham, Steven
Mackintosh, Vinne Jones, Sting, Lenny McLean, Steve Sweeney, Frank
Harper
Director: Guy Ritchie
Screenplay: Guy Ritchie
Australian theatrical release date: November 12, 1998
With Lock Stock and Two Smoking Barrels, British writer/director Guy
Ritchie has given an original twist to what is probably this decades
most popular style of filmmaking.  You know the sort - blazing guns held
by people who mutter ordinary, day to day dialogue, and are corrupt and
shady characters brought to life more by their actions rather than their
words.  If Pulp Fiction wasn't smart enough for you, or Elmore Leonard
films (Jackie Brown, Out of Sight) appear too relaxed, this film will
appeal.  It tightly interlaces all plot elements smartly and
efficiently, whilst gushing out bittersweet black humor.
Almost immediately, Ritchie introduces a spectrum of villainous and
ultra stylish characters.  First is Eddy (Nick Moran), a scheming
charmer with a talent for cards.  He and three of his mates chip in
25,000 pounds each for Eddy to compete in a card game ran by the
notorious porn king, Hatchet Harry (P.H. Moriarty), in the hope that
their investment will pay dividends.  It doesn't.  Eddy and his gang -
which consists of Bacon (Jason Statham), Tom (Jason Flemyng) and Soap
(Dexter Fletcher) - end up not only losing their money but are left
owing half a million pounds.
Harry, with the aid of Barry the Baptist (Lenny McLean) and leather
jacketed debt collector Big Chris (Vinnie Jones), give them one week to
cough up the dough before they start losing their fingers.
Alternatively, Eddy's Dad JD (Sting) can cancel the debt by handing over
his bar - lock, stock and barrel - to Harry, an old adversary.
Without giving much away, let me just say that Eddy's plan to cover his
debt involves a factory full of weed, a dangerous drugs dealer with a
proud afro cut and two valuable antique shotguns.
What eventuates from all this fun and confusion is very, very clever.
Ritchie's screenplay introduces every character and every scenario for a
specific reason, which only becomes evident at the very end.  At no
point does he ever slow the pace; everything moves wickedly fast.
Ritchie's previous work as a director of music promos for bands and
commercials comes through vibrantly in this, his first feature film.  In
fact, many scenes look so stylish and are so carefully constructed that
it's easy to imagine that Ritchie has not drastically changed his
filming techniques.  Lock Stock and Two Smoking Barrels often feels like
a lengthy music video; the music in this case being the chemistry
between its wide breadth of characters.
Although of the same genre, when compared to Tarantino's Pulp Fiction or
Reservoir Dogs, the similarities to LS & TSB are somewhat limited.  For
starters, Ritchie replaces the well-known Tarantino style of dialogue
with something much snappier, but less relaxed.  The narrative rockets
from point a to point b, whereas many American filmmakers seem to love
confusing audiences until every piece of their story is eventually put
together.  Finally, the tension never breaks.  Ritchie doesn't stop to
carefully examine his characters, or to introduce any hint of a romance,
or even to take a breath and let the film's surroundings soak in.
That's the best and worst thing about LS & TSB: whilst it is great to
have a constantly high level of entertainment, I would have liked some
more character development.  I would have liked to understand and
sympathize with these immoral protagonists, if only to understand them
enough so I could laugh at them more.
Guy Ritchie deserves to be highly credited for a startling debut feature
film.  It's nice to know that some directors are bent on giving original
twists to genres, even if Ritchie's genre is already a new twist off the
Hollywood product line.  An original film, from one of this decade's
most original - and popular - genres.  It's tight, tense, funand that's
that - lock, stock, barrel.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
REVIEW: The Opposite of Sex
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Australian theatrical release date: August 13, 1998
Somewhere in the backbone of the American film industry lies some deep,
dark and cynical social studies of sensitive and standoffish themes.
The fact that the independent production In the Company of Men has
probably been the only one of these nitty-gritty films in the last year
proves that these atypical themes are definitely not typical material to
encounter.  Although any Hollywood hack can conjurer up offensive and/or
execrating films (see Dumb and Dumber and the upcoming There's Something
About Mary, if you don't believe me), there's something special that
separates antagonistic flair from goofball comedy.  Damn Neil LaBute
(director of In the Company of Men) for doing it so well, and damn Don
Ross for failing to achieve true cinematic quality in The Opposite of
Sex.
16 year old Dedee Truitt (Christina Ricci) warns us early on in the
film: "I don't have a heart of gold, and I don't grow one later on."
After the death of her stepfather she runs away from her troubled life
in Louisiana, and visits her gay half-brother Bill (Martin Donovan).
Whilst there she seduces his boyfriend Matt (Ivan Sergei) and proclaims
that she is pregnant, and that Matt is the father.  When the two flee
the city, the film gets some breathing space to develop a few other
characters.  We find Bill to be a wise and considerate man, as well as
being introduced to his bratty best friend Lucia (Lisa Kudrow), the town
sheriff (Lyle Lovett) and one of Matt's previous lovers (Johnny
Galecki).  It's a pity that none of them, except Ricci's exuberant
Dedee, are particularly interesting.
One of the most striking elements of Don Ross' directing style in this
film is its narration.  Last years Gattaca was ample proof of how
effective narration from a main character can be, often adding multiple
dimensions to a film.  But it can also be a slack way of putting the
pieces together - it's much more difficult to visually depict key scenes
than it is to simply describe them, and I couldn't help but feel that
Ross had taken the easy way out on numerous occasions.
However, one great thing about The Opposite of Sex is the uneasy
relationship that develops between the viewer and the character of
Dedee.  We don't really care for her because she is so nasty, but at the
same time we want nothing bad to happen to her, as she is so valuable to
the film.
Don't ask me how Christina Ricci went from The Addams Family and Casper
to The Ice Storm and The Opposite of Sex, but she has transformed
herself into a robust young actress with remarkable talent and ability.
Ricci is terrific in her role, and would certainly contend as one of the
best female leads so far this year had she been given more screen time.
Ivan Sergei has also come along way since his rather dismal performance
in John Woo's Once a Thief, but he is a often unconvincing at times.
Lisa Kudrow is the first out of the Friends bunch to prove that she can
act well, but Ross seems uncertain as to whether her character is a
comedy relief or a dramatic influence.
As a nitty-gritty "we offend you and we're proud of it" film, The
Opposite of Sex succeeds only mildly well.  It's not as controversial or
vitalizing as it intends to be, as many scenes are comprised of sloppy
film making rather than a competent portrayal of important social
themes.  It may not be typical material to encounter and it may be
produced from the shadows of an alive industry, but this film fails to
give the kind of adequate emotional feel and kooky black comedy that its
material desperately deserves.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Maria Pitillo, Kevin
Dunn, Michael Lerner, Harry Shearer, Arabella Field
Director: Roland Emmerich
Australian release date: June 11, 1998
For those of you who thought that the Titanic had appeared a little too
many times on film, get this: there have been over twenty motion
pictures featuring Godzilla in some way or another. These include the
big lizard appearing with "the giant moth," King Kong, "Space Godzilla,"
the "Bionic Monster," and (would you believe) Bambi.
The 90's equivalent from this massive Japanese market, which put the
country on the map for international films, is a remake of the 1954 hit
Gojira (or as we know it, Godzilla: King of the Monsters).  Not
unpredictably, it's what we've come to expect from mainstream remakes:
state of the art special effects, and cinematography that leaves the
original for dead.  But whereas the original film was a revelation for
its time - pushing the realms of classic cinema to produce something
that no one had seen before - the new version looks strangely recycled,
bringing more than just elements of Jurassic Park and The Lost World
back to the big screen.
For reasons none too clear to me, a giant lizard somehow emerges from
French Polynesia to destroy a large Japanese fishing vessel.  It goes on
to create havoc on other fishermen until it finds its way to land - the
city that never sleeps.  Whilst this is occurring we are hastily
introduced to Dr. Niko "the worm guy" Tatopoulos (Mathew Broderick), and
a team of
lets-not-kill-it-too-soon-because-that-wouldn't-make-a-good-movie
experts.
They have a little trouble - well, maybe more than a little - destroying
the beast that is turning New York into rubble.  From setting traps to
searching the subways, Godzilla is not an easy fella (or sheila, in all
fairness) to bring down.  One soldier wisely points out that they "need
bigger guns."
Having an estimated budget of US one hundred and sixty million dollars,
the film is a spectacle to watch. Cinematographer Ueli Steiger captures
the urban streets of New York quite well, and it rains for most its
duration because, darn it, it just looks more exciting that way.  But
that's it for Godzilla - just looks - there is no depth, no point and no
emotion attached to this cold serving of banged up lizard.
Saving Godzilla from total failure are the moments with Jean Reno (whom
you may remember as "Krieger" from Mission: Impossible) playing a French
secret service agent; with motives that are not clearly defined yet
intriguing none the less.  He orchestrates some well-timed send-ups of
the "American way of life" with hilarious results; he's a strong actor
who gives an equally strong performance.  In fact, it's interesting to
note that most of the laughs come from Reno, surprisingly leaving Harry
Shearer (famous for his many voices in "The Simpsons") looking bland and
predictable as a conniving journalist.
I found this disappointing, because Shearer is such a naturally funny
man who, when given the chance, might just be able to work as well as
some of his more famous characters, like Monty Burns and Ned Flanders
(both hilarious and legendary in their own deranged way).
Roland Emmerich's (the film's director) other recent blockbuster
(remember a little film named Independence Day?) and now this indicates
a belief that the public want large budgeted, special effects bonanza
motion pictures.  Whilst he may be right to some extent (as these two
films have scored massively in the box office), can't Emmerich ever
consider that perhaps people also want intelligently written, appealing
scripts?  Probably not, since many Godzilla posters have the words "Size
Does Matter" printed in big bold letters.  But forget that - its plot
that really Does Matter.
If you simply must see Godzilla to get a whiff of possibly one of this
year's biggest films, watch out for the thrilling helicopter chase
scenes and the final confrontation on top of the Brooklyn Bridge.  But
if you take my advice - and I highly suggest you do - wait till Godzilla
is released on video, so you can fast forward through all of the failed
sub plots and the unnecessarily large chunk of the film devoted to a
ridiculous scenario in Madison Square Garden.  Even this holidays' other
Sci Fi disappointment, Deep Impact, will prove to be vaguely more
satisfying.
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback

"How ironic - my crusade against television has come to an end so
formulaic it could have spewed from the power book of the laziest
Hollywood hack."  --Sideshow Bob
Subscribe to my movie reviews mailing list!  Simply reply to this email
with the subject as "Subscribe:newsletter"

Title
Review for Little Voice (1998)
LITTLE VOICE
Cast: Brenda Blethyn, Jane Horrocks, Michael Caine, Jim Broadbent, Ewan
McGregor, Annette Badland, Philip Jackson
Director: Mark Herman
Screenplay: Mark Herman based on the play "The Rise and Fall of Little
Voice" by Jim Cartwright
Running time: 96 minutes
Australian theatrical release: January 14, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and a half stars
If taken in its most simplistic form, Little Voice examines the life
surrounding an incredible singer who wishes to keep her talents to
herself, with diversions along the way.  But if you can swallow what
director Mark Herman (Brassed Off) squashes into the package, Little
Voice suddenly becomes much more. No longer is it just about a woman
with a unique gift; it is about an innocent soul surrounded by a world
full of greed and selfishness.  In the last half of the film Herman
changes its tone into something much darker, and Little Voice advances
from passable entertainment to wild and uncouth insights into characters
and life.
Mark Herman adapted the screenplay of Little Voice from Jim Cartwright's
play, and that shows because the film is melodramatic and relies heavily
on strong performances.  Fortunately, the three or four key characters
have talented actors bringing them to life.   Michael Caine is the best
of the lot, delivering a show stopping performance in a difficult part.
In the hardest and most important role, Jane Horrocks proves she is
better as a singer/impersonator than she is as an actor, but is good
enough to handle the pressure when so many others would have bombed out.
A couple of other fine performances from Brenda Blethyn and Ewan
McGregor make Little Voice a good example of a simplistic story given
meaning by its performances.  In comparison to the many other
screenplays that are smarter, more meaningful and more accessible,
Little Voice probably shouldn't have been the very good film that it is.
LV (Jana Horrocks) is a shy and reserved woman with a troubled past.
After the death of her much loved father LV has lived with her loud,
vulgar mother Mari Hoff (Brenda Blethyn).  LV finds a sanctuary from the
crazy world around her in a collection of old records, featuring Billie
Holiday, Shirley Bassey, Judy Garland, Marilyn Monroe, Marlena Dietrich,
and others.  She has an extraordinary talent for impersonating these
artists, and when Mari's sex partner Ray Say (Michael Caine) hears her
singing, he sees dollar signs.  But much to Say's horror, LV does not
want to become the star he wishes her to be.
It is always a hard task to portray socially inept characters without
allowing them to appear as freaks. The fundamental attraction of 1997's
As Good as it Gets was Jack Nicholson's portrayal of one of societie's
oddballs, but the attraction to Little Voice lies in its supporting
characters. Brenda Blethyn gives an appropriately over the top
performance which carries more weight than you might at first presume.
She is imperative to the story, serving as a contrast to LV's timid
personality.  But the true appeal of Little Voice is Michael Caine, who
caught my eye as an expert performer ever since he purposely made The
World's Great Detective look like The World's Greatest Idiot in 1988's
Without a Clue.  Caine is a definite scene-stealer, and is fortunate
enough to star in the best moment of Little Voice - a fiery and moving
scene in which he recites Roy Orbison's "It's Over."
With so much retrospective appeal, it's surprising that Mark Herman
rarely creates scenes of straight entertainment.  Instead he pretty much
goes nowhere for the first half of Little Voice, prolonging the dramatic
scenes until he decides which characters should voice them.  The most
moving and emotional performance should have been Jana Horrocks', but
the film's supporting cast overshadows her with roles that generate more
entertainment and interest.
As Little Voice begins to wind up, Herman satisfies his audience by
providing enough reason for sitting through his peculiar creation.
Although it takes a while to get there, Little Voice eventually
reassures us that the strongest people are not always the loudest, and
that when one manages to finds happiness there are many others who get
lost along the way.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or for any inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Die xue shuang xiong (1989)
Cast: Yun-Fat Chow (known in Hollywood as Chow Yun-Fat), Jeffery Chow,
Danny Lee, Sally Yeh, Chu Kong, Kenneth Tsang
Director: John Woo
Screenplay: John Woo
-- available in the cult/nostalgia section of your local video store --
After viewing The Killer, it's hard to think about anything else.  John
Woo, now one of the worlds most revered action directors, reaches the
audience on so many different levels that it's easy to be overwhelmed in
the process.  He wrote and directed the film with the precision and
craftsmanship of a true mastermind, and uses a remarkable way of
filmmaking to convey his story and stimulate the senses.  It's an action
film, really, but it's not centered around the action scenes themselves.
It has a romantic subplot, without being about a love-struck romance.
It gives lessons on revenge, without making clear whether vengeance is
right or wrong.  Finally, and most impressively, it tells a story of
humanity - of honoring friends in the worst of all scenarios - and
generates pure-bred emotion amongst blazing guns and dripping blood.
The Killer is similar in story to Woo's 1997 masterpiece Face/Off.
Certainly the same amount of dynamic chemistry between the two main
protagonists is evident, perhaps even a little more so.  Jeffery (Chow
Yun-Fat) is a slick professional killer who, during a mission,
accidentally partially blinds a young woman singer, Jennie (Sally Yeh).
Six months later, Jennie is almost totally blind, and needs an expensive
operation to correct her eyesight.  Jeffery takes on a last job for $1.5
million, planning to retire from his hard-hearted profession after the
mission is completed.
Meanwhile, ace cop Inspector Li (Danny Lee) learns about Jeff's expert
ways and tracks him down - his only connection being the obvious Jennie.
The assured showdowns between these two characters results in a unlikely
friendship; at one of the many unprecedented moments, they dub each
other as "Mickey Mouse" and "Dumbo."
The Killer oozes class and imperative timing, as Woo brings traditional
action scenes onto the screen with an originality and flair that few
directors can match.  Brilliant scene maker Brian De Palma pieces
together action scenes with the smart sort of skills; both giving a
striking visual sincerity to their material.  De Palma's best moments
include the infamous train station stairs scene in The Untouchables, and
the intense minutes of Tom Cruise descending into a high security room
in Mission: Impossible.  Woo completed The Killer before his entrance
into Hollywood, and The Killer's thrilling climax in a church ties with
John Travolta and Nicholas Cage's "mirror" showdown in Face/Off as some
of the best this director has to offer.  The difference between Woo and
De Palma, though, is that Woo generally maintains the level of quality
all throughout; consequently making terrific films, not just terrific
scenes.
Most people will be pleased to know that the film - which was originally
in Chinese (it's real name being Die xue shuang xiong) - does not have
subtitles, but rather has been dubbed into less than convincing English.
Disappointingly, much of the dialogue is ridiculously simplistic, and it
seems a little silly that all characters are speaking with healthy
American accents in Hong Kong (whilst listening to Chinese music, I
might add).  This is the most obvious flaw in the film, and will
frustrate viewers who want rich, illustrious dialogue to suit the rich,
illustrious film.  Still, it must be said that no-one goes to see a John
Woo film for the dialogue (although Face/Off's dialogue plays a large
part of what makes it so great to watch).
Chow Yun-Fat, who made his Hollywood debut in 1997 with The Replacement
Killers, is on cue every time in the film's most likeable part.
However, someone's character seems a little too inexperienced and
erratic to be completely convincible as an ace cop.  But somehow the
chemistry between these two works beautifully - emotionally and
physically.
>From the mind of a truly dynamic director comes this wonderfully thought
out and executed film.  Woo has made sure that The Killer is as
attractive emotionally as it is visually; combining all elements of what
makes a great film great.  But more than that, he invents scenarios that
reassure viewers of what a true cinematic experience should be like.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Soldier's Daughter Never Cries, A (1998)
A SOLDIER'S DAUGHTER NEVER CRIES
Cast: Kris Kristofferson, Barbara Hershey, Leelee Sobieski, Jesse
Bradford, Anthony Ruth Costanzo, Dominique Blanc, Virginie Ledoyen,
Samuel Gruen, Luisa Conlon
Director: James Ivory
Screenplay: James Ivory, Ruth Prawer Jhabvala based on the novel by
Kaylie Jones
Running time: 124 minutes
Australian theatrical release: January 28, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
Coming of age films - or films that develop their characters over
decades of their lives - all face a similar problem.  Obviously, it is
impossible to fit all of life's experiences in the span of two hours, so
the most that a writer can do is carefully choose scenes that examine
their characters best.  The aggravating thing about A Soldier's Daughter
Never Cries is that it presents a trade off that isn't very fair: in
order to watch its characters undergo their life defining experiences,
you also have to sit through the uninteresting and dreary moments which
shape their existence.  No one can accuse director James Ivory of being
unrealistic; instead, we can accuse him of being inefficient.
The film revolves around an American family living in Paris during the
60's and 70's.  Father Bill Willis (Kris Kristofferson) is a successful
writer and a World War II veteran, and Mother Marcella (Barbara Hershey)
is a flamboyant heavy drinker.  They have two children - daughter Channe
(played by Luisa Conlon as a child and Deep Impact's Leelee Sobieski as
a teenager) and adopted son Billy (Samuel Gruen then Jesse Bradford).
The Willis family have a strong love and appreciation for each other;
the two kids especially having an obvious respect for their wise and
gentle father.
Each of the Willis' experience their own set of hardships.  Mum and Dad
worry that Billy will be taken away from them, Channe struggles to be
accepted in her various high schools, and Billy becomes a social
outcast.
The synopsis above does not indicate a one way storyboard, and
rightfully so.  A Soldiers Daughter Never Cries is multi-layered
conventional drama, hiding the fact that it doesn't have much of a plot.
Instead, it is primarily a collection of dramatic scenes that attempt to
illustrate each of the characters' emotional breadth.  Ivory pulls this
off with only reasonable success. Some of the film's best moments are
when Channe becomes best friends with a boy named Francis (Anthony Ruth
Costanzo) who, by textbook definition, will grow up to be gay.  "You're
weird, you act like a girl," she tells him.  Francis retorts by
explaining that he acts like nobody but himself.  But he is only one of
the supporting characters who abruptly disappear from the screen.  Ivory
tries so hard to focus on the Willis family that none of his other
characters have the chance to make a lasting impression.  He succeeds in
giving the film a heart, but in the process forgets to give it a brain.
Leelee Sobieski is able to grasp much of what her role requires.  She
plays Channe with a calm and controlled presence, but gives a gutsy (and
risky) performance. Most of the faults in her portrayal can be narrowed
down to the screenplay, which never accurately represents the hardships
of puberty.  It also never makes that much sense, as I was left
pondering why we witness Channe having her period in class and wearing
her first bra, when the loss of her virginity is only given a mention in
one conversation.  The rest of the cast are uniformly strong (especially
the younger two actors, Luisa Conlon and Samuel Gruen), although each of
their characters lack flair.
For those with patience and do not mind a flat ending, A Soldier's
Daughter Never Cries may provide some pleasant viewing.  Like many
others like it, the film is paced very slowly and its tone and style
remain consistent.  But given his material, James Ivory should have bent
over backwards to ensure that his film was never boring.  He gives A
Soldiers Daughter Never Cries a heart, but not much else.  This is one
trade-off that just doesn't seem fair.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or for any inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
Cast: Tom Hanks, Meg Ryan, Greg Kinnear, David Chappelle, Dabney
Coleman, Parker Posey, Jean Stapleton, Steve Zahn
Director: Nora Ephron
Screenplay: Nora Ephron & Delia Ephron
Australian theatrical release: December 26, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
At this point in time, no director has been able to make standard
computer screens look interesting in a movie.   I'm not talking about
spooky virtual reality (Disclosure) or warped cyber space (Hackers); I
mean actual, I-got-it-at-Dick-Smith screens.  You may remember when
Whoopi Goldberg energetically conversed on an ancient computer in
Jumping Jack Flash, or when Tom Cruise battered away on a laptop for a
brief period in Mission: Impossible.  There is just nothing interesting
about watching somebody read text off a screen, just so they can say it
out loud to save the audience from reading it themselves.
What is interesting is the prospect of finding love on the Internet.
There is a number of intriguing ideas which could have been developed in
You've Got Mail - having a chat room as a metaphor of society, examining
the net as a means to escape modern life, or how the online world is
just as vulnerable as the real world.  But director Nora Ephron's
(Sleepless in Seattle) only intention is to keep the film smaltzy and
simplistic.  She avoids any opportunity to study the medium in which the
film's protagonists use to communicate; instead, she studies the
protagonists themselves.  Ordinarily that would be fine, but Tom Hank's
character is boring, ditto for Meg Ryan's.
Two Internet geeks converse over email and chat rooms, and eventually
discover that they are in love with each other.  But these are not geeks
who wear thick rimmed glasses and are twenty pounds overweight - they
are in the cute form of Joe Fox (Hanks) and Kathleen Kelly (Ryan).  Fox
owns Manhattan's largest book chain, and when he opens a new superstore
it threatens to destroy Kelly's small bookstore "The Shop Around the
Corner."  In "real life," these two are sworn enemies, but over the
Internet - unaware of who they are conversing with - they share intimate
details of their lives.
So what we have is a film with uninteresting central characters, no
opportunities to explore their obsessive usage of email, and a film as
meaningful as a Pamela Anderson home movie.  If not for a few strong
(but repressed) performances and some occasional touching moments,
You've Got Mail could have easily infected the holiday season with the
Very Bad Filmmaking virus.  Although, it must be said that some viewers
will have no problem enjoying the central romance (judging from the
squealing girls sitting in front of me, I'd say it would be most enjoyed
by females aged 12-18), and for most, You've Got Mail will be hard to
hate.  For me, it was hard to like.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
CRUEL INTENTIONS
Cast: Sarah Michelle Gellar, Ryan Phillippe, Reese Witherspoon, Selma
Blair, Christine Baranski, Joshua Jackson
Director: Roger Kumble
Screenplay: Roger Kumble, suggested by "Les Liaisons Dangereuses" by
Choderlos de Laclos
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
Sebastian (Ryan Phillippe) and Kathryn (Sarah Michelle Gellar) are two
manipulating upper class Manhattan teenagers, who agree to partake in a
wager of sexual contest.  Kathryn challenges Sebastian - who is known
for his sexual sleaziness - to seduce a pristine student named Annette
(Reese Witherspoon), who is incidentally a headmaster's daughter.  If
Sebastian loses, he has to hand over his 1956 Jaguar to Kathryn.  If he
wins, he gets to do Kathryn in the position of his choice.  But
Sebastian begins to fall in love with the gentle spirited Annette,
whilst Kathryn immerses herself in cocaine and meaningless
relationships.
Cruel Intentions has so many plot twists and turns that it is easy to
feel as manipulated as the film's characters, but for few of the right
reasons.  Although this film has a distinctly 90's touch - with
homosexuals, lesbian references, drug use, you name it - it rarely feels
fresh or original.  The central romance between Sebastian and Annette is
uninspired, with not even one scene portraying their emotions in an
insightful or mature manner.
The script has its ups and downs; the film's first half is considerably
better than its second, or at least a little more intriguing.  The
acting here does not contribute much to the production.  Sarah Michelle
Gellar quickly becomes little more than a passing joke - whilst there is
nothing particularly wrong with her performance, her dialogue is
ridiculously egotistical and cold.  Reese Witherspoon, however, gives a
sensuous and exciting presence.
Cruel Intentions is directed and edited with precision, and shifts
through its various subplots seamlessly.  The filmmakers have produced a
sharp and shifty piece, but one that fails to entice audiences or bring
them into the picture.  It has a lot of bickering, biting and
slandering, but little intrigue.   Furthermore, squeezing in a happy
ending is not just a bad choice - given the subject matter, it's also
painfully ironic.


Title
Review for Sound of One Hand Clapping, The (1998)
REVIEW: The Sound of One Hand Clapping (1998)
Note to readers outside Australia:  The Sound of One Hand Clapping is an
Australian film shot in Tasmania, and has been selected for the 1998 Berlin film
festival.  As far as I know, it has not yet been slated for a US release date.
>From the haunting book comes the haunting film  The Sound of One Hand Clapping
is by no ones standards an easy film to watch or enjoy.  I havent read the
book myself, but since the writer (Richard Flanagan) is also the films
director, its a fairly safe bet that what is on the screen is in close context
with what Flanagan has written.
36 year old Sonja Buloh hasnt had an easy path down the road of life  her
mother abandoned her at the age of two, had various physical and emotional
troubles through childhood and was driven to move away from her alcoholic father
Bojan when she was sixteen. Now, twenty years later (and pregnant), Sonya visits
him in Tasmania after all those years of absence.  She discovers Bojan is
distraught and aggrieved, drained of all emotion and resorting to a life of
booze and cigarettes.
As Sonja begins to piece together hidden parts of her childhood, and the dark
secrets of her families past, we begin to realize the severity of the pain has
been subjected to.  Through a draining collection of fragments from her own
experiences, a detailed portrait of Sonjas suffering is powerfully painted.
The Sound of One Hand Clapping is a prime example of how one character can be
carved into tragically different, isolated others.  There are three main
versions of Sonja Suloh  the three-year-old (Arabella Wain), eight year old
(Rosie Flanagan) and the present day Sonja (Kerry Fox).  Through frequent
flashbacks the film jumps to different times in her life, and what is impressive
about this is that we are able to accurately feel the sadness and joy from most
of her previous experiences.   What is not impressive is that these versions of
Sonja are separated far too much, so her character can never truly entrance us
or keep us eagerly watching.
There are a few other things that irritated me about the film: the dialogue is
bewildering and a little sluggish, _ is at times very unconvincing in her role
and the Scooby Doo Family Mystery isnt all that entertaining.
What The Sound of One Hand Clapping does deliver, however, is consistent to the
style it sets early in the film  so if youre lucky, you can be impressed from
start to finish.  But on the other hand, you could hate it all too.
Either way, compliments have to be made: Kristof Kaczmarek brings an energetic
and sensual presence to his role, Australian cinematographer Martin McGrath (A
Little Bit of Soul, Muriels Wedding) successfully captures the beauty of the
Tasmanian landscape and Cezary Skubiszewskis resplendent music composition is
notably enjoyable.
If youre prepared to be exhausted and depressed by an overworked yet still
impressive flick, The Sound of One Hand Clapping may hit the right note.


Title
Review for Scream (1996)
>From the spine-chilling director Wes Craven, who's made himself known as one of 
most prominent figures in the genre after the well known Nightmare on Elm 
Street series and various other films, comes the best horror movie so far in 
the 90's.
If you don't agree with that statement, you'll be more likely to agree with 
this one: the reason why this super popular teen flick has been so successful 
is not because it features completely original scenes or avoids common horror 
film cliches.  Victims still run up the stairs instead of out the door, 
murderers still miraculously get inside rooms unnoticed and police seem to do 
everything but solve the crime.  No - the difference between Scream and other 
horror films is the fact that it knows that cliches are being used and parodies 
itself by regularly announcing the "rules" of a successful horror film.
Party of Five's Neve Campbell stars as Sidney who, one year before the film is 
set, lived through the trauma of having her mothered violently killed in their 
local small town.  News spreads thick and fast across the state and country, 
and in no time this murder mystery becomes the number one story in newspapers 
and TVs.
A year later, a killer is again on the loose.  The same town, the same media 
hype and a similar target - it seems that to be hunted by a homicidal freak 
runs in the family.  So as the number of murders rapidly increase and the list 
of suspects'  covers the whole town, there is only one question that needs to 
be answered - who is the killer?
Could it be the obvious boy friend Billy (Skeet Ulrich), the horror film freak 
(Jamie Kennedy), the flamboyant student Stu (Matthew Lillard), Sidney's father 
who has mysteriously disappeared, small-town cop Dewey Riley (David Arquette) 
or even TV reporter Gale Weathers (Courtnery Cox)?  Everyone is a suspect.
And when everyone is a suspect, the viewers' eye will shift suspiciously over 
every character on the screen - but all is revealed in due time and the ending 
comprises all the elements of witty cleverness that is felt from start to end. 
 Forget the average cheapo horror flick - Scream truly is a modern masterpiece. 
The only minor grumble is when you look at the films bare bones; it only really 
consists of 3 or 4 key scenes, and because every minute is so enjoyable the 
audience is left craving for more blood to fill the screen.
Many of Scream's scenes will no doubt be remembered as classic moments - the 
phone conversations alone are more than enough to remain in knife-edged 
nightmares.  Yes - it is a scary film, but in no way is Scream a nightmare to 
watch.  It's slick formula of killing off characters one by one until the list 
of potential killers gets noticeably smaller hits exactly the right note for a 
terrifying yet very entertaining experience.


Title
Review for Mr. Jealousy (1997)
Cast: Eric Stoltz, Annabella Sciorra, Christopher Eigeman, Carlos
Jacott, Marianne Jean-Baptiste, Brian Kerwin, Peter Bogdanovich, Bridget
Fonda
Director: Noah Baumbach
Screenplay: Noah Baumbach
Australian theatrical release date: December 3, 1998 (Adelaide and
Brisbane later)
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 2
stars
If it is feasible for a writer to develop characters of both sexes
equally - that is, understand the minds of males and females and convey
that understanding competently - it would be reasonable to say that Noah
Baumbach has achieved this feat.  In Mr. Jealousy, he displays a talent
for working on the fundamental needs of character development; that is,
giving the audience an instant relation to them.  Baumbach is not
concerned with whether his characters are male or female, good looking
or not - as long as they have a mouth and two ears, they are good
enough.  If he had chosen a vehicle that could have showcased these
qualities with more pizzazz, more depth and more confrontation, he may
have created a film which could have competed with its characters.
That's not to say that they are a particularly fascinating bunch.  They
are realistic, however, and that's always enough on which to build.
Baumbach has a gutsy attempt at doing so, but in the end the
relationship between the two protagonists is unrewarding, and a little
tedious.  His symbolism of relationships and emotions is ludicrously
simplistic, even down to the name of the film (instead of portraying
jealousy through character development, it's right there in the title).
This is not to say that Mr. Jealousy does not have its moments - some
are daunting, others make for pleasant viewing - but neither of these
elements are substantial enough to keep it on a continuous high.
Lester (Eric Stoltz) has a big problem with dating: he gets jealous.
Very jealous.  Ever since his first girlfriend - who he later spots
making out with an older man - Lester has taken his jealousy to a level
just below obsession.  He trails previous boyfriends like a bemused
private eye, keeping the exact count on how many there have been and
what their names are.  Perhaps it's a good thing, then, when he admits
himself to a therapy group.  But of course Lester is only doing this so
he can gain a greater insight into best-selling author Dashiell Frank
(Chris Eigeman), an ex-boyfriend of Lester's current woman, the
wild-spirited Ramona Ray (Annabella Sciorra, of What Dreams May Come).
When Ramona begins to make sense of Lester's lies, whilst Lester
develops an awkward and dishonest friendship with Dashiel, everything
builds up to a sensational climax.  Mr. Jealousy works best when
Baumbach positions his characters in the weekly therapy sessions, as
their spoken words reflect on the uniqueness of their personalities.
But Baumback refuses to let viewers ever feel wholly uncomfortable, so
the potentially confronting climax is filtered into sentimentality and
uses a cheap way of expressing the tension between two characters.
After skillfully crafting dramatic scenes of therapy, all Baumbach can
do is initiate a lame-brained fistfight.
Although with respectable performances all round, an underdeveloped
screenplay hinders Baumbach's direction.  This leaves him in an awkward
predicament: Mr. Jealousy is not funny enough to be a comedy, not
dramatic enough to be a drama, and not romantic enough to be a story of
romance.  Perhaps it's a comedy/drama/romance; but the jokes weren't
particularly memorable, the drama was watered down and the romance was
not invigorating.  The film's characters, however, save it from being a
disaster.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
HILARY AND JACKIE
Cast: Emily Watson, Rachel Griffiths, James Frain, David Morrissey,
Charles Dance, Celia Imrie, Auriol Evans, Keeley Flanders
Director: Anand Tucker
Screenplay: Frank Cottrell Boyce, based on "A Genius in the Family" by
Hilary and Piers du Pré
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and a half stars
Hilary and Jackie is a moving and poignant tale of the love between two
sisters.  Emily Watson and Australian Rachel Griffiths portray Hilary
and Jacqueline du Pré with stunning precision, in two of the best female
performances you're likely to see this year.  It would be easy to say
that Watson and Griffiths are the reason why this drama works so well,
but that would be without crediting the screenplay that was adapted from
the true story "A Genius in the Family" (written by Hilary and Piers du
Pré).  The script is solidly directed by Anand Tucker, who is obviously
interested in the way music is conceived and manipulated - and,
eventually, the way music leads to one woman's dissatisfaction with
life.
Jacqueline "Jackie" du Pré (Watson) is a cellist prodigy.  As young
girls, Jackie and her sister Hilary (Griffiths) - a flutist - would win
countless junior tournaments, and there was a vaguely unhealthy
competitive spirit between them.  As adults, they have chosen very
different lifestyles: Hilary has given up the flute to a simple life of
marriage and family, whereas Jackie is a wildly successful cellist who
tours all over the world.  Jackie finds out the hard way that sometimes
the simplest values are the best, and as she continues her constant
search for happiness, she hinders the happiness of those who love her.
Jackie is a complicated character, and it is often hard to know what
leads her to commit purely selfish actions.  Feeling lonely, Jackie
tells Hilary she wants to have sex with her husband.  "She just needs to
feel loved," Hilary explains to him, with more than a hint of doubt in
her voice.  Jackie's plights through stardom and self-destruction (the
two come hand in hand, it seems) are believable thanks to Watson, who
knows how to make a dramatic part work.   Rachel Griffiths also shines -
perhaps even a little more so - in a subtler performance, which is an
impressive mix of happiness amongst gentle but profound sorrow.
For the first thirty or so minutes of Hilary and Jackie, I was
completely captivated.  The performances from young girls Auriol Evans
and Keeley Flanders are incredible - their parts demand a mature
approach that is rare with kids this age.  After the film's lengthy
prologue finishes, Hilary and Jackie is divided into two main parts, one
for each sister.   This enables the story to be told from two
perspectives, although conveying the narrative in this way doesn't
always work.  Hilary's story, although less spectacular, I found much
more interesting, so its frustrating when she is absent from the screen
during long slabs of time.  Sometimes the narrative is also
unnecessarily confusing and, call me fussy, but the film's final reel is
silly - I'm not quite sure what Tucker was trying to tell us with it.
Still, Hilary and Jackie is an involving drama.  The classical music
soars, the cinematography is lush - it is a pleasing experience.  But
more than that, this is a film that is charged by emotion and a central
relationship built on love and devotion (although that's not always
immediately evident).  Emily Watson and Rachel Griffiths play off each
other beautifully, and are gracefully, powerfully the two best reasons
to see Hilary and Jackie.

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
RUSHMORE
Cast: Jason Schwartzman, Bill Murray, Olivia Williams, Seymour Cassel,
Brian Cox, Mason Gamble, Sara Tanaka
Director: Wes Anderson
Screenplay: Wes Anderson, Owen Wilson
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
There are quirky films, and then there is Rushmore, a film that is
intent on deviating from the norm of filmmaking. The "hero" of this
story is unlike any other in recent memory. Geeky but sort of cool Max
Fischer (Jason Schwartzman, in a bold debut performance) is a wacky
protagonist, a guy with a mean attitude but a soft center.  Playing
alongside Schwartzman is Bill Murray (in one of his better roles of
recent years), who has an equally peculiar character.  Murray and
Schwartzman live out every comedian's dream: they get to act
simultaneously smart and silly, and receive a whole lot of laughs in the
process.  To further compliment the production, Wes Anderson directs
Rushmore intelligently and humorously, whilst not stripping his
intelligent moments of humor, and not making his humor particularly
intelligent.
Max is a 10th grader at Rushmore Academy, and for him, school is his
life.  He is involved in numerous extracurricular roles, ranging from
captain of the fencing and debating teams to the founder of the
Double-team Dodgeball Society.  With his thick rimmed glasses, blazer
and quick thinking mind, Max is often thought of as a kid genius.  Truth
is, he's a lousy student and is under constant threat of expulsion.  Max
falls in love with a first grade teacher named Miss Cross (Olivia
Williams), and tries to win her over by hatching various plans.  When
Latin classes are about to be replaced by Japanese, Max cleverly makes
the subject compulsory for all senior years; later, he attempts to
construct an aquarium on Rushmore's baseball field.
To help raise money, Max consults school benefactor Mr. Blume (Bill
Murray), a seedy millionaire who appears to be in the middle of a
mid-life crisis.  Blume is attracted to Max's energy and eccentric ways,
and the two become good friends.  But when Max discovers that Blume is
also in love with Miss Cross, a mean war initiates between the two (at
one stage, Blume runs over Max's bicycle, so Max removes the brakes from
his car).  As Max desperately attempts to act like an adult, Blume finds
excitement in acting like a child.
Almost all of Rushmore's oddly timed humor relies on its characters.
Whilst we develop a good understanding of Max and Blume's personalities,
they are never predictable and never boring.  The relationship between
these two really needed to work, and it does, much to the credit of
Jason Schwartzman and Bill Murray. Schwartzman's first film performance
is a memorable one, and is skillfully played with a mixture of nastiness
and goofy sincerity.  Murray has received great but small roles recently
in Wildthings and Kingpin, but his work in Rushmore is much closer to
what he is capable of achieving.  Murray is a brilliant comic performer
and this film channels his capabilities, producing a nice bit of
whimsical acting.
It's the winning formula of offbeat comedy and drama that makes Rushmore
such a delight to watch.  Wes Anderson's and co-writer Owen Wilson's
screenplay is smart and original - they understand how to craft
extraordinary characters, and have fun doing so.  Though some scenes in
Rushmore have little or no point, the film is always amusing enough to
warrant an audience.  Rushmore has reinvented the teenage comedy genre
(similar to what The Breakfast Club did in 1985, and what Can't Hardly
Wait attempted to do in 1998) by giving itself a quirkiness and
originality that is rarely found in contemporary cinema.  There are more
reasons to see Rushmore other than its originality, but none are quite
as refreshing.


Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
After sensing small amounts of seismic activity, the USGS (United States 
Geological Survey) send vulcanologist expert Harry Dalton (played by Pierce 
Brosnan) out on what they think is a routine discovery to the small town of 
Dante's Peak.  After finding a pair of skinny dippers dead in a creek next to 
the mountain, Dalton fears that a volcanic eruption is not far away.  
Suggesting the town should be put on alert, government experts doubt him but 
Dante's Peak mayor Rachel Wando (Linda Hamilton) starts to believe him after 
more volcanic activity is found and the lives of her children are threatened.  
Desperately trying to convince everyone of his theory before its too late, 
disastrous consequences occur as the volcano finally blows its lid after a good 
hour into the film.  Now more of a race against time then anything else, Dalton 
must get himself and his companions to safety while attempting to pass little 
"obstacles" like an acid lake and a house surrounded by lava.
Pierse Brosnan's character Harry Dalton is the typical disaster movie hero - 
he's young, good looking, determined and has an on screen radience that can 
carry a movie.  Yet more importantly, Dalton has a very nifty talent for 
sensing when a volcano is about to erupt after a close friend and partner of 
his was killed in the opening scene.  Being surrounded by Rachel Wando and her 
two children gives a nice aspect of romance to the film, yet sometimes can be a 
little tedious as Pierce Brosnan can be often seen of as more of a fatherly 
character rather than a hero constantly running from eruptions.  But overall, 
Brosnan's performance is very well suited to the movie and gives Dante's Peak 
the boost it needs to be a successful action film.
For an area of disaster never really covered before, Dante's Peak does 
extremely well in providing realistic special effects cleverly produced by 
computer and digital technology and directed by Australian-born Roger 
Donaldson, who happens to be a geology major with a passion for vulcanology. 
However impressive Dante's Peak may be, if you are anxious for lots of java and 
volcanic activity (and not just flying rocks) I would probably suggest that you 
wait for Volcano, which is scheduled to be released later this year.
Suspense builds but lava is not fit for the boil 


Title
Review for Great Expectations (1998)
REVIEW:  Great Expectations
by Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
If you're after a comparison between the classic Charles Dickens novel
Great Expectations and the new, modern day film version of the same
name then I'm afraid I can't give you one (simply because I haven't
read the book).  But I suspect that many of today's teenagers, who the
film is primarily targeted for, are in the same position as I was - no
great expectations, no novel to set the standards.
Generation X actors Ethan Hawke and Gwyneth Paltrow have gelled
together on screen for a simple task: look hunky dory, sound like
bimbo's with intelligence.  They have succeeded very well on both
tasks.
Living in the small town of Florida, young lad Finn Bell (Ethan Hawke)
is asked to accompany the incredibly wealthy Ms. Nora Dinsmoor (Ann
Bancroft), a long time resident who lost her mind after a man left her
standing at the altar thirty years before.  Aged 8, Finn is
immediately attracted to Dinsmoor's 11 year old (and already stunning)
daughter Estella (Raquel Beaudene). Seizing the opportunity to share
some of her troubled wisdom, Dinsmoor warns: "She'll only break your
heart; it's a fact.  And even though I warn you, even though I
guarantee you that the girl will only hurt you terribly, you'll still
pursue her. Ain't love grand?"
Through emotional and sexual seduction, Estella's power over Finn
grows until their off and on relationship hits the boundaries of time
and location.  Now into adult hood, Estella (Gwyneth Paltrow) moves to
New York after a rousing night with Finn (Ethan Hawke).  Years later,
a mystery benefactor suddenly requests Finn to showcase his talent for
drawing (of which was nothing more than a hobby) and make himself
known in the art world.  Off he goes to New York, and can you guess
who he bumps into?
The reunion of these two characters brings forth some rather
surprising results, and as the film begins to wrap up we are able to
appreciate the love story that has kept us interested all this time.
With a surprisingly dramatic climax, Great Expectations decides to
change its path of romance and love to a much more engaging finish
(even though this is only for a short time).  Sure - it's far from
perfect, but perfection isn't the name of the game - the film has a
sugary sweetness buried deep inside, which is eventually discovered
and appreciated.
The icy cold performance by Gwyneth Paltrow, and the puppy love role
that Ethan Hawke plays are quite obviously nothing special, but they
both look great together as a modern couple with a passion for
seduction.
Although Great Expectations may not be the most satisfying cinema
experience, it has more than enough bones in it's body to make it an
enjoyable feast of Generation X gibberish.


Title
Review for Rainmaker, The (1997)
After many exciting court thrillers, it comes as somewhat of a
surprise that The Rain Maker is a tame yet well acted drama.  John
Grisham and director Francis Ford Coppola have been careful not to
throw in more than its simplistic plot can handle, and although The
RainMaker is not as spectacular as A Time to Kill or The Pelican
Brief, its a much more complete film in many regards.
Rising Hollywood star Matt Damon plays Rudy Baylor, an inexperienced
young lawyer who teams up with Deck Shifflet (Danny DeVito) to bring a
shoddy insurance company to justice.  Along the way he encounters
problems with staying financially secure, protecting a troubled friend
from her violent husband and becoming recognized in a town swamped
with money hungry lawyers.
After being employed by known sleaze Bruiser Stone (Mickey Rourke),
Rudy and Deck quit their job and start small law firm of their own.
Rudy soon finds himself relying on a solitary court case to get them
through the threat of bankruptcy, and battles high-class lawyer Leo
F. Drummond (Jon Voight) to fight for what is morally correct.
With a mixed cast of young and old Hollywood players, it comes as a
disappointment that no real climax ever eventuates; and although this
well acted drama is of fine tune and taste this alone is not enough to
make it a great film.  A worth while watch, yes, and although nothing
here is ground making material, The RainMaker has enough substance and
interest to make it a successful court drama.


Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
Featuring the voices of: Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Sandra Bullock, Jeff
Goldblum, Michelle Pfeiffer, Danny Glover, Patrick Stewart, Helen
Mirren, Steve Martin, Martin Short
Directors: Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner, Simon Wells
Australian theatrical release: December 26, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
Perhaps for the first time in Hollywood history, Dreamworks has made the
seemingly impossible: an adult animated musical.  Anyone who says that
The Prince of Egypt is not a rare find is either an extreme pessimist or
a Disney employee; this film is a breakthrough for animation, in terms
of writing and conveying a potentially controversial screenplay and
creating breath taking visuals.
In fact, Dreamworks went to great measures to make sure that The Prince
of Egypt would not be a victim of religious criticism for not following
the book of Exodus accurately.  Drafts of the script were approved by
religious leaders, and there is even text before the film explaining
that "artistic license" must be taken into account.  Quite miraculously,
for a story based on Christian text, The Prince of Egypt does not
preach, bore or intimidate.  Against all odds, this is the best animated
film of 1998, and one of my personal favorites of the last few years
(ranking with The Hunchback of Notre Damn and Batman: Mask of the
Phantasm).
The highlight of Prince of Egypt is the dynamic chemistry between its
two crucial characters; men who are brothers in their hearts but have
very different futures ahead of them.  One is Rameses (voice of Ralph
Fiennes), the son of Pharaoh (Patrick Stewart), who was born destined to
rule Egypt.  The other is Moses (Val Kilmer), who was adopted by the
Pharaoh's wife after he was found floating down a river as a baby, in
the time that Pharaoh ordered all Hebrew infants to be killed.  By the
time that Moses realizes that he is a Hebrew - the same people who are
slaves to Pharaoh - he is a young man and is chosen by God to lead his
people out of slavery.
That's quite a story for a "family film" to handle.  In my Babe: Pig in
the City review I stated that some scenes would be distressing for
children to watch, and it seems only fair that I issue a similar warning
in regards to The Prince of Egypt. This film depicts the harassment of
the Hebrew people openly and vividly, but whereas Babe often seemed like
nothing more than a freak show, The Prince of Egypt is honest about its
setting and doesn't pretend that everything is harmless and innocent.
As Moses battles Rameses for the Hebrew's freedom towards the film's
conclusion, we can understand what he is fighting for and at the same
time what he is missing out on - the life of a prince compared to the
life of a true leader.
Visually, The Prince of Egypt is a triumph.  Just as Antz and A Bug's
Life had unique styles of animation, so does this.  Some moments of the
film go beyond just being visually impressive; they are enchanting and
sensational.  These scenes include Moses' encounter with God (in the
form of a burning bush) and the parting of the Red Sea (which alone took
animators over two years of work to complete).  However terrific the
visuals may be, though, is nothing compared to the potency of the
screenplay.  I haven't been this impressed by a script since The Truman
Show, and this mesmerized by visuals since What Dreams May Come.
Whilst there are (thankfully) no singing animals in The Prince of Egypt,
it is very much a musical.  If you can imagine a biblical story brought
to life with the power of, say, Les Miserables, you may have a
reasonable idea of what this is like.   Some of the featured songs are
powerful and moving - such as "Deliver Us," which is performed Ofra Haza
and Eden Riegel, and "When You Believe," performed by Mariah Carey and
Whitney Houston.  These songs are great, and help make the film
accessible for all ages.
I can honestly say that while watching The Prince of Egypt, I never
really noticed the talented array of voices until I looked at the
credits.  Val Kilmer and Ralph Fiennes are sensational in the two
hardest parts, but everybody is impressive.  This is the first animated
film I have seen in which I not only forgot about its voices, I often
forgot that it was animated.  Which is strange, since the color and life
that the animation generates is unlike anything that a live action film
could create.    As impressive as The Ten Commandments was, The Prince
of Egypt is both an epic and a spectacle, packaged as a mainstream and
accessible film by musical numbers and illustrious animation.  This is
cinema in its grandest form, combining an aged but unforgettable tale
with breath-taking visual techniques.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Assignment, The (1997)
THE ASSIGNMENT
Cast: Aidan Quinn, Donald Sutherland, Ben Kingsley, Claudia Ferri,
Celine Bonnier, Vlasta Vrana, Liliana Komorowska
Director: Christian Duguay
Screenplay: Dan Gordon, Sabi H. Shabtai
Running time: 119 minutes
Australian distributor: Columbia Tristar
Australian theatrical release: May 14, 1998
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
In this smart and stylish action thriller, the life and meaning of
Carlos "The Jackal" Sanchez is given new depth.  Of the many gratifying
qualities that The Assignment has to offer, none are more dazzling than
the film's editing and direction.  Christian Duguay (Screamers) shapes
its screenplay with appropriate complexity, giving his material more
than just charm and intrigue.  Clash of cultures, moving emotional
elements and investigations of political espionage wrap themselves
around B grade action, making an A grade experience.
For twenty years, CIA operative Jack Shaw (Donald Sutherland, who has
been in a somewhat disturbing amount of films - eighty or so in the last
thirty years) has chased Sanchez, a master terrorist who enjoys
killing/maiming innocent civilians.  After countless failed attempts to
capture the ingenious killer, Shaw and his Israeli counterpart Amos (Ben
Kingsley) stumble across an effective weapon against him - a man who has
nothing in common with Sanchez except a splitting image.  He is Annibal
Ramirez (Adrian Quinn), an honorable American naval officer who is
ultimately used as bait.
There are two main parts of The Assignment.  Part A chronicles an
extensive two month training which Ramirez endures, in order to make
sure that he thinks and reacts like the man he is impersonating.  Shaw
and Amos devise a set of physically and mentally challenging tests,
including drugging Ramirez with LSD and watching his nightmarish trip.
Part B centers on the dangerous environment that Ramirez encounters as
he attempts to imitate one of the world's most hunted criminals.
Much to his credit, Adrian Quinn plays both the Jackal and the story's
hero with realism and morality.  As Ramirez undergoes his training,
Quinn transforms his character subtly and brilliantly.  The distressing
scenarios he encounters reminded me of Michael Douglas' performance in
The Game; both actors make their characters paranoia hit viewers hard.
In most of his movies, Donald Sutherland is often seen but not noticed.
His part in The Assignment is imperative to the story, which is
surprising because Sutherland is rarely powerful - but is thoroughly
engaging and interesting in this role.  Kingsley, as always, is solid.
Fashioned with striking set pieces and gorgeous cinematography, The
Assignment is a joy to watch.  With a film as smart as this one, we are
reassured that good-looking movies are not necessarily dumb ones (for
further evidence consult Enemy of the State or Kundun). Solid
performances and crisp editing compliment The Assignment's firm
direction and beautifully laced screenplay. There are not many films
that work on as many levels as this one does, and even fewer that can
implement charm alongside terror.  Ordinarily this might appear to be a
contradiction of terms, but The Assignment has enough substance and
energy to pull it off with flair.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my movie reviews newsletter
(unless, of course, you already have) or for any inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Hope Floats (1998)
Cast: Sandra Bullock, Harry Connick Jr., Gena Rowlands, Mae Whitman,
Michael Pare, Cameron Finley
Director: Forest Whitaker
Screenplay: Steven Rogers
Australian distributor: Twentieth Century Fox
Australian theatrical release date: October 8, 1998
I'll admit my prejudice against modern dramas the day that Sandra
Bullock chooses a decent role.  I'll tell you about hundreds of these
awful films that have come and gone, the minute I block them out of my
memory.  And I'll write a write a better screenplay than that of Hope
Floats the second someone puts pen and paper in my hands.
As if A Thousand Acres and How Stella Got Her Groove Back weren't bad
enough, here is yet another film which tries to please everyone, and
ultimately pleases very few.  The screenplay by Steven Rogers is
harmless and innocent - and has good intentions - but is far too
harmless, and far too innocent.  At its worst, it is so afraid to insult
anyone that it ended up insulting me for sitting through it.
On a national TV talk show, Birdee Pruitt (Sandra Bullock) is humiliated
when her best friend reveals that she is having an affair with Birdee's
husband.  Birdee runs away from her problems with her young daughter
Bernice (Mae Whitman), and starts over in the town where she grew up,
located somewhere in Texas.  There she lands a job at the local photo
development shop, and awkwardly reunites with an old flame (Harry
Connick Jr.).
Sandra Bullock's last three films are proof that she is terrible at
choosing her roles - In Love and War, Two if by Sea and Speed 2: Cruise
Control were all box office flops.  Now with Hope Floats added to the
list of disasters, this promising young actress is definitely having a
hard time lifting her feet off the ground.  As for Harry Connick Jr.,
well, he looks a little out of place in a sissy film, as he has
previously left a vivid mark from Independence Day and Copycat.
At the risk of labeling Hope Floats as simply a "chick flick," lets just
say that only a small crowd would like it.  Whatever opportunity the
film has to jump into an engaging moment is avoided - sometimes
narrowly - but avoided none the less.  Give me pen and paper any day.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
EDITORIAL: Saving Private Spielberg
by Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Through the years, Steven Spielberg has proved that he can not only
deliver special effects fueled thrillers (Jaws, Jurassic Park), but also
emotionally invigorating films (ET, Schindlers List).  Although his
other recent piece, Amistad, was one of the worst films he has made in
the 80's and 90's, Spielberg has received much critical acclaim for
Saving Private Ryan.  With any luck, this film will strengthen the
notion that mainstream cinema can still produce its fair share of
masterpieces, and that movie-goers do not necessarily have to resort to
watching Indie or art house films for a good amount of substance.
Recent examples The Truman Show, Titanic and Gattaca have proved that
brilliance can still be found in popular films.
The film depicts the tale of eight men on a mission to save one during
World War II.  If Spielberg has pieced it together correctly, Saving
Private Ryan may just install similar shell-shocked responses that films
like Gallipoli and Schindlers List were renown, and feared for.  If you
have seen either of these films at the cinema, you may have experienced
something similar to what I did - as the credits rolled onto the screen,
the audience was silent. Silent perhaps because of the sheer power of
the subject material, silent because of guilt that the human race could
ever have allowed these horrific events to occur, or simply because no
one wanted to spoil the moment.  And what a moment it was.
Unlike some of his early films, Spielberg has a wide range of talented
crewmembers to strengthen his creation.  Hollywood icon Tom Hanks is
amongst one of the finer actors in the industry, having excellent
performances in Philadelphia and Forest Gump (as well as many others)
under his belt.  In the production side of things, Spielberg has chosen
some of the best: cinematographer Janusz Kaminksi (Schindlers List, The
Lost World), composer John Williams (all three Star Wars films, JFK,
Jurassic Park) and film editor Michael Kahn (Empire of the Sun,
Schindlers List).  As you can see, their records are impressive to say
the least.
Spielberg began his directing career in the late fifties with The Last
Gun (a barely known western) in a very different industry.  Back then,
the phrase "you'll never work in this town again" actually meant
something - the studios were family based and perhaps a perfect example
of corrupt-but-correct organizations.  Although anyone could not just
make a film without any problems (or rather, any person not affiliated
with the industry); all that a potential director needed to do was share
his or her ideas with a small bunch of people.  Nowadays, there are
hundreds of people who can say no for funding a film, and a small group
of people who can say yes.  And this is for obvious reasons, with the
amount of crap that manages to barge its way into contemporary cinema.
But any film with the name "Spielberg" attached to it is bound to get
the go ahead.  From first looks, Saving Private Ryan seems like it may
be some of Steven's best work.  But that would be an awfully hard feat
to accomplish, as this man has carved some unforgettable screen moments,
revolutionary accouchements, and a few truly magnificent masterpieces
that demonstrate the versatility and power of the whole cinematic
experience.  Hopefully, Private Spielberg will deliver the goods once
again.
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN PRODUCTION INFORMATION:
Cast: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Matt Damon, Edward Burns, Jeremy Davies,
Vin Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi
Director: Steven Spielberg
Producers: Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn
Screenplay: Robert Rodat
Cinematography: Janusz Kaminski
Music: John Williams
Australian distributor: United International Pictures
Australian theatrical release date: November 19

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
BELOVED
Cast: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise, Beah
Richards, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Albert Hall, Irma P. Hall
Director: Jonathan Demme
Screenplay: Adam Brooks, Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese based on the
novel by Toni Morrison
Australian theatrical release: May 6, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
To its credit, Beloved is not a conventional period piece.  In fact,
there is really nothing ordinary in the themes that are explored in this
film.  Oprah Winfrey's labor of love that she nurtured for over a decade
is a peculiar and often unsettling mixture of horror and drama. The film
succeeds in crafting extraordinary characters and moments, but with an
almost three-hour running time one might question the existence of an
editor.  It's difficult to put a finger on what director Jonathan Demme
(Silence of the Lambs, Philadelphia) and the screenwriters are trying to
tell us, not because it is something incredibly profound, but rather
because there are too many subplots that detract from the story's
meaning.
Sethe (Winfrey) is a runaway slave who has a simple existence with her
daughter Denver (Kimberley Elise), in rural Ohio.  The year is 1873, and
an angry spirit haunts the house they live in.  Sethe's past, we learn,
contains disturbing memories of unforgettable sins, which seem to get
progressively worse as the film plods along.  The two are joined by Paul
D (Danny Glover), a former slave who stays with Sethe and Denver in the
hope of becoming a family.  But a mysterious guest who goes by the name
of Beloved (Thandie Newton) arrives on the scene.  Where she came from,
who she came with and why she is there is at first a mystery, but later
things are revealed as the past once again comes up to bite Sethe.
Although adapted from Toni Morrison's Pulitzer Prize winning novel,
Beloved doesn't seem very literate. There are moments in novels that
cannot retain much of their power once a conversion to film has been
made; that's just the way it is, I guess.  As easily as a picture can
tell a thousand words, words usually have greater meaning.  The pictures
that cinematographer Tak Fujimoto uses are very fine indeed, ranging
from the ghostly looking old house (which was built especially for the
film) to the grainy texture of the story's flashbacks.  Where Beloved
fails is sustaining power in its imagery; for all the disturbing images
evoked, the script doesn't have the power to back them up.  Illiterate
is not the right word - inferior, perhaps, is.
That's not to say that Beloved was a mistake to make, since Jonathan
Demme has a solid shot at getting it right.  He squeezes strong
performances from all of his cast, notably Oprah Winfrey and Danny
Glover.  Beloved's strange actions and manner of speaking no doubt
demanded a lot of talent from Thandie Newton, but her character
frustrated me for those reasons.  I was patiently waiting for Beloved's
emotional climax in which her actions would form a basis of
understanding for her character, but that never came.
Demme also directs with a flair for the bizarre, which isn't surprising
considering this is the man who turned the grim Silence of the Lambs
into an Oscar winning success.  Needless of how good the final product
turned out to be, Beloved deserves respect as an artistic creation that
ventures into the realms of the extraordinary, without losing sight of
what _makes_ something extraordinary.  But Beloved as a whole does not
fit into that category.  It is a film that attempts to be better than
most but ends up falling behind, primarily due to inefficient scripting
and editing.  To see an extraordinary film that is extraordinarily
made - now that would be something.


Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
Cast: Robert Duvall, Miranda Richardson, Farrah Fawcett, John Beasley,
Walter Goggins, Rick Dial, Billy Joe Shaver, Billy Bob Thornton, June
Carter Cash, Todd Allen
Director: Robert Duvall
Screenplay: Robert Duvall
Robert Duvall has approached dangerous ground with The Apostle.  Not
necessarily dangerous as far as ethnical and religious themes are
concerned, but rather his skill behind the camera.  Respectable actors
have had mixed results as directors in the past; Billy Bob Thorton
managed to hit the right note with last years Sling Blade, as did Mel
Gibson with Braveheart.  On the other side of the spectrum, Kevin Spacey
made the frivolous and rather dull Albino Alligator, and now Duvall has
failed to show substantial talent as a director with his gutsy attempt
at a character study.
Duvall plays Euliss "Sonny" Dewell, an intriguing Pentecostal preacher
with a wandering eye for women and booze. Flawed, yes, but he is
completely devoted to his faith and his church.  Perhaps a little too
devoted, since he clubs a younger man of the cloth (Todd Allen) on the
head with a baseball bat after he assists in taking the church away from
him.  Realizing that he's gone too far, Sonny flees town and seeks
refuge in Bayou Boutte, Louisiana.  He dubs himself as "The Apostle
E.F," and starts a new church named "The One Way Road to Heaven" with
the assistance of retired preacher Reverend Blackwell (John Beasly).
In its worst moments, The Apostle will serve as a reminder of how much
potential it had. But nowadays many films seem to thrive on potential
alone - recent examples Deep Impact, Welcome to Sarajevo and Sphere all
have fascinating concepts, but their finished product didn't quite go
the distance.  Such is the story with The Apostle, which has potentially
riveting subject material but is over worked and indefinable.
I never quite understood what Duvall's motives were - is he trying to
show us ironies of the Christian faith?  Is he giving us a lesson on
redemption, or merely pointing out that even devoted men have flaws?  Or
is the entire film just a study of human behavior?
None of these themes are explored adequately, no doubt due to Duvall's
lack of experience as both a director and a writer.  To his credit, he
does approach the film impartially and honestly; making clear that his
intentions are not to shock, intimidate or offend.  But even from a
technical view, it was evident to me that he simply doesn't have the
skill, or experience to handle such a hefty workload as anything except
an actor.  Many camera shots look second-rate and novice, and some
scenes go way, way too long (especially his final preaching message).
Still, The Apostle is far from a disaster.  Duvall's riveting, Oscar
nominated performance is amongst the best of his career, and
occasionally the film delivers some memorable moments.  In particular, a
scene in which Sonny converts a racist troublemaker (Billy Bob Thorton,
in a cameo role) is amongst its finest.
After being disappointed by The Apostle's lack of quality and distinctly
clouded motives, my message to Duvall is clear: let the actors do the
acting, and the directors do the directing.  Unless, of course, he
somehow manages to create another Sling Blade.
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
Review:  The Man in the Iron Mask (1998)
The Man in the Iron Mask is one of those indulgent, corrosively funny films with
one liners that send cheers from the audience and genuinely pointless scenes
that receive sniggers and snorts a plenty.  Theres just one problem  its not
a comedy.  Or at least, it doesnt intend to be one.
You cant say that new comer director Randall Wallace couldnt have seen it
coming.  The international cast of Leonardo DiCaprio, Jeremy Irons, John
Malkovich, Girard Depardieu and Gabriel Byrne makes the film constantly sound,
look and feel strikingly different.  Surely, the films greatest achievement is
showing the audience how laughable A grade actors can be if placed in the wrong
situations.
King Louis (Leonardo DiCaprio) is the ruler of France in 1660, but hes not
exactly a wise and thoughtful leader.  He gives rotten food to his people, sends
soldiers to their death so he can have their wives, and locks up his own brother
in a prison for 6 years just so he can claim the crown by himself.  Three of the
four main musketeers (Irons, Malkovich, Depardieu) that faithfully served his
father decide that they have had enough of Louis evil ways, and devise a scheme
to replace the King and bring justice to the people of France.  Their plan: to
dig up Louis identical twin brother (wearing an iron mask) and make a royal
swap.  The only remaining loyal-to-the-thrown musketeer, DArtagnan (Gabriel
Bynre) attempts to foil their plan of treason against the King.
Amused yet? It gets worse.  Without giving too much of the rest of the story
away, let me just say that if you can imagine the most likely possible ending,
then the chances are youd be predicting it very well (with the exception of
some very silly plot twists towards the films completion).
The Man in the Iron Mask is at times a reasonably entertaining film, and if you
re excited about the promise of musketeers in shiny uniforms then you perhaps
you will enjoy it a little (or a lot) more than I did.  But really, what we have
is a film that takes itself so incredibly serious all you can do is laugh  both
at the dialogue and the execution in general.  And, of course, the fact that we
are supposed to believe that these musketeers come from the same part in the
world.
On the up side, some of the battle scenes are genuinely entertaining.  And, may
the truth be told, I liked looking at Leonardo DiCaprio a lot better when he had
that mask on.


Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
VARSITY BLUES
Cast: James Van Der Beek, Jon Voight, Amy Smart, Paul Walker, Scott
Caan, Ali Larter, Ron Lester, Eliel Swinton
Director: Brian Robbins
Screenplay: John Gatins, W. Peter Iliff
Australian theatrical release: April 1, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
It helps to enjoy some films if you have a passion for their subject
matter, whilst it is crucial for others.  Varsity Blues falls into the
later category.  I openly admit that I have little interest in American
Football, and had this film been centered around, say, basketball,
chances are I would have enjoyed it a lot more.  James "Dawson" Van Der
Beek stars as a man thrust into fame, and his transformation from
cynical bench warmer to a town icon is never entirely believable nor
very inspiring.  At some stages in the film it appears as though his
character will spiral out of control as he experiences a new world of
fame, only to have him grounded time and time again by director Brian
Robbins.  Not only does this reduce our interest; it also strips Moxon
of personality.
The West Canaan Coyotes are a fierce and omnipotent Football team for a
small Texas town.  Led by unrelenting coach Bud Kilmer (Jon Voight), the
team is on their way to winning their 23rd division title.  However,
star quarterback Lance Harbor (Paul Walker) suffers a season-ending
injury, and the underestimated Jonathon Moxon (James Van Der Beek) is
unwillingly thrust into filling his important place in the team.  Moxon
soon becomes a town icon, whilst him and the rest of the team struggle
to perform up to Kilmer's tough standards.
James Van Der Beek is an acceptable performer who acts slow and steady.
If you like him in TV's Dawson's Creek, chances are you'll like him
here - if you take away "Dawson's" complex dialogue, this is the kind of
role that you will expect.  Jon Voight has landed on nasty territory in
his part as a vicious and uncaring coach (very much like Nick Nolte in
Blue Chips). It is a pity that it takes almost the entire film's running
time for Voight's character to convey any emotion; the image of the
coach's sorrowful face reflecting through a football award is quite a
profound moment and says piles more than   any of his rambling speeches.
Aside from this scene, Varsity Blues is a fairly meaningless
experience - its occasional examinations of the pressure mounted on
football players fall on uninterested ears (especially in my case).
The football games themselves are built from the cliches we've come to
expect - the team's best player suffers a career ending injury, the team
play really really badly after an all night drinking binge and, of
course, the final game is a "thrilling" buzzer beater.  There was only
one sports scene that I genuinely enjoyed - a head banging, body
smashing moment performed to the tune of the Foo Fighters' "My Hero."
Overall, Varsity Blues is a film with some strong performances but a
script ridden with sports cliches and a dramatic side that never steps
into second gear.  Still, if you like American Football, Varsity
Snooze - sorry, Blues - might be worth warming to.


Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
Cast: Harrison Ford, Anne Heche, David Schwimmer, Jacqueline Obradors,
Temuera Morrison
Director: Ivan Reitman
Screenplay: Michael Browning
Australian theatrical release date: June 25
It would make my forehead cringe to think of a story more simple than
this: the scruffy pilot Quinn (Harrison Ford) manages to crash a small
airplane in the middle of nowhere with prissy women's magazine editor
Robin (Anne Heche) as the only passenger.  The two then grumble and
groan their way through 6 days and 7 nights; griping and whining at
every problem they encounter (and boy, there are a few).  Meanwhile,
Quinn's sluttish assistant (Jacqueline Obradors) tempts Robin's finance
(David Schwimmer).
Did I mention that it's all based in tropical paradise?  Well, it is -
and these exotic islands come fully equipped with wild pigs, fragile
mountain floors and even their own set of pirates ("You mean Arrgh?").
With much controversy surrounding the film regarding lesbian Heche
giving a "straight" performance, allow me to say this: she does a much,
much better job conveying a straight woman than most straight women do.
The main problem with Six Days Seven Nights does not lie in her
performance, and came to think of it, nor does it with anybody else's.
Ford, Heche, Obradors and Schwimmer all make passable if not pleasing
appearances on the screen; giving a fun sense of improvisation to their
roles.
What limits the film from being an inventive, rewarding feel-easy
adventure is the far too loose script.  Perhaps if writer Michael
Browning had been able to add more creativity to the action scenes,
flesh out some of the characters and give the film a better climax, it
may have been more convincing as both a romance and an adventure.
Like many poorly written mainstream films (Godzilla, Hard Rain and
Independence Day come to mind), the script is awash with one liners -
"I'd better not catch you smiling," Robin remarks when Quinn's hand is
down her pants, trying to remove a snake.  Whilst often hilarious, these
remarks serve as a quick joke, illustrating the fact that it's easier to
create a witty remark than it is to build a genuinely funny scenario.
Perhaps director Ivan Reitman's greatest achievement with Six Days Seven
Nights was taking us on a journey to practically no where, and having
fun along the way.  Having said that, the film is nothing more than some
fun - and although you may often find yourself laughing at it, the humor
alone may just be enough to tide you over until you see a better,
smarter film.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
With a credit list that is sure to raise some eyebrows, The Faculty
boasts two of the best names in the horror industry, director Robert
Rodriguez (From Dusk Till Dawn, Desperado) and screenwriter Kevin
Williamson (Scream, I Know What You Did Last Summer).
Sure enough, the screenplay boasts Williamson's entertaining
90's-culture dialogue as well as some likeable characters - who
collectively bear a radical resemblance to the characters from The
Breakfast Club - but at times is severely let down by Rodriguez's
direction.  His usual electric pacing is somewhat lacking, as is his
keen sense of the absurd.  His direction is certainly not without its
merits - many of them attributed to atmosphere, others the clever
structure of scenes that reflect older styles of horror filmmaking mixed
with props and surroundings from a very modern era - that create a sort
of Invasion of the Body Snatchers for the Mortal Kombat age.
One perfectly satirical touch comes curtsey of Williamson, who
ingeniously gives the heroes of the story - school kids battling their
teachers, whose bodies have been taken over by aliens - only one kind of
weapon that they can effectively fight with: home made speed.  In an
irony that is both whimsical fun and tongue-in-cheek cynicism, a
life-threatening, deadly, don't-touch-it-for-the-life-of-you substance
is now saving the human race from oblivion.  Which, I thought, was kinda
cool, although Rodriguez's finished product is not a film that will be
remembered in ten, or even five years time.  In his attempts to once
again re-create the horror genre - after the mammoth commercial and
artistic success of From Dusk Till Dawn - Rodriguez has created an
enjoyable, not-to-be-taken-seriously piece that entertains well,
although sometimes doesn't quite cut it (no pun intended).


Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
REVIEW: Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Australian theatrical release date: July 16, 1998
>From 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 4 stars
Hunter S. Thompson's novel Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas is bold,
outrageous and ingenious - some good ingredients for a film nowadays.
With the dynamic Johnny Depp playing a perfectly suited title role, long
time director Terry Gilliam giving his intriguing flair to the camera,
and Thompson himself being the creative consultant, the film has enough
talent involved to soar it through the roof.  Combined, they make a
swashbuckling piece - a visually extraordinary, wonderfully acted, and
shrewdly assembled flick based around the bright lights of Las Vegas.
And drugs.  And more drugs.
The film opens with a red convertible (dubbed "The Red Shark") speeding
down the highway, on the way to Las Vegas. The driver and passenger,
journalist Raoul Duke (Depp) and his Samoan attorney (Benicio Del Toro),
cannot dilly daddle - for "the sky was full of what looked like huge
bats," according to Duke.  The drugs had began to take hold.  This was
"bat country".
These two high-as-a-kite gentlemen somehow make it to their destination,
and there, they experiment with almost every drug known to man.
Marijuana, cocaine, mescaline, ether, adrenaline, and their "medicine" -
amyls.  They run amok all over the city, visiting casinos, hotels, a
dirt bike race and even a Debbie Reynolds concert.
Perhaps the most refreshing aspect of Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas is
the inventive way it deals with the use of drugs.  Not exactly showing
us how bad they are, yet not completely glorifying them, the film cares
much more about showcasing the effects than preaching about the
substances themselves.  Gilliam leaves no question as to how the film's
main characters experience what they take - the film has illustrious
visuals which show, through the eyes of these characters, their world of
hallucination.  This is not an easy tactic to employ, but he does it
successfully to say the least.  Some scenes brilliantly convey this
method of film making - ranging from a bar full of lounge lizards
(literally) to an image of swooping bats in Duke's sunglasses.  They
look so real, and so impressive that viewers may start to wonder whether
they are actually seeing hallucinations themselves.
Although I once thought that Johnny Depp had found a perfectly pitched,
perfectly suited role as the Worlds Worst Director in Ed Wood, he
performs at a remarkably high level in Fear and Loathing, and seems to
be in his best form ever.  Depp should now be recognized as one of
America's finest and most diverse actors, with a range of startlingly
different films under his belt (including the race-against-time Nick of
Time, and the dramatic Mafia flick Donnie Brasco).
Like almost every film that is strikingly different than most, Fear and
Loathing has its own unique set of drawbacks.  But strangely, some of
the worst moments are amongst its most interesting - including an odd
scene in which Duke's attorney makes a pass on a bewildered waitress,
and the introduction of a harmless young painter (Christina Ricci, in a
cameo role).  They may be awkwardly structured and lack an intelligent
meaning, but they at least they give us some insight as to how ferocious
these drug-fucked losers really are.
How I managed to make it to the media screening of Fear and Loathing is
a story in itself.  Catching the train with a friend (who was, at the
time, suffering with a hangover) only minutes before the film started,
just to make it to the cinema fifteen minutes late and not able to find
a way inside.  Five minutes later, the manager arrived and led us
through two locked doors into the "Theatrette", which was so crowed that
we had to sit on the floor and view the screen on an angle.  But
nothing, absolutely nothing, barred the experience for me.
Bold, outrageous and ingenious do make great ingredients for a film; and
although Fear and Loathing occasionally fumbles, it's generally the best
fun any sick human being can have without getting high themselves.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Wings of the Dove, The (1997)
The Wings of the Dove is a 101 minute adoption of one of Henry James lesser
known novels.  A short and sweet soapy, if you will.
Kate Croy (Helena Bonham Carter) is a conniving and repressively gloomy
character, who is wholly in love with town commoner Merton Densher (Linus
Roach).  Forbidding their relationship is Kates upper class Aunt Maud
(Charlotte Rampling), who threatens to exclude Kate and her divorced father from
the familys vast fortune.
The lovers sexual and emotional relationship is based on their understanding of
each other, and the knowing that wherever one goes the other will be standing
with them side to side.  But Kate doesnt think twice about ignoring Mertons
pleads for a low-standing-in-society-but-spiritually-beneficial marriage, and
explores all opportunities to have her cake and screw it too.
The dazzling Millie Theale (Alison Elliot) enters the scheme; a charming and
gorgeous millionaire who is slowly dying of a terminal disease. Kate works up a
devilish scheme for Merton to seduce Millie, thus inheriting all her money if
the plan goes right.  But sooner or later she is forced to contemplate her
relationships integrity by balancing her desire to be rich by her longing to be
the only woman in Mertons mind.
What director Iain Softley (who gave us Hackers in 1995) delivers in Dove is
provocative, finely tuned romance of a dark nature.  The essence of real
situations and characters are existent is so many ways  Carters performance as
the arrogant Kate, the lush surroundings of London and Venice and most of all a
genuinely well written script.  He has been careful not to make the film place
all its cards on the table too soon, so interesting character developments occur
which renew the viewers interest levels.  And just when you thought that the
Wings of the Dove had shown you all it has to offer, riveting ending scenes put
everything into perspective.
If films like Sense and Sensibility or SBS movies have put you off period
dramas, then rest assured that Wings of the Dove is much more enjoyable than
many others of its kind.  Although not exactly easy viewing, this is one motion
picture than deserves to be known as something very unique and artistic.


Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
Cast: Tenzin Thuthob Tsarong, Gyurme Tethong, Tulku Jamyang Kunga
Tenzin, Tenzin Yeshi Paichang, Tsewang Migyur Khangsar, Tencho Gyalpo,
Sonam Phuntsok, Gyatso Lukhang, Tenzin Trinley, Jigme Tsarong, Robert
Lin
Director: Martin Scorsese
Producer: Barbara De Fina
Screenplay: Melissa Mathison
Cinematography: Roger Deakins
Music: Philip Glass
Australian release date: June 18
Martin Scorsese's Kundun is to Tibetan Buddhist's what Jesus of Nazareth
is to Christians.  Both of them are revelations; religiously inspired -
and not specifically character driven - examinations of myth and
history.  They're more than just motion pictures.  They're visual
journeys through the beliefs of followers across the world.  Make no
mistake: Kundun is a daring, admirable work of art that depicts the life
of one of the greatest religious figures this century - the fourteenth
Dalai Lama.
Scorsese starts us off with the tale of a two-year old named Tenzin
Gyatso.  A Buddhist monk (disguised as a servant) finds him, and
believes he is the fourteenth reincarnation of the Dalai Lama.  Sure
enough, the boy correctly identifies the thirteenth's personal items and
becomes the spiritual ruler of Tibet.  Through the following years,
Tenzin is extensively trained by high-monks on how a Dalai Lama should
look, think and sound.
At only 16 years of age, Tenzin finds himself protecting his country
from the grasping hands of communist China.  Along the way he has to
cope with the death of his father, the tyranny of the Chinese and the
ever-increasing responsibilities of his godly role.
It's a hard to imagine a true story being more compelling, more
fascinating than that of the fourteenth Dalai Lama's.  It's also hard to
imagine a film that can grasp it successfully without the intrusion of
Hollywood influence.  Last years Seven years in Tibet was a potential
masterpiece that ended up looking sheepish and frivolous; a potent story
told incorrectly due to miscasting (Brad Pit as an Austrian mountain
climber?) and misinterpretation from the screenplay.  It may have been
an easy to watch, easy to enjoy flick - but it felt too simplified, too
refined to be taken seriously as a mature picture.
If Kundun had fallen victim to the above faults, it would have surely
been one of the biggest missed opportunities of recent years.  But much
to my astonishment, I found that Scorsese never falters in delivering
bounding, gripping cinema.  His vision and enlightenment into the life
of this remarkable human being is truly engaging as both a look at his
personal life, and his god-like life through the eyes of the people
around him.
Even on an optical level, Kundun never fails to triumph.  The lush
Morocco scenery (of course, the Chinese did not allow Scorsese to film
it in Tibet) is beautifully manipulated by cinematographer Roger Deakins
(The Shawshank Redemption, Rob Roy).  Combined with some flashy camera
techniques, the whole production looks pretty darn classy - so if you
can't appreciate Kundun on an intellectual basis, its amazing eye candy
will no doubt be enough to keep you gawking for more.  And if this isn't
enough pleasure for the senses, Philip Glass' swashbuckling music score
is used to great effect.
What is even more impressive is the film's almost perfectly composed
screenplay.  Reportedly, the Dalai Lama gave his input into the 14 draft
scripts written by Melissa Mathison (whose other screenplay credits
include ET: The Extraterrestrial and The Indian in the Cupboard).  What
eventuated is a balanced combination of historical fact and character
development; emotion and integrity.  One scene, when an Indian soldier
asks the Dalai Lama whether he is the Lord Buddha, his carefully placed
answer is given: "I believe I am a reflection, like the moon on water.
When you see me, and I try to be a good man, you see yourself."  But by
then I guess it really made no difference, as Scorsese already had my
heart totally immersed, my mind almost over powered with emotion and
respect for this character who continued to defy textbook expectations.
Just like the astonishing story of a man saving the lives of Jews in
oppression, which of course later became the motion picture Schindlers
List, the tale of the fourteenth Dalai Lama simply needed to be told.
And more than that, it needed to be told well - with respect not only
for the Tibetan Buddhists, but also for westerners who won't want to sit
through a two hour lecture on how good Buddhism is.
Perhaps that's why Martin Scorsese succeeds with Kundun on so many
levels.  If there were any biases, I couldn't spot them - he approaches
the subject matter with wise admiration for the Dalai Lama; not trying
to convince us of the Tibetan way of life but still presenting it to us
vividly and honestly.
A little man named Steven Spielberg once believed that there are two
different things a cinema might show: a movie, or a film.  If his theory
is correct, Kundun joins other moving historical epics like Schindlers
List, in a collection of true "films."
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Cast: Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, F. Murray Abraham, Donna
Murphy, Anthony Zerbe
Director: Jonathan Frakes
Screenplay: Michael Piller based on a story by Michael Piller & Rick
Berman
Australian theatrical release: December 31, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
Melbourne's population of Trekkers littered the press screening of
Insurrection for a very good reason: they love their Star Trek.  When a
nervous presenter mispronounced "Jean-Luc Picard," all hell broke loose.
"Go away," screamed one distressed fan. "Piss off!" said another.  The
situation worsened when the presenter read a plot synopsis, only to hear
"don't tell us!" "Boooo!"  This unruly mob spoke the language of all
Trekkers; they didn't care what happened, as long as they got to see the
Enterprise on the big screen as soon as possible.  And that's the way
it's been for years.
For a show that was never popular in its original series, Star Trek has
certainly evolved miraculously.  The first six films involved the
adventures of Captain Kirk and his crew of quirky characters, whereas
films seven to nine have featured the stalwart Picard (Patrick Stewart)
at the helm of the saga.  In Insurrection (the ninth in the series),
Stewart is given the opportunity to act yet again as the rogue hero,
which he does so convincingly.  But this time Stewart is not given as
large a spotlight as he had in 1996's First Contact, for the sake of
developing some of the other main characters.  Director Jonathon Frakes
(who also stars in the film) combines fun elements of character
personalities and action scenes nicely, whilst not exceeding himself in
entertainment or excitement.
Insurrection is similar in tone to Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home, in
that its characters are placed in environments that are very different
to the ones in which they are accustomed (and believe me, that gag's
milked for everything its got).  For one reason or another, Picard and
his crew come across a strange remote planet belonging to a peaceful
race of people named the Ba'ku's.  This planet possesses a unique
value - it is bathed in radiation that reverses the aging process. That
is why the Son'a's - an aged and dying race - want desperately to get
their hands on Ba'ku territory.   But Picard becomes determined not to
let any harm inflict the Ba'ku's after developing a romantic
relationship with a sprightly native woman (who is over three hundred
years old).  The Enterprise are forced to break Federation rules in
order to protect the Ba'ku, whilst the Son'a's will do anything to
further their existence.
The primary problem of Insurrection lies in its script.  The synopsis
above indicates a simplistic one-way storyboard, but Frakes adds so many
subplots that the film's main focus is often forgotten.  The potential
destruction of a civilization strangely seems less compelling than what
some of our heroes go through, ranging from android Data's (Brent
Spiner) attempts to discover what it feels like to be a child, to Worf's
(Michael Dorn) experience of Klingon puberty.  Most Star Trek films are
very good at underlining the central plot and striving to build a
rewarding climax, but Insurrection has too many distractions along the
way. When the climax does come, it is nowhere near as spectacular as it
should have been.
Special effects are something that Star Trek films can never get enough
of.  Those featured in Insurrection are certainly good, but hardly
represent what the industry is capable of.  Insurrection would have
benefited from whiz-bang, spectacular visuals (achieving the standard of
1998's Lost in Space would have been a good feat), because often the
film feels a little too ordinary and much like something we have seen
before.
Patrick Stewart delivers his usual solid performance as the film's
anchor, and is especially good when he raises his voice - coming across
as a wild and unpredictable authoritarian.  The rest of the cast are a
wacky lot, and everyone seems to be having a lot of fun playing out
their roles, which is the way it should be.  Like most Star Trek films,
the makeup and costume designs are terrific and breathe life into
characters that only Star Trek could think of.
I can understand why some Trekkers would be disappointed by
Insurrection. This is not a traditional Star Trek film in style and
pace; it is more like an extended episode of the series.  Every
character discovers something about themselves, whilst the narrative
slowly moves along with occasional scenes of tense confrontations and
tasteful action (Star Trek has always been careful not to disgust or
irritate viewers).  Frakes has created a solid and generally
entertaining piece, without making Insurrection one of the best films of
the series or even the summer.  The Trekkers get to see the Enterprise
again - and that's probably all that matters.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
1 and a half stars
Off the beat, I'd say that Chow Yun Fat is a terrific actor.  A John Woo
veteran and an Asian action spectacle, Yun Fat effortlessly conveyed
brilliance in Woo's The Killer and Hard Boiled.   His Hollywood debut,
however, is another story.  What led him to choose two very messy
scripts - 1997's The Replacement Killers and this one - to begin his
American career is a mystery to me.  It's not that The Corruptor doesn't
show of its lead performer, it's just that its lead performer can't show
off his film. After the first ten minutes or so of The Corruptor, we get
a glimpse of what it could have been - but upon its completion, it's
clear that this film is a case of misused opportunities.  There are a
couple of well-choreographed action scenes and some unexpected twists in
the plot, but severely hindering this B&B (blood and bullets) soaked
caper is its scripting.  Jumbled and unnecessarily complex, the
screenplay never builds intrigue and seldom shows signs of getting
there.
Danny Wallace (Mark Wahlberg) is a new police officer in the Chinatown
Asian Gang Unit.  A turf war has erupted between two powerful gangs, and
corruption and double-crossing has filtered through the police force.
Star detective Nick Chen (Chow Yun-Fat) reluctantly partners with
Wallace, informing him that white cops are usually killed within days.
Whilst Chen battles to keep the peace in Chinatown, Wallace has
different intentions, and is reluctant to adhere to the tough
regulations of an almost foreign police force.
Perhaps dooming The Corruptor from the start is its two protagonists -
they are cliché and rather dull characters. Chow Yun-Fat has the ability
to play both the good guy and the bad guy with a flick of his eyebrows,
but here he doesn't get the chance to dazzle audiences or develop his
character emotionally. Nick Chen is a hard-hitting, dedicated cop - we
know that - but the film tries to make him more than that.  The
characterization of a violent but lovable man was done to perfection in
1998's Japanese film Hana-Bi, but here viewers are distanced from the
film's most important character.  Yun Fat is never a bad performer, but
bad films bring him down.  Mark Wahlberg plays a nerd cop (his role
bears similarities to Guy Pearce's in L.A Confidential) unconvincingly
and sheepishly.
There are few redeeming qualities in The Corruptor, a film that
disappoints on more than one level.  Poor scripting makes this film come
in a long second best to the likes of Payback and Lock, Stock and Two
Smoking Barrels, and that's disappointing since The Corruptor had more
potential than both of them.  Like looking at a blank page in an
otherwise fascinating book, this film doesn't match the high standards
of either Hong Kong or Hollywood films - in fact, it arrives well below
par on both accounts.


Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
AUSTIN POWERS: THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME
Cast: Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Michael York, Seth Green, Robert
Wagner, Rob Lowe, Mindy Sterling, Tim Robbins, Elizabeth Hurley
Director: Jay Roach
Producers: Suzanne Todd, Jennifer Todd, Demi Moore, Eric McLeod, John
Lyons, Mike Myers
Screenplay: Mike Myers & Michael McCullers
Cinematography: Ueli Steiger
Music: George S. Clinton
Australia distributor: Village Roadshow
Australian theatrical release: June 17, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and a half stars
Recently some of my readers have expressed their belief that I look for
depth and meaning in films even when I shouldn't be; that is, I look for
a profound message when I should be enjoying the ride for what it is
worth.  Whilst there is probably some truth behind this argument, in my
defense is this review of Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me, a movie
that is as deep as a blonde joke and half as meaningful.  Yet there is
something entirely satisfying with Mike Myers' comedic formula that
makes this film a delightful romp from start to finish.  Occasionally
overworked and very occasionally problematic but never boring or
unfunny, The Spy Who Shagged Me has been accused of all sorts of
cinematic sins, but none that make it any less enjoyable for the viewer.
Thanks to an even livelier atmosphere than the first film, this piece of
lavish cinema is better than its predecessor in terms of wit, energy and
fun.  Which, I suppose, is what Austin Powers is all about - celebrating
life with a warped sense of humor and an acute sense of the absurd.  Or
perhaps, Mike Myers is just having fun.
Agent Kensington (Elizabeth Hurley, sexy star of the original) is
quickly and effectively disposed of in the opening scene of The Spy Who
Shagged Me, paving the way for Austin Powers' (Mike Myers) new partner,
Felicity Shagwell (Heather Graham) who he meets in 1969.  You see,
Austin's archenemy Dr Evil (Mike Myers) has traveled back in time and
stolen his "mojo", the thing that gives him his super shagedelic powers.
Austin must not only regain his mojo but also save the world from
destruction, as Dr Evil has built what he calls a "death star" on the
moon (Evil's son, Scott, played by Seth Green, is well aware of his lack
of ability to choose an original name).
The film movies smoothly along, introducing a spectrum of quirky
characters.  Fat Bastard (Mike Myers again) is an obese evil spy;
Mini-Me (Verne Troyer) is Dr Evil's one-eighth replica; and Frau
Farbissina (Mindy Sterling) is Dr Evil's peculiar love interest (well,
sort of).  Memorable moments include cameos from Jerry Springer (who is
fortunate to star in one of the film's best scenes), Woody Harrelson and
Willie Nelson; a hilarious rendition of 'What if God Was One of Us'; and
a clever scene that utilizes silhouettes on the side of a tent.
Everything is directed with a good sense of bad taste by filmmaker Jay
Roach, who succeeds on both commercial and artistic levels.  The Spy Who
Shagged Me has a colorful and engaging visual feel that captures the
lively spirit of the swinging sixties perfectly, thanks to its costume
design and cinematography by Ueli Steiger (Godzilla).  This film is one
of the better sequels of late, and definitely one of the funniest
comedies I've seen for awhile.  It's a refreshing picture that reminds
you of how good it is to laugh, and laugh loudly.  How would I feel
about another sequel?  Groovy, baby.


Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
REVIEW: I Still Know What You Did Last Summer
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Jennifer Love Hewitt, Brandy, Mekhi Phifer, Matthew Settle,
Freddie Prinze Jr., Jennifer Esposito, Muse Watson, Bill Cobb
Director: Danny Cannon
Screenplay: Trey Callaway
Australian theatrical release: November 26, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 1
star
In Scream, the killers are teenagers who slice their way into the news,
loving every second of rampaging across town weary kooky white masks.
In Urban Legend (which has been slated for a January '99 release), one
particularly troubled college student decides to bring myths like
"there's an axe-murdered in your back seat" to life.  Upon the release I
Know What You Did Last Summer, audiences tried to guess the identity of
the murderer, examining the four central characters then moving back
into sub-characters, then sub-sub-characters.  The dire mistake that was
made in the script of IKWYDLS was that the killer - a man with a very
nasty hook - was none of these characters, and revealing his identity
was just as useful as a poke in the dark with a sharp stick.
Well, the man with the hook is back.  And he, um, isn't happy.  Surprise
surprise, Mandalay Entertainment is taking a stab at a movie franchise,
this time hiring director Danny Cannon and screenwriter Trey Callaway; a
completely different combination from the Jim Gillespie-Kevin Williamson
duo responsible for the original.  The only man of these four whose
contribution is credible (if not crucial) is Williamson, the sharp
writer behind Scream, Scream 2 and Halloween H20.  Even though his
script for IKWYDLS failed to remain as quick-witted as some of his other
efforts, there were at least two or three genuinely well-written scenes.
Its sequel has no such luck.
It is now two years since the original group of teenagers (one of them
the lovely Sarah Michelle Gellar) committed hit and run on an abandoned
highway, but Julie James (the even lovelier Jennifer Love Hewitt) has
not been able to shake it from her memory.  When Julie's best friend
Karla (Brandy, of TV's Moesha) wins an all expenses paid trip to the
Bahamas, they both take their respective boy friends along and get ready
for the time of their lives.  Little do they know, fisherman Ben Willis
(Muse Watson) is still out to get Julie for aiding in the near fatal
accident, and decides to gatecrash their party with a splurge of blood
and revenge.
There is nothing in I Still Know that hasn't been done better before.
The thought of a killing spree on a luxurious holiday island is quite
appealing, but the setting fails to enhance the film because the setting
is not necessary.  Visions of sun and surf diminish when the island is
tormented by an aggressive storm; so what is left looks sort of like
parts of the theme park in Jurassic Park.  At least something that the
original film did was make use of its urban surroundings - the beauty
pageant, the street parade, the clothing store - but nothing that its
sequel does seems to justify its need for doing so.
Jennifer Love Hewitt is yet again gorgeous to look at, this time in a
"I'm not gonna die on this island" sort of way.  She carries the film as
far as she can, but good-looking actors in teen slasher films rarely
have much to do except look the part. Brandy doesn't contribute anything
that couldn't be found in an episode of Moesha, and the rest of the cast
looks suitably silly in barely developed roles.
Those even vaguely familiar with the horror scene with recognize the
usual cinematic traits: uncomfortable music builds up for the kill or
the bluff, characters make the worst possible choices for their
survival, and the killer is seen without a disguise only at the very
end.  Every one of these elements are included in I Still Know, and
Cannon makes it all so formulaically that the film is almost a satire.
It definitely could have been one, if the screenplay had not deluged
itself in its own seriousness. One of the reasons why Scream worked so
well was that it wasn't afraid to take the piss out of itself on
occasion moments, keeping tongue-in-cheek with the audience and
subsequently remained witty and sly. Calloway's screenplay suggests no
such accomplishments in this flick, as I Still Know's story is developed
with bad timing and the sluggishness of an inexperienced writer.
I Still Know What You Did Last Summer is a cheap thrill.  It is designed
for audiences who want a shriek and a squeal, and nothing in particular
to keep in their memory.  Get inget out.  There are better killers to
watch.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Mouse Hunt (1997)
Here's a riddle: what do you get when two slow-witted men attempt to
invade a house manned by a solitary young boy?  The answer, of course,
is Home Alone.  All you need to do now is substitute the "young boy" for
"mouse," and you'll have a fairly good idea of what Mouse Hunt is all
about.
However, their is one major difference that separates the two films from
being distinctly alike: whilst the young lad in Home Alone set traps for
goofy villains, the mouse in Mouse Hunt simply avoids the ones set by
the invading men until they are stupid enough to fall for them
themselves.  This alone proves to be more amusing and much more enticing
than Home Alone's formula, and the same sort of physical comedy is
presented in an artistic and entertaining way that's bound to appeal to
both young and old.
It's the story of two greedy brothers. Ernie Smuntz (Nathan Lane) is a
professional chef who owns a high-class restaurant, and Lars Smuntz (Lee
Evans) works along side his father Rudolf Smuntz (William Hickey) in the
family string factory.  So when Rudolf dies, his string factory and an
apparently abandoned old mansion is left at the brothers' dispense.
They quickly ride off their new assets as worthless, and quickly stumble
into financial crisis.  Eventually, they discover that the old house was
in fact designed by a famous international architect and is worth
millions.  All they need to do to cash in is renovate the house.
There's just one problem: there's a mouse in the house.
Yes, this problem is more than laughable - but in no time Ernie and Lars
realize how serious the situation is and their money making scheme is
now in jeopardy.  This is when the real fun begins
Just as is expected from such a film, the two greedy brothers go to
absolute extremes to ensure that they do everything but kill the mouse.
In fact not only do they fail to succeed on all accounts, but they also
make themselves look like money seeking morons; and as their traps get
progressively more outrageous their hatred for this hairy critter grows
and grows.  But of course when they finally get the little rodent in
their hands, killing it seems to be a far too easy option
It is with a subtle cleverness and ingenious cartoony atmosphere that
unknown director Gore Verbinski has created in Mouse Hunt's zany
characters and their hilarious physical and intellectual comedy.  It's
definitely not your average kid's comedy; and if the advertising
previews are any incentive for you to give this one a miss then I
suggest you ignore them, run to your local cinema and let Mouse Hunt
refresh your idea of what an excellent family film really is.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Theres something a little unsettling about Will Hunting.  Sure  hes a genius
born on the wrong side of the tracks, with the IQ of Einstein and a PHD in being
a smart-ass.  But lets look at the situation seriously: Will is smart enough to
solve an equation that few people in the world are able to, but dumb enough to
continuously punch a guys head in when he can hear the cops a coming.  Not to
mention being caught for theft, fights and other fairly pathetic crimes.  He may
be able to recite word for word a chapter from a book and solve complicated
equations, but he doesnt seem to be quite so smart when it comes to simple
everyday actions and thoughts.  This is why he mucks up a good relationship with
his girlfriend, lands himself in a low paying job and fails to grasp the idea of
loving anybody but himself.
Will (Matt Damon) works as a cleaner at one of Americas prestigious schools.
When he secretly solves a complex maths problem written on a black board, maths
Professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgerd) attempts to track down the mystery
intellect.  But when he eventually discover who it is, Will has been arrested
and given a prison sentence.
Lambeau is able to convince the judge to free Will on two terms: that he spends
one day a week meeting with Lambeau and one day a week meeting with a therapist.
After quickly humiliating two shrinks (one in a hilarious afternoon delight
scene), he meets his match when introduced to the wise Sean McGuire (Robin
Williams).  Wills best mate (Ben Affleck) and new girlfriend (Minnie Driver)
also complicate his bewildered life.
The exquisite scenes of tense and ardent drama between Will and Sean are the
core of the film.  The rest of it, however, is a fairly ordinary story simply
told well.
Its been quite some time since Robin Williams has performed in such a mature
and robust way.  Many of his recent films (Flubber, Jumanji, Mrs Doubtfire) have
been laughable in more ways than one.  At last we have something that can stand
up against the microscope and exploit Williams skill; reassuring us that he is
indeed an actor capable to appeal to people above the age of twelve.
Good Will Hunting is fundamentally a fairly ordinary show.  Gus Van Sant (and
the films writers, Damon and Affleck) deserves credit, though, as what we have
here is a solid and clever concoction of socially aware drama.  But what could
have been a physiological battle of emotions gets tangled up with silly little
detours into childish relationships and situations.
Its good  yes, but Good Will Hunting does not match up to the hype which so
wholly surrounded it.   It shouldnt be known as the savoir of teen dramas, the
Oscar winner or the lavish masterpiece that perhaps something like Titanic is.
The thin line between good and great is often crossed in Good Will Huntings
duration  but only to find that it stabs itself in the foot when trying to be a
far too complete film.


Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
Veteran actor Tommy Lee Jones and rising film star Will Smith are now the 
coolest guys on the planet.  The best, last and only line of defense against 
the worst scum of the universe.  They work in secret and they dress in black.
They see things that we need not see, they be places that we need not be, so go 
what you like look at the Roswell crap, show up with the black suit because 
that's the men in, that the men in, that's the Men in Black (Movie Zone 
recommends purchasing the MIB soundtrack from your local music retailer).  
Ok, so the films got catchy music and special effects, an appealing plot and 
some fine Hollywood actors, so what else does it need to be a success?  Well 
nothing really, since the film has earned nearly 240 million dollars in the USA 
alone and is number 14 on the American all time highest grossing list.  But 
what could have been a really great movie was only a reasonably good movie.  
Confused?  Read on.
Working for a highly funded yet unofficial government agency is K (Tommy Lee 
Jones) and newly recruited J (Will Smith), who investigate and patrol 
extraterrestrial life on earth.  In no time they discover some wandering aliens 
(disguised as humans), and an intergalactic terrorist on a mission to 
assassinate the High Prince of Baltia (a high figure in the universe).  When 
the prince is killed and his most treasured possession falls into the wrong 
hands, one group of aliens take personal offense and threaten to destroy Earth 
if his "jewel" is not recovered.  So K and J find themselves find themselves 
racing against time to find the alien terrorist and recover his precious 
commodity in one intergalactic week (one hour).  Still dressed in black and 
ready for action, the coolest partners this side of the universe have the fate 
of Earth in their hands.
If there's one thing MIB does extremely well, it's the fun factor.  The various 
scenes that make up the film are clever, funny and go straight to the point so 
the audience is never losing interest or becoming bored.  Will Smith is a great 
credit to the movie, and supplies many hilarious one lines that fans will 
appreciate.  Perhaps the most dazzling part of MIB are its unmistakable special 
effects which launch creativity and imagination, and from small worm guys and a 
gruesome huge insect the aliens look like nothing ever done before.  It is 
however, a little too short - one hour and ten minutes really doesn't satisfy 
those waiting months to see it (MIB was probably the most hyped movie since 
Independence Day, which mysteriously also starred Will Smith).  Although the 
entire movie is of a high quality and is presented in a comic style way, MIB 
misses out on being the best of its kind, and what could have been something 
truly special just missed the mark.


Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
Believe it or not, the real Jackal lives to this day and is currently safely 
tucked away in a high security prison.  The 1973 film The Day of the Jackal was 
a critically acclaimed account of the true story of a professional assassin 
(code-named The Jackal), on a mission to kill the French president during the 
early 1960's.
Bruce Willis and Richard Gere star in the modern re-make The Jackal, which 
unfortunately is not historically accurate and only very distantly related to 
the original story.  
The Jackal (Bruce Willis) has been hired to kill an important figure in the US 
government. Declan Mulqueen (Richard Gere) is our hero in this story; who is an 
underground operative released from jail to help the FBI track down this deadly 
killer.  This is easier said than done, as The Jackal is a master of disguise 
and is constantly changing appearances and disappearing without a trace.  Along 
with the FBI's Deputy Director (Sidney Poitier) and a dedicated small team, 
Mulqueen must track down The Jackal before his job is complete - although his 
target, location and identity are unknown
For thrills and spills, The Jackal supplies plenty of impressive action scenes;
but any film that is related to a true story should make sure not to let what 
is popular control what is historically accurate.  This alone is the films 
biggest downfall, as it shows no respect or consideration for the 1973 hit - 
and thankfully through legal procedures the "Day of" was forcefully removed 
from the films title.  Even Edward Fox, who played the leading role in The Day 
of the Jackal, refused to have a cameo role for old time's sake. 
Director Michael Caton-Jones (Rob Roy, Memphis Belle) would have been far 
better off to have made The Jackal a stand alone film rather than delve into 
the harsh world of re makes, where anything that is made is automatically 
compared to its predecessor.  
What he has created, however, is highly entertaining action film that not only 
lets us witness an explosive screen duo but also shows Bruce Willis kissing 
(eep) another man. 


Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
8MM
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Joaquin Phoenix, James Gandolfini, Peter Stormare,
Christopher Bauer, Anthony Heald, Catherine Keener
Director: Joel Schumacher
Screenplay: Andrew Kevin Walker
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
If you're not sickened by Nicholas Cage's dark journey into the realms
of the hardcore porn industry, chances are you'll be intrigued by it.
Bit by bit, an authentic version of this illegitimate world is brought
to life with kinky detail by talented hack director Joel Schumacher.
Schumacher's last two films were the muddled messes Batman Forever and
Batman & Robin, but here he has at least proven himself capable of
following a structured story and making it entertaining.  With a script
from a writer of such gritty wit as Andrew Kevin Walker (who penned
Se7en), it would be hard not to make 8MM a success.
Unfortunately, Schumacher's direction sometimes flinches.  Whereas
Walker realizes the capacity for a disturbing but profound film,
Schumacher simply makes a thriller that is edgy enough to warrant a
sitting.  Although this film is a good example of why a director and
writer need to be on the same level, 8MM is nonetheless an amusing
full-throttle journey into places and characters that are rarely looked
at in movies.
"Dance with the devil and the devil doesn't change; the devil changes
you," a character tells Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage), who really should
have listened.  Welles is a private investigator who lives a normal
existence with a wife (Catherine Keener) and a baby daughter.  Welles is
called in by a billionaire widow to investigate the origin of an 8MM
pornographic film that depicts the killing of a young teenager.  His
task is to find out whether the film is real or not.  The case finds
Welles in society's darkest corners, and he is guided by Max (Joaquin
Phoenix), a streetwise adult bookstore clerk.  As the two become closer
to finding out who made the film and why, their lives are jeopardized as
they find themselves deep in a web of conspiracies and hidden truths.
Welles is a reasonable and caring man for a reason - he serves as a
contrast from the decent to the indecent.  When evil eventually comes
knocking on Welles' door, he desperately tries to find meaning in evil
acts, all the while surrounded by people who couldn't care less. One
despicable character answers Welles' question of "why" by stating "the
things I do - I do them because I like them. Because I want to...I
wasn't beaten as a child. I didn't hate my parents.''  His search for
meaning in evil is cleverly written by Walker, who doesn't fall into the
trap of making anything that he does seem acceptable (Payback, anyone?).
Evil corrupts, and as Welles searches for answers, he is ultimately led
to commit deeds similar to the ones he has been disgusted by.
Fascinating stuff, that's for sure.  What then would inspire the
producers to hand the directing reigns over to Joel Schumacher - a man
whose best attempts to illustrate psychological images is to portray
visual ones?  8MM looks dark and scary, but rarely feels it.  For every
bit of intrigue that Walker generates, Schumacher limits its success,
and regularly turns potentially disturbing scenes into merely sleazy
scenes.  It's a trade-off that isn't very fair, that's for sure - one
can't help but feel that David Fincher (Se7en, The Game) or even Brian
De Palma (Mission: Impossible, Snake Eyes) would have been more suited
to direct.  Still, with the help of the animated presence of Nicholas
Cage, Schumacher has made an admirable thriller despite what he has
missed out on.


Title
Review for Desperate Measures (1998)
REVIEW: Desperate Measures
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Theirs something about watching deranged, remarkably intelligent screen
criminals that appeals to me.  John Travolta blew me away as a crazed
villain in Broken Arrow, and Dennis Hopper made an eerie, repulsive
presence in Silence of the Lams.  Now Michael Keaton (who I always swore
looks a little crazy) plays possibly the most interesting bad guy so far
this year - a bloke with an IQ of 150 and a craving to kill.
Pete McCabe (Keaton) is a ruthless killer locked away inside a
maximum-security prison.  He "gets the chance to kill again" without
leaving the prison, if he refuses to transfer his bone marrow to a
compatible young boy (Joseph Cross) dying of Leukemia.  He eventually
agrees to the operation, purely for a chance to escape.  When the
surgery does not succeed as the boy's cop father Frank Connor (Andy
Garcia) would like to believe, he refuses to give up on his son and is
in hot pursuit of McCabe.
Although there are certain to be many skeptics, Michael Keaton worked
wonders for me as the ferocious, unyielding McCabe.  Keaton himself
seems so out of place in his role that it ends up beneficial to the
film - we can't predict his next move, because it seems so improvised
that he doesn't know himself.
Director Martin Barbet Schroeder (Single White Female) gives a sense of
solidarity to the film.  All scenes are cleverly interlaced, so that
when the final moment occurs, it feels as if we have experienced a
memorable thrill ride - even though we find ourselves in a similar
position as we were to start with.   This is perhaps the main reason why
Desperate Measures is better than most action films - it achieves some
clever footwork - but ironically, fails to improve on some of the most
common action film flaws.
To start with, Andy Gracia's performance is problematic.  The actor
himself is quite tuned in to the task (and, as I mentioned before, is
very realistic), but the plot's bumbling setup means that his character
will inevitably be caught up in a careless cat-and-mouse chase.  It's
careless because we rarely get to see Garcia and Keaton on the screen
together; on most occasions McCabe hatches his schemes from a distance
which minimizes the tension, and ultimately, interest.  Perhaps
Schroeder's intention was to create suspense so that when the characters
did meet towards the end, it would be a dynamic conclusion - but this
never properly works.  Arguably the most important scene, the final
confrontation on top of a nowhere-to-run-from bridge, completes skips
whatever chance it had to make an upbeat semi-finale.  The strange thing
this, the very last scene - where McCabe chats to a hospital guard -
caps off on an almost perfect, wonderfully twisted note.
This is indeed a bizarre mixture: textbook action sequences with
startlingly realistic performances.  But that's it for Desperate
Measures. It's sharp and well executed in what it does, but this
unfortunately is not much - and is often very unconvincing in its
science, and reason. We are not only expected to believe that McCabe is
the only person available with a compatible bone marrow, but also his
escape using a combination of different chemicals that looks like
something from MacGyver. What's next - give the man a paper clip so he
can destroy the hospital?  I wouldn't be surprised.
Desperate Measures,         although sometimes frustrating to watch, is
ultimately a pleasing flick.  Michael Keaton's performance is alone
worth the price of admission, and he has successfully added himself to
my favorite "deranged criminals" list.
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback

Mostly Movies:         http://welcome.to/mostlymovies
"How ironic - my crusade against television has come to an end so
formulaic it could have spewed from the power book of the laziest
Hollywood hack."  --Sideshow Bob
Subscribe to my movie reviews mailing list!  Simply reply to this email
with the subject as "Subscribe:newsletter"

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Cast: Jim Carrey, Laura Linney, Ed Harris, Noah Emmerich, Natascha
McElhone, Holland Taylor, Ted Raymond
Director: Peter Weir
Screenplay: Andrew Niccol
Australian theatrical release date: September 24
Who would have thought that two of this decade's most fascinating film
concepts have come from the same writer?  And that this writer, who uses
his craft as if he has worked with it for decades, has only these two
films under his belt.  Andrew Niccol wrote and directed 1997's Gattaca,
a scorching and nearly perfect science fiction film that seems to be
becoming science fact.  The Truman Show is equally interesting, but not
as complete or well crafted.  But it's still an excellent film, and
piles better than most mainstream counterparts.  In fact, the only thing
that Truman is missing is firm direction from its own mastermind.
Not that Australian Peter Weir doesn't do a good job, though.   The man
who directed such films as Witness and Gallipoli certainly has much
talent to offer; but Niccol seems eccentric and intelligent enough to
give a greater flair to his material. In that way, The Truman Show is a
little disappointing, but shows no faults that can't be overlooked, and
gives no moments that can't be enjoyed.
Truman Burbank (Jim Carrey) is the star of his own twenty-four hour
documentary-soap opera.  It's the longest and most popular television
show in history, shot in the world's largest studio, one of only two
man-made structures visible from space.  You see, Truman is unaware of
the thousands of cameras around him, filming every action and every word
in his life.  Ed Harris plays Christof, the show's creator, who is
partly a god, a director and a father.  The women in Truman's life are
his wife Meryl (Laura Linney) and Sylvia (Natascha McElhone) - who
Truman has always considered as the one who got away, as she was forced
to depart the set after attempting to tell Truman that everything around
him was fake.  Marlon (Noah Emmerich) is his best mate, whose answers to
life's problems are found in a six pack.
It would be hard for any director, Niccol or no Niccol, to hide the
fairly significant flaws in the plot fabric - especially since
everything is crammed into a neat little 100-minute package.  The story
board of The Truman Show is just about as demanding as they get, with
turns and developments at every corner, and the fact that it is a show
within a world far too obsessed with mass media hysteria automatically
adds another dimension to the film.
Christof is easily the most intriguing character; a man who treats
Truman with all the care and love of a father but does nothing that
would strip him of a good camera angle.  When Marlon tells Truman that
he "would never lie" to him, the irony of the moment is given upon
Christof's order to fade the television music out.  The whole world is
watching while two best mates express their emotions. Ed Harris gives
Christof a real kick and an impeccable performance, marred only by a few
lines of silly dialogue towards the end, when he tries to persuade those
around him that Truman would be happier inside his comfortable nest
rather than in the real world.  As Internet reviewer Bryan Frazer
stated, "for Truman, the real media-induced nightmare is outside of the
bubble, not inside."
It will come as a relief for many to know that, for the first time in
history, Jim Carrey doesn't play the over-actor. Carrey gives a
carefully subdued performance, allowing him to express his characters
actions with eccentricity but not over-acting, and there's a major
difference between the two.  The over-actor of the film is Laura Linney,
who gives a google-eyed over impersonation of a cheesy sitcom character,
and ends up looking out of place and faintly idiotic.
Not surprisingly, The Truman Show ends with a happy conclusion.  It's
not a complete one, though, since many characters seem to fade out of
existence.  This is perhaps Andrew Nicoll's only error in his
screenplay, as his carefully placed characterizations of the show's
actors seem to vanish into television fuzz.  But it's really Truman's
piece, and as he concludes his soul-searching journey, one can't help
but be emotionally attached to this wonderfully complex yet distinctly
humane character.
More than anything else, Weir seems determined to make his thoughts
about the irony of world's media clear.  As the final moments draw to a
close, we realize that there will always be an audience for the next
Truman Show, and that the people who cheered for his freedom are the
same who supported the show over its many years.  For this fetching
notion to be any more intriguing, inventive or prosperous, it would have
taken its own mastermind to direct it.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
Hiring Gus Vant Sant to direct a 90's version of Alfred Hitchcock's
Psycho makes just about as much sense as hiring Pauly Shore to play
Norman Bates.  Hitchock had more than thirty years of experience in the
suspense/thriller genre before he tackled Psycho, and the result was the
work of a true genius.  Van Sant, on the other hand, has had about as
third of that with mostly drama, and his result is something much less
spectacular.  No doubt David Fincher (Se7en, The Game) or Brian De Palma
(Mission: Impossible, Snake Eyes) would probably have made a better
film, but Hitcock's mesmerizing original is not the kind of experience
that can be adequately duplicated.  The reason, of course, is that it is
no longer the 1960's!
Could you imagine what a scene by scene remake of The Wizard of Oz would
be like? It wouldn't work, and it wouldn't work because the era in which
it reflected has long surpassed. The 90's have been the domicile for
some smart horror films (the Scream series, the Italian gem Dellamorte
Dellamore, and a few more) and countless others drenched in sex appeal.
Psycho is not sex-crazed nor is it incredibly smart; it is a dark and
mysterious story with a clever twist at its climax.  Therefore one might
presume that Psycho in the 90's has a restricted audience, and some
horror fans will no doubt have trouble accepting that there are no shots
of Jennifer Lover Hewitt's breasts nor any fun self-satire.  The film is
old fashioned, and in the process of carefully re-creating it step by
step, Van Sant seems to have forgotten to package Pyscho for a 90's
audience, consequently missing the excitement and thrill of Hitchcock's
60's package.
The recent A Perfect Murder, a remake of Hitchcock's Dial M for Murder,
was not a great film or even a good one - but it at least took advantage
of a modern setting.  Now that the thrill of Norman Bates' demented mind
has gone, Pyscho in the 90's loses it intrigue.  Van Sant hasn't remade
it so much as he has copied it, and the only real reason why this film
is not a total disaster is the charm and simplicity of the original,
which often shines through.
Working girl Marion Crane (Anne Heche) is presented with $400,000 from
her employee to deposit in a bank.  Naturally, she decides to split town
with the loot and start a new life.  When night falls and rain floods
the road ahead of her, Marion pulls off the highway and stops at the
secluded Bates Motel.  Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn) runs the Motel, and
is immediately attracted to Marion, although his sick mother forbids any
relationships. Marion unpacks and takes a shower, and some unlikely
events unfold
One interesting thing that I didn't notice with the original Psycho was
how heavily the film relied on Bates to make an intriguing central
character. It is then a big disappointment that Vince Vaughn is terribly
miscast.  Though he acts the part well, Vaughn is physically
inappropriate for the role, always looking far too menacing.  Instead of
portraying a mentally unstable, seemingly harmless character that
Anthony Perkins did so well in the original, Vaughn looks like a killer
from the start.
Those who haven't seen the original should by all means have the
opportunity to see Psycho on a big screen.   A smarter choice would have
been to clean up the original print and ship it into as many cinemas as
possible.  Grease did that in 1998, and it worked as a retrospective
look at a classic movie.  It makes no sense to keep a 60's product as
the foundation for a 90's one, even if such a movie has survived as one
of the greatest of its genre for almost forty years.  Van Sant's Psycho
manages to keep a reasonable level of suspense throughout, and as I
mentioned before, the original screenplay has too much charm and
simplicity not to let any leak through into its remake.  But lets face
it, a far superior version of Psycho has always been available in the
90's - located in the classics section of your local video store.  If
you haven't seen it, see it.  It's also probably a good choice to avoid
any future Van Sant remakes, who knows - Lawrence of Arabia might be
next.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or for any inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
PAYBACK
Cast: Mel Gibson, Maria Bello, Gregg Henry, James Coburn, Kris
Kristofferson, William Devane, David Paymer, Deborah Kara Unger
Director: Brian Helgeland
Screenplay: Terry Hayes and Brian Helgeland based on The Hunter by
Richard Stark
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
"Get ready to root for the bad guy," trumpet Payback's advertising
taglines.  With a mean spirit and a bad temper, Mel Gibson returns to
form in a film that is so nasty it's almost refreshing.  The film's dark
and cynical edge is driven by Terry Hayes and Brian Helgeland's
screenplay (based on The Hunter by Richard Stark), and Helgeland also
directs with a similarly edgy style.  The scripting bears similarities
to Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels in its cleverness and wit; both
films consistently keep themselves two steps ahead of their audiences.
But also like Lock, Stock, Payback's screenplay is responsible for its
only major downfall.  Character and meaning are afterthoughts, whilst
violence and brutality take center stage.
Surprisingly, the film gels quite nicely.  The combination of
Helgeland's hostile direction and Gibson's eccentric title performance
is a winning one.  Gibson especially seems to relish the opportunity of
playing a bad guy.  A really bad guy.
In fact, in the first ten minutes or so of Payback we've already
witnessed Porter (Gibson) take money off a street beggar, steal
cigarettes from a waitress, and take advantage of some poor guys credit
card.  You see, after a money heist, Porter's partner Val (Gregg Henry)
and wife Lynn (Deborah Kara Unger) double cross him - they shoot him in
the back and leave him for dead.  Much to their disgust, Porter soon
makes it known to them that he is indeed live and well, and thirsty for
revenge.  The tough Porter is now even tougher, and he will do
absolutely anything to win back his share of the loot.
I could complain about Payback's lack of heart and emotion, but I guess
that would be missing the point.  No doubt both Brian Helgeland and Mel
Gibson intended to create something different, something that could
separate itself from the many other blood-soaked crime capers.  In that
way, Payback is a success, though that's not to say it is totally
original.  The film borrows bits and pieces from other films and gives a
fresh spin on them.  Although the old cigarette dropped on petrol trick
has been done numerous times before, it seems irresistible when
performed by Gibson.   There is something about watching a cuddly
Hollywood star trapped inside a vividly portrayed world of crime that
immediately captivates.
Although flawed with a script that is too clever for its own good,
Payback provides great light entertainment.  In fact, I was often so
amused by this film that I became frustrated knowing that the inevitable
would come - an ending that really doesn't satisfy.  By the time that
Payback reels through its final few scenes, it is obvious that the film
is too weak on plot and characters to make it a memorable flick.  It is
also obvious, though, that almost all of Payback is immensely enjoyable.
"I saw weird stuff in that place last night.  Weird, strange, sick,
twisted, eerie, godless, evil stuff.  And I want in."  -Homer Simpson

Title
Review for Two Hands (1999)
TWO HANDS
Cast: Heath Ledger, Rose Byrne, Bryan Brown, David Field, Susie Porter,
Tom Long, Tony Forrow, Mariel McClorey, Evan Sheaves, Steven Vidler
Director: Gregor Jordan
Screenplay: Gregor Jordan
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
The mid-to-late 90's obsession with urban crime fables has resulted in
some sensational efforts, most of which aspire to the success -
artistically and commercially - of a Quentin Tarantino movie.  I never
expected that the Australian film industry, famous for its quirky and
simple-minded films, would enter the realm of these violent and often
darkly humorous pieces of in-your-face entertainment.  The film in
question is 'Two Hands,' an engaging and often intense picture that is
fresh, lively and different to the norm.  Debut writer/director Gregor
Jordan finds a pulsating energy in his production elements - ranging
from the cast's diverse appeal to the film's bright cinematography, it's
clear that this one is out to impress.  Impress it does, and in large
abundance.  'Two Hands' is a breath of fresh air for the Australian film
industry; a fun adrenaline rush that will probably linger in your memory
for some time.
Rising Aussie star Heath Ledger plays Jimmy, who works in Kings Cross,
Sydney, as a street promoter for a strip club.  Hoping to improve his
salary and his work, Jimmy accepts a job from neighborhood goon Pando
(Bryan Brown).  He is given $10,000 in an envelope and an address to
deliver it to, but, as the plot unfolds, the job goes drastically wrong,
and Jimmy is being chased all over town by Pando and his goons.  Still,
he makes sure that he has enough time to pursue love-interest Kate (Rose
Byrne), a friendly art student who enjoys taking photos.  Also involved
in the story are two homeless kids, played by Mariel McClorey and Evan
Sheaves, who have small but integral parts, and serve as tools in which
to question audience morality.
It seems inevitable that titles like 'Pulp Fiction' and 'Lock, Stock and
Two Smoking Barrels' will be mentioned in a review of this film, for
their obvious familiarities in genre filmmaking.  'Two Hands,' like
these films and many more, is distinctive in its own way.  For starters,
the film has an obvious Australian touch to it - the dialogue is laid
back and relaxed, the settings are not glamorous or appealing.  The
screenplay doesn't delve into stories and debates like 'Pulp Fiction',
and its editing doesn't produce the clockwork pacing that made 'Lock,
Stock and Two Smoking Barrels' fast and furious.  There is something
different here, a kind of new texture to the genre.  'Two Hands' doesn't
constantly try to win audiences over, it simply follows its narrative to
the end without glancing back to notice whether we were still watching.
Chances are, you will be.  'Two Hands' is a bold drama wrapped around a
comedic lesson of morals, wrapped around a simple, even slightly messy
thriller. Gregor Jordan captivates his audience time and time again,
reaching a good mixture of amusing gags and fast action.  What he
doesn't create is a film that is engaging as a whole, but rather one
that has plenty of memorable and amusing scenes and subplots.  It's
bound to be a crowd pleasing movie, and contains enough jags and
recurring plot elements to keep the viewers who don't find the central
plot interesting still amused.
Heath Ledger struts his stuff so confidently as the title character that
there is absolutely no doubt that we will be seeing him again in the
future (in fact, in his next film, he plays Mel Gibson's son).  I'm not
sure whether he channeled that energy into a good performance, though
it's certainly an entertaining one.  Bryan Brown also fares very well as
the married, and quite amusing tough guy Pando.  Others are slightly
less impressive, like Rose Byrne, who is solid but her part is
considerably underdeveloped, probably as a result of the film's
ninety-two minute running time.  Come to think of it, that's an odd
choice for a running time in a film of this nature - the story unfolds
fairly slowly (although its never boring), and even then, there's some
unnecessary bits like its narration by Jimmy's dead brother.  'Pulp
Fiction,' which I've refused to mention too much in this review, was
almost double its length.  Perhaps 'Two Hands' could have benefited from
a little more meat.
But there's still so much here to like. Jordan's direction is
multi-layered with impressive production elements; the cinematography,
the music, the camera shots and the editing all give the film a truly
cinematic feel.  The jokes - I wished there was more of them - are funny
and memorable.   'Two Hands' is a likeable film that isn't original
enough to become a cult classic, but a damn good time at the movies.
Sometimes you don't get everything, but sometimes, you just enjoy what
you've got.


Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
ROUNDERS
Cast: Matt Damon, Edward Norton, Gretchen Mol, Martin Landau, John Malkovich,
John Turturro, Famke Janssen, Vernon E. Jordan Jr., Melina Kanakaredes,
Michael Rispoli
Director: John Dahl
Screenplay: David Levien & Brian Koppelman
Australian theatrical release: January 28, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 
3 stars
When gambling isn't used to illustrate amazing streaks of luck, it is often
used in association with society's criminals and lowlifes.    Well there are
plenty of criminals and lowlifes in Rounders, a film that is careful to keep
its priorities in the right order.  Card games and risky bets take the
spotlight, but the harsh game of surviving in a world full of crooks always
seems significantly more important.  When players take to the table in the
desperate hope of winning some serious dough, Rounders provides great
entertainment.  Away from the table, however, a compelling dramatic core is
missing.
Mike McDermott (Matt Damon) learns the valuable lessons of playing high-stake
card games the hard way.  One night he plays against Russian card shark KGB
(John Malkovich, in a role that seems a little too easy for him) and loses a
cool thirty grand.  So from then on, Mike works hard in legitimate jobs,
swearing that he will never return to the gambling table again.  But when his
loser best friend Worm (Edward Norton) is released from jail, Mike is dragged
into the game once again in order to help Worm repay his debts.  
One refreshing aspect of Rounders is that it treats its subject matter with
respect.  Not endorsing gambling yet not discouraging it either, the film
chronicles a realistic (though somewhat sensational) account of two men's
triumphs and misfortunes.  It not only examines gambling as a hobby and a
sport, but as a way of life - as a source for putting bread on the table.
John Turturro is given the difficult task of portraying the only sensible
gambler, a man who "grinds" the game by playing smart and playing safe.
Turturro has a knack for taking simple characters and giving them complexity
(Exhibit A, Barton Fink, Exhibit B, Quiz Show), and serves as an integral
(although small) part in Rounders.  As Mike and Worm welcome the chaos that
eventually engulfs them, Turturro's character stands strong and tall, silently
knowing that although he has taken a smaller spotlight, he has outplayed both
of them.
Matt Damon is solid in the lead role but is overshadowed by some terrific
performances from the supporting cast.  Norton plays Worm with sleaziness and
extravagance, but also brings an eerie sense of repression and sadness.
Malkovich and Turturro are excellent, and Gretchen Mole (playing Mike's
girlfriend Jo) is also fine, although debut scriptwriters David Levien and
Brian Koppelman have written her part predictably and blandly.
Director John Dahl has an obvious fascination with professional gambling.  On
numerous occasions Rounders feels like a fun documentary on the sport, with
human diversions along the way. It is then disappointing that Dahl rarely
gives his gambling scenes more than just visual interest.  As Matt Damon says
during the film, the game is not about playing the cards, its about playing
the people. Dahl shoots card scenes much better than he examines characters.
The success of the drama between Mike and Worm is off and on, whilst Mike's
relationship with Jo is purely a tool to get a female actor into the picture.
The writing and direction of Rounders is impressive, but the sports side of
the picture is so much better than its dramatic side that the film becomes
unbalanced in the quality of its scenes.  Whilst Rounders occasionally touches
on themes with meaning and relevance, this is ultimately just a good and
enjoyable sports film.  Had it focused a little more on the players, it may
have been great one.


Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
A CIVIL ACTION
Cast: John Travolta, Robert Duvall, Tony Shalhoub, William H. Macy,
Zeljko Ivanek, James Gandolfini, Bruce Norris, John Lithgow, Kathleen
Quinlan, Stephen Fry, Dan Hedaya
Director: Steven Zaillian
Screenplay: Steven Zaillian based on the book by Jonathan Harr
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
I'm not sure what message Steven Zaillian is trying to give us in his
new film, A Civil Action.  Zaillian adapted Schindlers List and
Searching For Bobby Fischer for the screen, and once again he has shown
considerable talent in his take on the true story of lawyer Jan
Schlichtmann, a man who gives up everything in his search for justice,
only to realize that justice cannot be measured in dollars.  The film
should have been character based, but unfortunately it is based almost
entirely on Schlichtmann's complicated legal case and how he and his
business partners go broke trying to prove the truth.  But as Robert
Duvall tells John Travolta, truth is not something that is found in a
courtroom.  Perhaps this cynical view on the American legal system is
what Zaillian is getting at, but I'm still not sure.  He also has
something to say about compensation, justice and moral order, though
none of these issues are voiced with adequate emotional depth.
Schlichtmann's case centers on a tragedy that deprived eight families -
living in the small American town of Woburn - of their children.  They
say this is due to Woburn's water supply, which has allegedly been
poisoned by riverside factories. Schlichtmann is at first reluctant to
take up the case, but sees dollar signs after discovering that major
corporations are involved.  With the help of his dedicated small team of
employees - including financial advisor James Gordon (William H. Macy,
in yet another excellent small role) - Schlichtmann attempts to bring
the big guys to their knees.  He faces veteran attorney Jerome Facher
(Robert Duvall), an expert with considerably more experience under his
belt, and ends up delving far too deep in the case, landing his company
in serious financial trouble.
A Civil Action is yet another vehicle that showcases John Travolta's
dominant presence, although he is not eccentric here.  Travolta has
channeled and refined himself and his performance is tamer than what you
might expect.  He is a pleasing actor and this is a pleasing part,
although the script rarely gives him the chance of grasping emotion.
Robert Duvall is expected to give the film its energy, but again the
script doesn't properly utilize his capabilities. With such a talented
cast, it's a pity that A Civil Action doesn't benefit from any of them
except perhaps Macy, who provides the only character I could clearly
relate to.  As his financial world tumbles down around him, Gordon
confronts Schlichtmann in an excellent scene that expresses the
arrogance of Travolta's lawyer perfectly - he can fight crusades, but
what gives him the right to bring his friends down with him?
Like so many others, A Civil Action is pretentious because it tells an
important story without building a solid dramatic core on which to stage
it.  Though it is often involving, often engaging and occasionally
moving, this is ultimately a heartless piece that is too focused on
facts and too little on character. If you don't mind a courtroom caper
that is so stripped of emotion that it often feels like a documentary, A
Civil Action's coherent screenplay and steady performances will keep you
ignorant of its faults.  There is material for a potentially excellent
film here, but one can't help but feel that Steven Zaillian has taken
the easy way out on too many occasions.  Instead of examining tragedy
and what it means to those involved, he examines courtroom procedures.
Instead of looking into the hearts and minds of characters that are
fighting for truth, he merely studies the truth itself.  One might say
that A Civil Action could have been a lot worse - that's true, but my
main complaint is that it could have been a lot better.


Title
Review for Mrs. Brown (1997)
The attraction of love is a powerful thing.  In the tale of Queen Victoria and 
an extravagant veteran servant, awkwardly titled "Mrs Brown," we are reminded 
of a value lesson.  For when the word love is mentioned, we immediately think 
of marriages and intimate relationships.  But the love and attraction 
highlighted in Mrs Brown is not the kind found in sex or marriage; rather in 
the wonder and bondage of a true friendship.
During the lengthy reign of Queen Victoria (Judi Dench), her majesty went 
through a period of deep grief and depression after the death of her beloved 
husband Albert. Disappearing from public view and perception, the secretive and 
distressed Queen has lost confidence in her role as leader of the country.  
Entering her life is John Brown (Billy Connolly), a loyal yet outspoken servant 
that devotes his life to giving the Queen confidence and protection at any 
cost.  Over the following couple of years the two become immersed in friendship 
and drawn together with a powerful attraction.  The Queen is not an attractive 
woman, but her power and stand in society is, and although both of them realize 
and even consider the costs of having an affair, the intimate boundaries of 
their friendship prevents them from doing so.  Behind her back, the Queen is 
dubbed as "Mrs. Brown."
Whilst this relationship is taking place, England is not benefiting from the 
Queen's seemingly eternal absence from public view.  So as the monarchy beings 
to fall into crisis, Prime Minister Disraeli (Anthony Sher) realizes that Brown 
is the key to refreshing faith in the crown.
Mrs. Brown can surely be considered as an elegant and graceful film, but it 
quickly finds itself trying too hard to make us care for the relationship 
between the Queen and Brown, which ultimately falls flat on its face as soon as 
we are witness to the Queen's uninspiring and emotionless personality.  The 
film's dialogue doesn't give Judi Dench any chance to get into her distressing 
role, so naturally when the Queen enters the scene Mrs Brown takes a tumble 
into an almost non existent level of interest.
Billy Connolly, responsible for picking up the pieces of a fairly weak film, is 
an absolute revelation and refreshes the audience with a touch of well placed 
humor and a diligent presence on the screen.  For those of you who don't know, 
he is actually a stand up comedian - so if you thought that casting him as John 
Brown would be like casting Jerry Seinfeld as Hamlet, think again.
The finest part of Mrs Brown's awkwardly crafted collection of scenes is just 
near the end, yet ironically the final scenes of the film are among the worst. 
 They seem incredibly rushed and hastily put together; so as the lights in the 
cinema were becoming brighter I was left gazing at the credits asking myself - 
"Did I miss something?"
Another main problem with the film, and call me what you will, is that it's 
just not interesting enough.  I don't have anything against historical and 
periodic stories, but Mrs. Brown proved too bland and often much too dull to 
keep me eagerly watching.  There are two ways that the production crew could 
have addressed this problem - either alter history to suit the film's needs 
(which, thankfully, they did not do) or to change the focus of the story to a 
more interesting character or setting.  So in this case, I would have been 
delighted if Mrs. Brown had shown us much more of Billy Connolly's intriguing 
character rather than monotonous Queen who doesn't tantalize any climatic taste 
buds.  
But overall, Mrs Brown is an entertaining period film that could have been much 
more than what it amounted to be, and the main problem lies in the relationship 
between the Queen and Brown that never really works.  More often then not the 
film appears to be emotionless and cold; which should never be related to a 
film so caught up in love and loyalty.
For a film originally made for British TV, the idiot box would be an ideal 
place to showcase this slightly disappointing drama.


Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
PLEASANTVILLE
Cast: Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Jeff Daniels, Joan Allen,
William H. Macy, J.T. Walsh, Don Knotts, Marley Shelton, Jane Kaczmarek
Director: Gary Ross
Producers: Jon Kilik, Robert J. Debus, Steven Soderbergh, Gary Ross
Screenplay: Gary Ross
Cinematography: John Lindley
Music: Randy Newman
Running time: 116 minutes
Australian distributor: Village Roadshow
Australian theatrical release: February 25, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and a half stars
Towards the end of Pleasantville - one of the most life affirming films
you're likely to see - two characters paint on the side of a local
police station.  Their vibrantly colored portrait depicts classic novels
with wings attached to them, flying above a bonfire that was intended to
destroy them.  Like the film, this picture is a metaphor for cultural
progression.  When there are so many films nowadays that look at our
modern world in a negative light, here is one that displays advancement
as something positive.
Would the world be a better place if it were based in a cheesy 50's
sitcom, where dinner is always on the table, husbands and wives sleep in
different beds, and teenagers hold hands at lovers lane?  Welcome to
Pleasantville, a quaint town that is, literally, black and white.  Two
teenagers - David (Toby Maguire) and Jennifer (Reece Witherspoon) - get
magically transported from the dangerous 90's to the mellow world of
Pleasantville via the usage of a strange TV remote control.  "We're,
like, stuck in nerdville," Jennifer exclaims.
Naturally, the film takes time to cash in on some jokes.  The word
"fire" means nothing to the fire brigade; their idea of an emergency is
rescuing a cat from a tree.  The local basketball team has never missed
a shot, no one has ever heard of the word sex, and the school's library
books are full of blank pages.  Like in Dark City (and, to a lesser
extent, The Truman Show), the residents of Pleasantville see nothing
strange about the way they live - they have accepted the reality given
to them.  At one moment, Jennifer asks a teacher what is outside of
Pleasantville, just to hear "I don't understand" in response.
Before the jokes become tiresome, Pleasantville becomes darker in tone
during its second half.  As Toby and Jennifer (known in town as Bud and
Mary Sue) initiate change in the society, things begin to turn into
color.  Most adults are unwilling to adhere to these new elements,
except soda shop owner Mr. Johnson (Jeff Daniels, in one of his best
roles in years) who has a dream to paint, and Toby and Jennifer's TV
mother Betty (Joan Allen), a likeable woman who craves more excitement
in her life.  Pleasantville mayor Bob (the late J.T Walsh, in his last
film performance) is especially determined to maintain old traditions.
Although Pleasantville begins as a light-headed comedy, it ends up
examining important issues of prejudice, rebellion, change and honor.
That is quite a lot to cram into 116 minutes, but debut director Gary
Ross (writer of Big and Dave) does it with style.  As color contrasts
with black and white, Pleasantville becomes a visual sensation.  It may
be the screenplay (also by Ross) that provides the film with its wit,
humor and emotion, but the special effects certainly play a large part
in reaching out to viewers.  It's hard not to be entranced by the image
of a single red rose amongst a black and white screen, or
Pleasantville's first ever fire (luckily, David shows the firemen how to
put it out).  This burning tree is quite a sight.
Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon have enough charm and interest to
make the two titles roles really work.  Witherspoon's Jennifer is at
first a sex crazed and self absorbed rebellious teenager, but she
gradually matures into a more respectable person.  Witherspoon makes
that transformation believable, and so does Maguire as his character
discovers the thrill of taking risks.  Jeff Daniels has a soft and
placid part, but his character is meaningful and, at times, almost
poignant.  Mr. Johnson's love for painting is understandable, and the
condemnation of his work by some of the town residents seems tragic.
William H. Macy (who regularly plays small parts) rarely catches my eye
as an exceptional performer, but here he does.  Macy's character (David
and Jennifer's TV father) is the only reason why we can relate to the
people who don't want Pleasantville to change.  They are happy living
controlled and repetitive lives, where their surroundings remain dull
but peaceful.
Pleasantville is a truly original film that soars with energy and
beauty.  It has deep meaning and relevance in today's society, and
should serve as a reminder for most that the world is made up of how its
residents think and act.  "You can't stop something that's inside you,"
says David, and that could be a summation of all that Pleasantville
stands for.  I was touched and inspired by this film, and for all the
right reasons.  Although Ross occasionally directs with a little too
much simplicity (his use of symbolism is usually quite obvious),
Pleasantville never complicates or intimidates its audience.
Imaginative, moving and entertaining, this marvelous Hollywood product
should be a prime example of how special effects can be used to aid a
story, and not the other way around.  It would be silly for me to point
out that films like Pleasantville are seldom found - that much is
obvious.


Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Cast: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Lisa Bonet,
Loren Dean, Ian Hart, Jake Busey, Barry Pepper, Jason Lee, Gabriel
Byrne, Tom Sizemore
Director: Tony Scott
Screenplay: David Marconi
Australian theatrical release: January 7, 1999
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
It is always a good sign that a thriller is working when you start to
believe that anything happening on the screen is something that could
happen to you.  Achieving this much is not an easy task for anyone, so
you can imagine my surprise when Tony "Top Gun" Scott, Will Smith and a
writer with only one previous film under his belt managed to pull it
off.  Not only that, but they've also done a darn good job.  Scott's
tense direction of David Marconi's paranoid and upbeat screenplay gives
the film structure, whilst a bunch of strong performances from a
talented cast give it character.
In fact, I found it amazing that Scott was able to make his three lead
actors - Will Smith, Gene Hackman and Jon Voight - work so well.  Smith
tackles an out of character "serious" role and finds stable ground as
the film's anchor.  Although Hackman is rarely powerful, his work in
Enemy of the State is not to be underestimated.  And as for Jon Voight,
he is finally back to the standard he set in Mission Impossible, once
again reprising his role as everybody's least popular character (the
smug villain).
A mob goon gives Robert Clayton Dean (Will Smith) a tricky choice: fork
over some valuable information or get killed before the week's end.  You
can understand why this threat soon becomes the least of Dean's worries
after he finds himself unwittingly involved in something a little more
serious - a national conspiracy involving the work of shady NSA
(National Security Association) bureaucrat Thomas Reynolds (Jon Voight).
Reynolds is not your typical bad guy as he has a team of computer geeks
ready to do his dirty work for him, using the latest in computer
technology to hunt down and monitor anybody they please.  Everything
soon gets a little too much for Dean, as he begins to lose his loved
ones and eventually gets framed for murder.  Luckily for him, he
stumbles across a technological expert known as "Brill" (Gene Hackman),
and they eventually form an unlikely friendship as they try to escape
the inevitable showdown with Reynolds.
No doubt this is Brian De Palma and David Fincher territory.  Although
Scott can't find as much intrigue or suspense with his material as
Fincher did in The Game, he packs a lot of excitement into action
sequences.  There are two lengthy chase scenes that hold viewers'
attention for so long that watching them becomes uncomfortable.  The
first of these scenes sets a high standard for the rest of the film, and
features Chasing Amy's Jason Lee on the run from NSA goons.
Cinematographer Daniel Mindel captures the intensity of these moments
with deliberately computerized visuals.  When the "satellite cam" is
activated, he gives a refreshing new view of what is going on, and
reminds us of how big the characters are in comparison to the massive
modern world surrounding them.
With a running time of 140 minutes, it must be said that Enemy of the
State is not a good example of efficiency.  Will Smith's character is
casually developed for quite a lengthy amount of time before he finds
himself in extraordinary situations.  That is an interesting choice,
because many directors prefer to develop their characters when they are
placed outside of their comfortable environs (like in 1997's very clever
Breakdown, and Oliver Stone's U-Turn).  However Smith works well and so
does his character, and even cynics have to admire the way he has
successfully ditched his trademark supporting characters - aliens and
motor-mouth cops (at least for the time being).  In the transformation,
Smith has lost none of his charm, and now gives authenticity to his
presence.
If I could edit out any part of Enemy of the State, I'd get rid of its
prologue.  In this dreary opening scene, we are shown exactly what the
NSA will go to all lengths to protect.  Had Tony Scott revealed it to us
bit by bit, Enemy of the State might have become just that little bit
more clever.
But cleverness really isn't a problem when you take into account all
that Enemy of the State achieves.  Faults in the story and exaggerated
scenarios can be excused, since this film accomplishes the difficult
task of yielding an atmospheric, paranoid and thrilling version of our
modern world.  And even more impressive than that, Tony Scott makes
every inch of it believable.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
Been there, done that, seen this, seen that.  This seems to be the
attitude that many filmgoers share regarding one of the most well known
yet over done movie genres ever - action.  Can you blame them?  Well
after hundreds of tiring Van Damne/Bruce Willis style movies, I hardly
think so.  But what is this - a light at the end of a long, dark tunnel?
Maybe, just maybe, I've found the first proper action film equal to The
Rock.
If you think you know what on screen action is, wait until you see it
John Woo style.  Beginning as a popular Chinese film director, Woo's
talents were recognized as something truly special, and it was just a
matter of time until he entered the Hollywood scene.  And when he did,
he not only left a mark of excellence but also set incredibly high
standards for the industry after his successful creations Hard Target,
Broken Arrow and now Face/Off.  What's so special, you ask, about his
work?  Well Woo surely goes where no director has ever been before, and
finds himself working the movie into unpredictable, incredibly
suspenseful scenes of man to man conflict and a host of other small
surprises.  However the greatest part of his films is not these
mesmerizing scenes, but the fact that he never loses site of the big
picture - which keeps the films running slick and smooth all the way
through.
Woo's latest film, Face/Off, restores faith in the action genre and
gives audiences something to chant and rave for, with the performances
of John Travolta and Nicholas Cage worth the price of admission alone.
Just as the suspense thriller Scream made up for decades of pathetic
horror films, Face/Off does exactly the same thing with action films,
making it a worthy addition to anyone's ticket collection.  Never before
has an action duo looked so good on the silver screen.  Never before has
the good guy worn the bad guys face.  Never before have I apologized to
the person sitting next to me for cheering for the wrong guy.
His names Castor Troy (Cage), and he's the slickest, most cool bad dude
since Bobba Fett of Star Wars.  Surrounded by weapons, henchmen, drugs
and good looking women, Troy's career is exactly the way he wants it - a
whole lot of fun.  On the other side of the spectrum is Sean Archer
(Travolta) an FBI agent who has perused Troy for six years after he
accidentally assassinated his infant son while aiming for Sean.  Archer,
basing his whole life around trapping Troy, is all too glad to hear that
his mentor is in town and rushes out to catch him in the early minutes
into the film.  But after finally beating Troy at his own game and
sending him into a coma, more bad news is ahead.  Archer soon discovers
that Troy rigged up a bomb that will blow Los Angeles's to pieces, and
only one person knows the location of it - Troys half witted brother
(who bears a striking resemblance to Radar off Mash).  After Archer
fails to make Troys gang spill the beans, he is left with only one
option - to enter the prison looking like Troy so he can find the
location from his brother.  A plastic surgeon removes the faces of both
Archer and Troy so that the FBI agent assumes the identity of his
nemesis so he can prevent a disastrous detonation.
As far as a twist in the plot is concerned, the one coming up is a
beauty.  When Archer is busy getting used to being inside the master
criminals body, Troy wakes up from his comer on the wrong side of the
bed - not at all happy with the fact that he is without a face.
However after making a few firm phone calls, his henchmen come running
to the scene and force the surgeon to put the only face on Troy that is
available - Archer's.  Assuming his identity, Troy couldn't be happier
with the situation after burning all evidence that a face transplant
ever existed and eagerly getting to know Archer's wife Eve (Joan Allen).
Trapped inside each other's bodies, the two arch enemies discover things
about each other that they never knew could exist such as family
commitments and a clash of different identities inside different
identities.  But in no time the showdowns become blood baths of action
and gripping suspense courtesy of Woo's guiding hand, which can be
described as nothing less than brilliant.  The action scenes are quite
obviously the height of the film, giving fans of both actors a great
time as they witness them playing both the good guy and the bad guy for
the first time.
Although I admit that the whole idea of such a farcical transplant is
laughable, not for one second can you look back on the film and
criticize it for attempting something original and entertaining.  A
silly idea, yes, but the entire movie is crafted so well that it is
easily forgotten in a mess of action that is unmistakably the best we've
seen so far this year.
Face/Off is quite honestly an outstanding look at what can be achieved
with even the most ridiculed and overused Hollywood genre, and delivers
non stop slabs of action that will glue you to your seat in
anticipation.  This film truly is top class, and never before has action
looked this good.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
ANALYZE THIS
Cast: Robert De Niro, Billy Crystal, Lisa Kudrow, Joe Viterelli, Richard
C. Castellano, Chazz Palminteri
Director: Harold Ramis
Screenplay: Peter Tolan and Harold Ramis and Ken Lonergan
Australian theatrical release: March 11, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
Fans of Robert De Niro are not often given the chance to watch him act
silly, so I guess all the hip-hoola surrounding the release of Analyze
This is justified.  What doesn't seem so justified is the common
appraisal of the film's script. The only really clever idea that the
three screenwriter's have developed is a funny concept: a Mafia bigwig
looses his nerve, and seeks help from an untainted shrink. You can
probably guess the type of jokes that will fill the following 90
minutes, as De Niro and co-player Billy Crystal share opportunities to
mouth off.  The comedy between these two - and, I guess, the film's
overall success - relies heavily on dialogue.  It then comes as good
news that the dialogue is punchy and fun; the kind of which would take
writers hours to get the timing just right.
It must be said, then, that Analyze This finds a constant comedic beat,
the kind that the recent Waking Ned Devine severely lacked.  But in this
case, solidarity is both good and bad.  If you appreciate a couple of
the film's early jokes, you'll probably appreciate most of its later
ones.  Unfortunately, Analyze This takes precious few risks, so nothing
in it feels particularly involving.  However much like Rush Hour, the
chemistry between its two protagonists generates enough laughs and
memorable moments to make a pleasing film experience.
Paul Vitti (De Niro) is a powerful New York gangster, and is under
constant threat of assassination and prosecution.  His tough guy image
is jeopardized when Vitti loses his edge.  He becomes the victim of
anxiety attacks (in one amusing scene, he attempts to persuade a doctor
that he has had a heart attack), and even finds television ads as enough
of a reason to break down and cry.  Vitti realizes that he must cure
himself before his reputation shatters, so he seeks the help of
psychiatrist Ben Sobol (Crystal).  Sobol has a young son and a fiancée
(Lisa Kudrow) that he is about to marry, so naturally helping Vetti is
not one of his primary concerns.
Robert De Niro is fun to watch as the extravagant Vetti, although his
performance is not to be mistaken as an excellent one.  De Niro's part
is simplistic and two-dimensional (sort of like a cameo that lasts for
an entire film) but constantly entertaining.  Billy Crystal is the real
highlight here.  Crystal never lets his talent or experience overshadow
his charm, and in Analyze This he has all the energy of an actor trying
to make it big, and all the passion of man who's worked twenty rewarding
years.
The biting chemistry between De Niro and Crystal is, at its best, shrewd
and entertaining.  Like other "concept" films (such as Groundhog Day and
The Birdcage), the concept behind Analyze This is exaggerated and
developed into a full length film.  For those who have had enough of
sight comedies and satires, Analyze This might just bridge the gap
between intelligent and funny films, whilst making a new gap of its own:
a smart movie that doesn't take enough risks.


Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
BIG DADDY
Cast: Adam Sandler, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Joey Lauren Adams, Rob
Schneider, Leslie Mann, Steve Buscemi, Jon Stewart, Kristy Swanson
Director: Dennis Dugan
Screenplay: Steve Franks and Tim Herlihy & Adam Sandler
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
Screaming and groaning with his distinct,
screw-you-I-won't-do-what-you-tell-me tone, Adam Sandler also screams
down the throat of Hollywood's carefully evolved comedy genre.  The
comedy that we love to watch, or closer to the truth, the comedy that
Hollywood execs like to think that we love to watch, now seems stale and
uninspiring in comparison to Sandler's eruptions of cheap insults and
dry, unemotional observations.  Not just in his own right but in every
right, Sandler is a Superstar, a wild animal in Hollywood's fun park who
is not only able to jump in and out of his pen, he also gets paid and
celebrated for it.  Adam Sandler is cooland funnyand cracks lots of
great jokesor is he the greatest joke of them all?
Sandler's been around for a reasonable time - in the public eye, at
least, since 95's 'Billy Maddison', if you're a 'Saturday Night Live'
fan, even longer - so one might expect (and many would hope) that in
1999, he would go ballistic.  Rock the censors, Adam, shout your loudest
and fart your proudest, make monkey noises and let us roll on the floor
in shameful fits of laughter.  Alas, far before his time, he's taken the
coming-of-age approach and found (shudder) maturity and slight depth in
at least two of his roles.  In 'Big Daddy,' he preaches that love and
companionship make for a fulfilling life, in 'Happy Gilmore,' he
accidentally shoots a nail into his boss' head and later makes fun of
it.  Not that sentimentality has never been in a Sandler film -
'Gilmore' and 'Maddison' had romantic subplots and 'The Wedding Singer'
was obviously a love story - it's just never been this bleeding obvious,
or this forced.
There's a Cute Little Kid in 'Big Daddy' (played by identical twins Cole
and Dylan Sprouse) who also happens to be an orphan, and then there's
Big Daddy Sonny Koufax (Sandler) - a Homer Simpson prodigy who works one
day a week at a toll booth - who acts as his surrogate father, as a
means to impress women.  And it works, too, as Sonny meets Layla (sue,
Clapton, sue!), played by 'Jerry Maguire's' Joey Lauren Adams, and his
life soon begins to take direction.
Sonny raises his voice enough times to remind us that this _is_ an Adam
Sandler movie, although the jokes seem more marketed to a lawn bowls
club - perhaps with a free luncheon and cup of tea after the movie -
than the teenage audience.  Director Dennis Dugan, who actually has a
tiny role in the film as a reluctant Trick-or-Treat giver, is careful to
keep his material easily digestible and feel-good.  I find it hard to
believe that this is the same man who manipulated Sandler for some of
his most effective work thus far in 'Happy Gilmore,' a film that
effortlessly took the piss out of itself and never looked back to see
whether the audience was still smiling.  Signs that his comedic timing
is still on cue are evident in 'Big Daddy,' especially when Steve
Buscemi, who's always fun to watch, plays a homeless cynic with
effortless and hilarious conviction.  The difference between Buscemi and
Sandler: Buscemi can manage to look good in a bad picture.
However, I certainly wouldn't call 'Big Daddy' a bad picture.  I'm more
inclined to describe it as a piece that can't grasp or manipulate the
audience's emotions, and that makes for some amusing viewing when one of
its final scenes intends us to cry.  Instead, it's purely laughable.
How lovely that the film's centerpiece scene is in a courtroom, near the
film's conclusion, in which Sandler recites a bloated speech about his
undying love for Julian and his new found responsibility.  I had my
fingers crossed that the judge would recite a few lines from 'Billy
Maddison': "What you've just said is one of the most insanely idiotic
things I have ever heard. At no point in your rambling, incoherent
response were you even close to anything that could be considered a
rational thought. Everyone in this room is now dumber for having
listened."  Now _that's_ an Adam Sandler movie.


Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Cast: George Clooney, Jennifer Lopez, Ving Rhames, Dennis Farina, Don
Cheadle, Albert Brooks, Steve Zahn, Catherine Keener
Director: Steven Soderbergh
Screenplay: Scott Frank based on the novel by Elmore Leonard
Australian theatrical release date:  October 15, 1998
Elmore Leonard novels have made some great material for films, and great
films they have been.  The best thing about this writer is that he
constantly surprises his audience, unraveling hidden talents in his
writing which exceed most expectations set by less witty writers.  Just
when we thought he could only create only intriguing character (in Get
Shorty), he introduced a wide spectrum of appealing characters in Jackie
Brown.   And just when it appeared as if a punchy romance was not
included in the package, Out of Sight poses a dynamic sexual chemistry
between its two protagonists.
The screenplay, adapted by Scott Frank (who also did Get Shorty),
revolves around Jack Foley (George Clooney), a 40-year-old bank robber
who charms his victims into co-operating. In a failed getaway, Foley
faces 30 years of jail time and plots to break out of prison, with the
assistance of his best friend Buddy (Ving Rhames, from Mission:
Impossible and Pulp Fiction).  Foxy Federal Marshal Karen Sisco
(Jennifer Lopez) gets stuck in the middle of a break out attempt, and
ends up sharing time in a car boot with Foley.  Foley ponders over what
would have been had they met under different circumstances, but Karen
seems reluctant to reveal her true feelings.  Both fall in love, aware
of the impossibility of their relationship.  Meanwhile, Foley and Buddy
plan to rip off a former inmate, the billionaire Richard Ripley (Albert
Brooks), who has a stash of uncut diamonds hidden somewhere in his
mansion.
The casting of George Clooney was ingenious.  He oozes charisma and
sincerity, but is careful not to let his character reduce to pulp.  Out
of Sight is one of Clooney's few good movies and his best role choice;
putting on the black cape in Batman and Robin was a pretty stupid
mistake, but not after making a couple of others with One Fine Day and
The Peacemaker.  It's good to see that George has found stable cinematic
ground with this film, and hopefully he will be able to keep it up with
his next picture The Thin Red Line, an adaptation of James Jones'
autobiographical 1962 novel, focusing on the conflict at Guadalcanal
during the second World War.
Jennifer Lopez is also terrific in this film, looking irresistible as
the foxy Federal Marshall.  She plays her part by the book and with
little originality, but she is strong, and her character is written so
well that Lopez's performance seems better than it actually is.
Together, Clooney and Lopez create some of Out of Sight's most memorable
scenes, including the previously mentioned, and very dialogue rich,
scene in a boot of a car and an explosive sexual encounter (without
showcasing any sex at all).
Somehow, even amongst all of Elmore Leonard's slick criminals and
stylish dialogue, I am still not sure of how far he could take his
writing.  Even though Jackie Brown has been one of this year's best
films and Get Shorty was an extraordinary and enjoyable piece, no films
of yet have been able to fully capture the spirit of Leonard's writing.
Jackie Brown has probably come the closest, perhaps due to its direction
by Quentin Tarantino, a man who is equally as stylish and eccentric.  If
you take into account all that director Steven Soderbergh (sex, lies and
videotape) has included in Out of Sight, there's a whole lot that he has
missed out on.  The absence of interesting bad guys, for example, since
all the ones in this film are idiots (illustrated in one scene when they
all shoot at a safe and bullets rebound everywhere, just for the maid to
give them the combination without them even asking, and then discovering
that the safe contains hair wigs).
The screenplay is interesting because it unfolds a straight forward
narrative in a complex way, with flash backs and flash forwards, and
repeated scenes, so later the audience can breathe a sigh of relief and
say, "oh, that's what happened."  Scott Frank seems desperate to throw
in as much of Leonard's writing as he possibly can, and as a consequence
some scenes are drawn out way too long, and a few are slightly too
short.  The punchy romance is often pushed aside, and less interesting
characters (primarily the bad guys) are given too much screen time.
For all its faults, Out of Sight still remains a well-written piece with
witty black comedy, punchy dialogue and amazingly effective sexual
chemistry.  There are also a couple of amusing cameos from Michael
Keaton and Samuel L. Jackson thrown in for good measure. Now it's just a
matter of waiting to see what Elmore Leonard comes up with next.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
EDTV
Cast: Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Ellen DeGeneres, Woody
Harrelson, Martin Landau, Sally Kirkland, Rob Reiner, Dennis Hopper,
Elizabeth Hurley
Director: Ron Howard
Screenplay: Lowell Ganz & Babaloo Mandel
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
Even though it's been about twenty years since Ron Howard starred in
'Happy Days,' I still giggle after reading the words "a Ron Howard
film."  There's just something about picturing Ritchie Cunningham
directing a Hollywood blockbuster that you can't help but laugh at.
Howard's new movie EDtv will inevitably be compared to Peter Weir's film
The Truman Show, which has similar themes.  But whereas Truman focused
on a character who was oblivious to his world-wide fame as a star of his
own TV show, the protagonist in EDtv eagerly volunteers himself for a
media experiment, only to realize that perhaps it wasn't such a good
idea.  Howard has proved himself more than capable of handling heavy
material after the successes of Apollo 13 and Ransom, but here he
doesn't manage to direct with the kind of cynical detachment that made
Weir's piece succeed so well.
After two years worth of bad ratings, cable television channel 'True TV'
decides to try something different.  Headed by program director Cynthia
Topping (Ellen DeGeneres), they plan to create a show that follows, for
24 hours a day, the life of an average Joe.  Enter Ed Pekurny (Matthew
McConaughey), who is the perfect loser they are looking for.  Thus,
'EDtv' is born.  Sure enough, a camera crew follows Ed everywhere he
goes, and it doesn't take long before Ed's life becomes a lot more
complicated.  Trouble arises when he catches his brother Ray (Woody
Harrelson) having an affair on national TV, which leaves Ray's
girlfriend Shari (Jenna Elfman) predictably furious.  Shari and Ed are
attracted to each other and carve a relationship of their own, whilst
Ed's long-lost father Hank (Dennis Hopper) arrives on the scene and
causes domestic problems with Ed's flamboyant mother Janette (Sally
Kirkland).
If cameras didn't follow Ed everywhere, I'd swear that this was just
another average drama.  At least that's the way that Howard approaches
his material; instead of focusing on the media's influence on society,
he merely gives a twist to a typical domestic story.  Most frustrating
in his direction is his lack of attention to interesting themes.  When
Ed experiences his fifteen minutes of fame, it's clear that he is no
longer an average citizen, and thus 'True TV' loses the very thing that
made it so popular - its ability to follow an ordinary, fame-less
citizen.  But the 'True TV' executives are just as oblivious to this as
Howard is.  He obviously wanted to keep the film simplistic and able to
succeed on its own entertaining merits, thus much intrigue is lost.
Edtv consistently tries to persuade its audience that Ed is a character
who deserves to be barracked for.  Matthew McConaughey mouths his
dialogue with the kind of Southern American simplicity that quickly
becomes irritating, and although there is nothing drastically wrong with
his performance, the film's script doesn't have the strength to support
him.  Ed succeeds as a likeable nice guy, but hardly somebody who will
have you cheering in the aisles (unlike Truman, who's portrayal by Jim
Carrey made him impossible not to like).
EDtv is entertaining and sometimes quite funny - after all, this is A
Ron Howard Film.  But the media-induced world in which the film's
characters revolve in is not the unrelentingly cold world we know.  The
only time I was truly engaged by EDtv was near its completion, when Ed
realizes the horror of being stripped of privacy.  This diminishes, of
course, into an expected happy ending in which everybody departs the set
smiling, but most cinema-goers will leave only with a taste of what
could have been.  EDtv is largely an ineffective film that is hard to
hate but easy to forget.  Not bad for entertainment value, but don't
look for anything profound in Howard's light-hearted direction.


Title
Review for In the Winter Dark (1998)
REVIEW: In the Winter Dark
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Starring: Ray Barrett, Brenda Blethyn, Miranda Otto, Richard Roxburgh
Director: James Bogle
Screenplay: James Bogle, Peter Rasmussen
Australian theatrical release date: September 10, 1998
Australian films have recently gone from the grueling The Interview, to
the confused and muddled Sound of One Hand Clapping, to the funny but
problematic Crackers (although not necessarily in that order).  Although
In the Winter Dark and all of the above films are of different genres
and styles, they all bear one thing in common: Australian writers and
directors seem to do whatever they wish with their characters and
scenarios, and to hell with you if you don't like it.  Such is the story
with this film; an exquisite experience that merges its way almost into
excellence - and the only reason it doesn't quite wear the crown of
excellence is its lack of reason to get there.
This year's most stunning narration is delivered by Ray Barrett (Hotel
de Love, Heaven's Burning), who plays an old but likeable grouch Maurice
Stubbs.  "I started to have these dreams," he says, "Not mine. Other
people'slike there's some pressure point because they can'tget it out
anymore, can't get it told."  Maurice seems condemned to tell his story,
and as we get further into his soul we begin to understand that the only
thing limiting his heart from expressing his true feelings is his own
arrogance.  And perhaps it's that arrogance which, bit by bit, pushes us
further away from the true essence of his character.
Something or someone is killing animals in the secluded valley where
Stubbs lives.  All of the residents of the area - including himself,
wife Ida (Brenda Blethyn) and a couple of younger folk - fear for their
produce and property, and desperately attempt to seek out and destroy
the beast.  But as they do so, not only do they realize that the beast
is almost impossible to find, but also that in order to find it they
have to confront hidden parts of themselves.  Exactly what these hidden
parts are is never fully understood.
If I could choose any two words to describe this indescribable adoption
of Tim Winton's novel, they would be sublime and hollow.  Sublime,
because of the unmistakable excellence in which the film was shot and
hollow, because it tells a story with no real point or ambition to it.
The cast of four main characters shines, with some beautifully
interlaced performances and snappy dialogue.  Barrett especially is
completely believable; there aren't many lead roles nowadays that go to
sixty something actors, but he sure makes good use of his material.
More than anything else, this film demonstrates the closeness yet
eternal distancing felt between people living with fences both real and
superficial around them, and how they solve both the problems of the
future as well as the nightmares of the past.  In the Winter Dark is a
subversive and gripping experience, with a climax that is so wonderfully
etched out of nothing from director James Bogle.  The presence of an
unseen beast brings forth some important questions: is the beast a
vicious animal, a maniacal human being or simply a metaphor of fear and
desperation?  Much to Bogle's credit, we are kept guessing all along,
and then when the daunting climax occurs, we guess some more.
But that is ignoring that fact that it is indeed a hollow experience.
That's disappointing, considering the amount of vibrant talent and raw
Australian enthusiasm which shapes this rich experience.  With no real
pay off, and no powerful message to leave us shattered, it's still an
absorbent and admirable film.  And - I can just picture Bogle saying
it - to hell with you if you don't like it.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
After viewing Dustin Hoffman and Robert DiNiro tell a story that seems not to 
be far from the truth, you can't help but suspect that the public has not been 
told all there is to know about the Whitehouse's sexual allegations.  Just 
after Bill Clinton had been accused of not controlling the insides of his 
pants, a nuclear threat in Iraq emanated.  The prospect of war had begun, but 
thankfully nothing initiated from it.
An eerily similar situation is evident in Wag the Dog, a refreshingly amusing 
politically incorrect satire.  In essence the film is based around a "Spin 
Doctor" and Hollywood producer attempting to cover up the Prezy's keen 
"interest" in a young Girl Scout (2 weeks before the election).  In execution, 
Wag the Dog takes a bold look at how the media is "created;" even if that means 
degrading itself along the way.  Not that the film has much to degrade - acting 
is sharp and admirable, the no nonsense script is a clever parody of political 
affairs and it's characters are able to express their engaging opinions through 
the use of a slick dialogue.  
After the Presidents raunchy affairs, Conrad Brean (Robert DiNiro) and Winifred 
Ames (Anne Heche) work out a way to remove him from the media spotlight before 
the population can even consider voting differently on re-election.  Their plan 
is simple: cook up a war.  What, after all, do most people actually witness in 
regard to wars?  Perhaps photos in magazines, articles in newspapers and video 
clips on the TV.  If this weren't about politics, I'd swear it was about 
Hollywood.
Realizing this, Conrad and Winifred hire hot shot movie producer (Dustin 
Hoffman) to create a real life movie.  Realistic acting, special effects and 
surroundings are now more important than ever.
Surely, Wag the Dog has everything going for it.  It's funny.  It's engaging.  
It's studious.  It's all of those things once or twice.
Because Wag is an eminently repetitive film, for the more derogatory viewer 
funny can quickly become cruddy, engaging to enraging and studious to 
fastidious.  But for those who crave a solid high quality film, this is 
probably the best opportunity to view a profuse piece of consistent art that 
they'll get for a long time.  In short: if you like the opening scenes, you'll 
like the ending scenes. And if you like what's in between, you're set for a 
great time.
Director Barry Levinson (Disclosure, Donnie Brasco) successfully wags the film 
into following his precise cynicism of the globe's media.  Hoffman, DeNiro and 
Heche absorb the screen so well that we can't help but think they were meant to 
act together from the start.  Not only do they sound like presidential 
scammers; they also look like presidential scammers - and follow out to the 
exact degree what is required for almost perfect performances.  Wag the Dog's 
acting is far better than anything else it has to offer; and although the 
scripting is intelligently inventive it does get a tad boring when the same 
method is repeated from scene to scene.
Surely, Wag is a masterpiece that missed the mark.  


Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
Cast: Ian Bannen, David Kelly, Fionnula Flanagan, Susan Lynch, James
Nesbitt, Brendan F. Dempsey, Eileen Dromey, Jimmy Keogh
Director: Kirk Jones
Screenplay: Kirk Jones
Australian theatrical release: December 26, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
After a clever and hilarious opening scene, it is hard to accept that
Waking Ned Devine fails to maintain a consistent comedic beat.  With the
pitch and tone of a quirky comedy but an off and on direction, Ned
Devine is often simultaneously hard to hate and hard to enjoy.  Debut
writer-director Kirk Jones seems oblivious to the idiocy of his subject
matter, and regularly struggles to bring a sense of humor to the
outrageous.  That is why he resorts to some monotonous scenarios, but
occasionally strikes gold by giving his elderly protagonists enough
flair to make whatever they do seem bearable.
Poor Ned Devine was lucky enough to win a lottery of 6.8 million pounds,
but unlucky enough not to live to spend it.  We learn that Ned was
literally shocked to death, holding his winning ticket and watching TV
at the time of the unfortunate incident.  Enter elderly friends Jackie
O'Shea (Ian Bannen) and Michael O'Sullivan (David Kelly), a twisted pair
who are intent on finding the winner of the lottery and squeezing a
share of it for themselves.  They learn that the winner is a resident of
a small town named Tullymore, population 52.  Eventually discovering
that the person they are looking for is dead, Michael pretends he is Ned
Devine, and the town's residents are dragged into the task of confirming
his borrowed identity so that they can split the loot between them.
Jones' screenplay sprouts various subplots, all of which are neither as
original or entertaining as Jackie and Michael's quest to obtain the
prize money.  The various residents of Tullymore appear as pretty much
lifeless, with only Bannen and Kelly breathing life into their
characters.  Their performances are solid and memorable, and will
undoubtedly draw comparisons to the work of Walter Matthau and Jack
Lemmon.
The scenes that stage Waking Ned Devine's jokes are generally quite
entertaining.  One great thing that Jones achieves is a coherency with
the style of his comedic scenes, and he does his best to steer the film
away from gags that we have seen before.  Desperately trying to be
original, Jones goes to extreme lengths to squeeze laughs, including
placing a nude O'Sullivan on a motorcycle and making O'Shea change Ned
Devines face expression.  Some may find these moments hilarious, but I
found them irritating.  A nude old man on a bike is funny for the first
few seconds, as is somebody moving the jaw and eyes of a dead man.
Although entertaining, Waking Ned Devine does not have the comic timing
of something like The Full Monty (which it has been persistently
compared to, simply because both films were made in the United Kingdom),
or the witty black humor that can make these films so funny.
Needless to say, Waking Ned Devine is lightheaded and generally quite
enjoyable.  Thus, it is such a disappointment that Kirk Jones has not
only managed to spoil the atmosphere of his film on many occasions, but
he has ruined entire scenes with bad writing and timing.  In one of
Waking Ned Devine's most emphasized moments - when some of its
characters raise their glasses to the dead lottery winner - Jones misses
the appropriate tone entirely. Instead of being touching, it is faintly
idiotic and out of place.  That's just one example of Jones' off and
direction, although I guess one of its positive assets is that for every
bad scene he makes, there is a reasonable (if not good) scene to
counterpart.  If Jones had been able to maintain a solid comedic beat
and an effective dramatic core, Waking Ned Devine could have been much
more than what it is: a film which is simultaneously hard to hate and
hard to enjoy.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
REVIEW: Can't Hardly Wait
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Ethan Embry, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Peter Facinelli, Charlie
Korsmo, Seth Green, Lauren Ambrose, Jerry O'Connell, Melissa Joan Hart,
Jenna Elfman
Directors: Deborah Kaplan & Harry Elfont
Screenplay: Deborah Kaplan & Harry Elfont
Australian theatrical release date: September 17
Films like Can't Hardly Wait are initially interesting to look at; not
because there is necessarily anything remarkable about them, but rather
because they position their main characters in or around the same
setting for almost all of their duration.  We've seen this style of film
work really well in, say, The Breakfast Club, and pretty awfully in
something like Kevin Spacey's Albino Alligator.  When a screenplay is
based on the actions of characters in secluded environments, one of two
things usually happen.  We are either given a dynamic understanding into
the thoughts and actions of the protagonists, or we are sadly exposed to
butt numbing scenarios of the same boringly conceived characters.  Can't
Hardly Wait finds itself with more of the latter than former, probably
thanks to the debut efforts of directors/writers Harry Elfont and
Deborah Kaplan.
Elfont and Kaplan's primary setting is a teenage post-graduation party
of booze and sex.  After all, drunks trying to get laid are, um, always
entertaining to watch.  Taking place at the party are plenty of well
known screen-party activities, which are given a new shining thanks to
some snappy camera shots, including an interesting way to introduce
important characters.  It all may look pretty and glossy, but under the
skin the screenplay falls flat on its face in terms of expressing itself
adequately.
By adequately, I mean actually doing something.  Most of Can't Hardly
Wait is spent pondering what could have been, and whilst I was watching
the characters party on, I couldn't help but feel that I was missing out
on something.  Looking back, I've figured out what it was: Can't Hardly
Wait never manages to find stable cinematic ground to stand on.  Elfont
and Kaplan probably had the best intentions at heart when putting pen to
paper, and I guess there first and foremost aim was to create a fun teen
comedy, perhaps in the style of a John Hughes film. Alicia Silverstone's
Clueless was intelligent enough to keep its material trashy but sly, and
Dazed and Confused skillfully introduced characters and setting, then
developed from there.  But Can't Hardly Wait is just trash and fun, and
neither is satirical or smart enough to make it worthwhile.  You could
say this film is a good example of a reasonable concept that is
developed without the skill or know-how that it desperately needs.
Jennifer Love Hewitt and Ethan Embry look charming together when they
are, actually, together - if only for a few minutes.  The rest of the
film, however, is pretty sober and dull, with many scenarios drawn out
way too long.  Can't Hardly Wait does succeed reasonably well with
audience entertainment, and although laughs are infrequent and the gags
are not particularly memorable, it's a little piece of shot-sized fun.
But all in all, if this is an example of what a new wave of teen's films
might look like, I can definitely wait.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
REVIEW: A Perfect Murder
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Michael Douglas, Gwyneth Paltrow, Viggo Mortensen, David Suchet,
Sarita Choudhury
Director: Andrew Davis
Screenplay: Patrick Smith Kelly based on the play "Dial M for Murder" by
Frederick Knott
Australian theatrical release: October 15
In A Perfect Murder, a loose remake of Alfred Hitchcock's Dial M for
Murder, Michael Douglas reprises a similar role to that of Nicholas Van
Orton in The Game.  He plays Steven Taylor, a wealthy and wise middle
aged man.  He's the kind of guy who says the right thing and the right
time, but plans his actions so meticulously and carefully that there is
bound to be a screw loose somewhere along the line.
Allegations have sparked over director Andrew Davis' work in this piece.
"Hitchcock's work should not be ripped off," the wags scoff, unaware
that Hitchcock himself adapted the screenplay from the original play
written by Frederick Knott.  Smartly, Davis attempts to use as much
Hictchcockness as any person other than Hitchcock could hitch.  There
are a small group of directors who can create similar feels of tension
and suspense that the great man seemed to achieve so easily, one of
which is definitely David Fincher, the mastermind behind Se7en and The
Game.  Australian Craig Monahan has also shown distinct skills for
unraveling a mystery in the grueling The Interview.  Sadly, Davis is not
one of them.  His direction is inconsistent and often unclear; at some
moments it's a little overpowering, others too passive.
Emily Hayes (Gwyneth Paltrow) is having an affair with starving artist
David Shaw (Viggo Mortensen).  Her husband, Steven, is not too happy
about the situation, and - for one reason or another - carefully hatches
a plot to kill her.  He hires David to do the deed, giving him explicit
instructions as to how to pull it off without incriminating anyone.
Surprise surprise, things go wrong
Michael Douglas is always interesting to watch.  What is even more
interesting is his bizarre choice of films, of which many of them seem
to have a woman-hating theme.  Take Fatal Attraction, Basic Instinct and
Disclosure for example, three of his best known films.  But it was The
Game which highlighted how impressionable an actor he can be, and he
must have enjoyed the experience because he now performs in a role
which, as I mentioned, is identical in many ways.  The only reason why
his performance in this film does not reach the same level (or actually,
lands well below the previous level) is the messy screenplay, which
misses out on the subtleties of his character.
That's a pity, since Patrick Smith Kelly has adapted Knott's play with
as much sophistication and puzzlement as he could possibly cram in. The
first half of A Perfect Murder is quite pleasing, as it introduces the
murder scheme with well-planned tautness and builds a genuinely
interesting scenario.  The real problems lie in the second half, when
the murder, planned murder or failed murder - which one, you can find
out yourself - has came and gone.  Thus the film takes one step forward
and two steps back, making some characters discover what we already
know, and others stand around and wait to mutter threatening lines of
dialogue.  In no time, everything seems a little silly.
For a film that really isn't too bad, A Perfect Murder is far from
rewarding.  It's the confused and faintly ridiculous conclusion to this
piece that will disappoint most viewers, as it is comprised of violence
and brutality - something that the film carefully avoids beforehand.
Although Davis is definitely not the 90's equivalence of Alfred
Hitchcock, he still succeeds with creating an intriguing mystery, if
only for a few sparse moments.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
EYES WIDE SHUT
Cast: Tom Cruise, Nicole Kidman, Sydney Pollack, Todd Field, Marie
Richardson, Rade Serbedzija, Vinessa Shaw, Leelee Sobieski
Director: Stanley Kubrick
Screenplay: Stanley Kubrick & Frederic Raphael, based on the novel
Traumnovelle by Arthur Schnitzler
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and a half stars
"The screen is a magic medium. It has such power that it can retain
interest as it conveys emotions and moods that no other art form can
hope to tackle." -- the late Stanley Kubrick.
For those of you who were looking forward to seeing two and half hours
of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman going at it like dogs, let me say this
right off the beat: this movie is _not_ a porn flick.  And, contrary to
some disgruntled viewers, the late Stanley Kubrick did not film it with
his eyes wide shut.
In the Kubrickan universe, where war, sexual satire, and even the
evolution of man have been explored, infidelity in marriage doesn't seem
like an important topic in comparison.  Or perhaps it's the most
important of all.  Whichever way to decide to interpret it,
perfectionist and ultra-reclusive filmmaker Stanley Kubrick's historic
last film - he passed away shortly after completing post-production - is
about intimacy, or a lack thereof.  It's a film that will be studied and
scrutinized, criticized and praised, liked and loved, hated and loathed;
but it shouldn't be underestimated.  Kubrick's beautiful use of visual
art and music is spectacular, and his assurance in himself is
unmistakable.  'Eyes Wide Shut' is a story told by a director who truly
knew how to tell it.
Allegations that Kubrick became a dirty and perverted man in the last
few years of his life are, I'm certain, very false. 'Eyes Wide Shut' is
no more unsanitary than the violence in 'A Clockwork Orange' or 'Full
Metal Jacket,' the difference between these films, obviously, are their
genres.  It's true that 'Eyes Wide Shut' is intentionally a film that
has some sleazy moments, but Kubrick was never a director to take cheap
shots.  He slowly, quietly constructs his New York settings as the seedy
undercurrents of American culture, then abruptly and powerfully reminds
us that the true terror of the surroundings lie in the behavior of those
who inhabit them.  This all contributes to the film's itchy
physiological feel - 'Eyes Wide Shut' is dark and cynical, and
reverberates in your mind like a nightmare that never quite leaves you
alone.  Who would have thought that Stanley Kubrick would have ended his
career directing with almost Poe-like quality, reaching the inner
recesses of the human mind, and revealing just a few of the evils that
lie within.
Once again Kubrick endeavors to film the un-filmable.  It's no
coincidence that 'Eyes Wide Shut' boasts some of the most startling and
disquieting screen moments you're likely to see all year; also no
coincidence was the immense hype surrounding its release.  Kubrick
reportedly masterminded the film's advertising campaign, by revealing
small tidbits every now and then (including the much talked about mirror
scene), refusing to provide media outlets with a synopsis of the story,
and billing 'Eyes Wide Shut' as a Cruise/Kidman/Kubrick collaboration.
Tom Cruise, however, takes the spotlight for the majority of the film's
160-minute running time.  He plays Bill Harford and Kidman plays his
wife, Alice.  They are a wealthy New York couple, married nine years
with a daughter, and seemingly have it all.   That is, until one
peculiar night in which Bill prowls around the grim streets of New York,
encountering sexual temptation after sexual temptation, longing for a
release, or even a vague sense of joy.  Without going into much depth,
some of his journeying  - both literal and metaphorical - results in an
encounter with a hooker, an all-too-young looking teenager (played by
'Deep Impact's' Leelee Sobieski), and, of course, the invitation-only
orgy that everybody's been discussing ("Does Tom Cruise really wear a
dress?"  "Is it true that he molests a goat?")
No wonder everybody's been talking about it - it's quite a scene.  But
just labeling this and a couple of the film's other breathtaking moments
as "visually stunning" or "money shots," I fear, doesn't give them
justice.  The "orgy scene" has every actor in it wearing bizarre yet
strangely charismatic masks, the kind which would suit a screen
adaptation of Edgar Allan Poe's 'The Masque of the Red Death' (in fact,
that is 'Dark City' director Alex Proyas' next film), if you're familiar
with it.  Kubrick's use of imagery, editing and a recurring and chilling
music score inflates the already absorbing atmosphere he creates.   As
we gaze at the screen, fixated into the world that Harford penetrates,
it is clear that we are under the spell of Kubrick's full-throttle
direction.
If the film's characters seem lost to you, that's because they are -
they're confused, insignificant people floating around dangerous worlds
that are obviously out of their league.  'Eyes Wide Shut' flows like a
dream, like reality, and like a dream of reality; Kubrick never makes it
clear what we, as an audience, should be looking for, if we should be
looking for anything at all.
Managing to keep a frowned face for most of the ordeal is Tom Cruise,
whose performance is as much about daily behavior as it is the
unpredictable circumstances that his character gets swept up in.  Only
Stanley Kubrick could have made Tom Cruise walking down a street look
interesting, and only Kubrick could have refused to cut to a different
location until he well and truly needed to.  Cruise is strong - perhaps
his strongest ever - as is Kidman, although her dialogue at times seems
just a little lengthy and abstract.  Arguably the world's most famous
couple, Cruise and Kidman this time refrain from using their charisma to
slap a grin on our faces; instead, they relied on Kubrick to see them
through.  No one needs to tell them that this was a safe bet.
Whilst the film's advertising hype was a great commercial ploy, it will
also draw to the cinema people who wouldn't have come otherwise, and
many of these - I suspect - will dislike and be frustrated by 'Eyes Wide
Shut,' due to its slow, quietly menacing pace.  Already, Internet
message boards and newsgroups have been plagued by comments from
disgruntled viewers; some of them have dubbed it 'Eyes Wide Shit,'
others have suggested that the Cruise/Kidman combination should be
replaced by Dennis Rodman and Carmen Electra.  If you don't think that
'Eyes Wide Shut' will grab you, I suggest you don't see it.
On the other hand, why miss out on such an extraordinary film
experience?  I'm certain that many viewers will be quick to contact me,
and inform me of their dissatisfaction with the movie, but allow me to
propose something first: perhaps you've missed the point.  'Eyes Wide
Shut' is a thoroughly dissatisfying film, yes, but this is (here's that
word again) intentional.  It remains a captivating physiological
thriller that builds a creepy, unsettling momentum, and leaves you with
a bad taste in your mouth.
Even the film's very last line of dialogue is bound to leave you in your
seat - if only for a few moments longer than normal - as everything
before it suddenly takes on greater resonance.  For those of you who
want to see 'Eyes Wide Shut' for its depth, not its sex, or for its
content rather than its hype, the following warning is for you: it's
sometimes hard to watch a film seriously when everybody around you are
there purely to satisfy their curiosities.  Whether you like it or love
it, hate it or loathe it, one thing's for sure - you'll have never seen
anything quite like it.  Kubrick's last hurrah is, thankfully, another
masterstroke to add to the list of a man who was truly one of
Hollywood's most audacious filmmakers.


Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
GODS AND MONSTERS
Cast: Ian McKellen, Brendan Fraser, Lynn Redgrave, Lolita Davidovich
Director: Bill Condon
Screenplay: Bill Condon based on the novel Father of Frankenstein by
Christopher Bram
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and a half stars
Gods and Monsters is a vividly sketched character portrait of a man
whose inner demons were as real to him as the monsters that he graced
the world with.  Director James Whale, whose emotional battles
encompassed memories of trench warfare and an unsatisfying homosexual
lifestyle, directed such film noir as Frankenstein, The Invisible Man
and The Bride of Frankenstein.  Whale, however, never became one of
Hollywood's celebrated success stories, as he chose to leave the
movie-making business after studio tampering made his expected
masterpiece, Hello Out There, a laugh stock of the industry.  He tried
to isolate both his memories and his contacts, but was always remembered
as the horror God who brought his memorable monsters to life.
In capturing Whale's deteriorating mind but vigorous spirit, director
and writer Bill Condon (who adapted the screenplay from the novel Father
of Frankenstein) succeeds magnificently, not without the essential
central performance from Sir Ian McKellen, who was last seen in an
equally impressive but slightly less captivating performance in Apt
Pupil.  Gods and Monsters wholly succeeds in being a character study and
an examination of different levels in society.  As Whale searches for a
reason to either live or die, Condon doesn't fall into the trap of
sensationalizing or simplifying.  Like in life, all of his problems
won't resolve themselves when he dies, and a life will not always end
with redemption and courage.  This is a very humane tale told with
compassion and elegance, cynicism and poignancy, and the result is a
film that has been created for those who want to take something with
them when they leave the cinema.
Whale (Ian McKellen) is an elderly homosexual nearing the end of his
life.  He lives a solitary existence with housekeeper Hannah (Lynn
Redgrave), heeding the pain of the after affects of a stroke.  His
memories are equipped with visions of happier times, as well as
nightmares of the past that have not completely vanished.  Whale
befriends his new gardener Clay Boone (Brendan Fraser), and their
relationship becomes a complicated comparison between the homosexual and
the heterosexual, the rich and the poor.  Boone is fascinated by Whale's
experiences but at times repelled by his manipulative personality,
admiring him but approaching their friendship hesitantly.  Whale's
motivations behind his relationship with Boone gradually become evident,
whilst recollections of the movie-making business seem more and more
distant.
It is easy to underestimate the depth of Whale and Boone's relationship.
Social status and sexuality are two of the primary issues that are
effortlessly studied, but Bill Condon had more in mind than that.  The
very reason behind Whale's existence is challenged again and again, not
only by his disturbing recollections of terrible times, but mainly an
emotional-by-play that allows McKellen and Fraser to play off each other
beautifully.  McKellen's powerhouse performance is definitely an
entertaining one, and he also handles his darker, more provocative
material with the care and skill that only experience can generate.
Fraser gives an exceptional performance in his first dramatic role,
working as a counterpart to Whale's complicated personality, and
delivers charisma as though it were something second nature.  Although
his very masculine appearance was no doubt a prerequisite for his
casting, there is also a non-sexual seductiveness in his performance
that makes his character entirely likable but never typecast or
stereotypical.
The screenplay seamlessly integrates stories of power, reliance,
individual growth, and so much more.   Perhaps most impressive is the
way that Gods and Monsters develops its protagonist.  The film carefully
shapes Boone as a person that we are not entirely at ease with, yet his
social mannerisms and eccentric personality are developed with startling
realism.  It is hard to criticize a film that works on as many levels as
this one, and delivers the goods on so many different occasions, ranging
from its bizarrely comic opening to its unsettling and thought-provoking
climax.
One dream sequence near the film's conclusion, in which Fraser and
McKellen play Frankenstein and his evil master, is amongst one of the
most effectively staged scenes I've seen this year.  Like this powerful
metaphorical moment, Gods and Monsters not only gives its material the
wit and intelligence it deserves, but rises above expectations by
generating a curious fascination from its characters.  Although James
Whale's reputation has never been completely intact, Gods and Monsters
goes to the heart of one of Hollywood's greatest misfits with
unflinching detail.


Title
Review for Velvet Goldmine (1998)
REVIEW: Velvet Goldmine
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Jonathan Rhys Meyers, Ewan McGregor, Christian Bale, Toni
Collette, Eddie Izzard, Emily Woof, Michael Feast
Director: Todd Haynes
Writers: Todd Haynes, James Lyons
Australian theatrical release date: November 5, 1998
In the classic Trains Plains and Automobiles, Steve Martin gave the late
John Candy some valuable advice: "If you're going to tell a story, have
a point - it makes it so much more interesting for the listener!"  This
quote has never been truer than in Velvet Goldmine, a pointless and
apathetic examination of nothing in particular, and a lot of it.
Writer-director Todd Haynes has created a controversial and original
piece; one that doesn't rely so much on its main characters but rather
whom they might represent.  David Bowie, for example, bears a striking
resemblance to Velvet Goldmine's fictional protagonist, Brian Slade
(Jonathan Rhys Meyers), a bisexual flower power rock star. But this
isn't a character study, nor is it a study of contrasting eras and
social trends - all of which would have probably helped the film keep
its stride, had it managed to choose which one it wanted to focus on.
The complex narrative is set in two different eras: 1971-74, when Slade
fakes his own assassination during a concert, and ten years later, when
reporter Arthur Stuart (Christian Bale) is asked to investigate what
happened to the former pop icon.  Arthur has deep familiarization with
Slade and his movement, having been affected emotionally and sexually by
his radical ethics.
Jonathan Rhys Meyers looks laughable in the title role, giving Slade a
pompous and wanky presence thanks to a weak screenplay and some
extravagant 70's costumes.  "I like boysand I like girls," says the
actor, looking as stupid as the film itself. Any chance of examining
Slade's character is conveniently avoided, as Haynes seems much more
concerned with showcasing homosexual orgies rather than studying what
makes him kick.  As a result, I didn't understand or care about his
actions, as Slade comes across as a preying-on-school-boys bastard, and
nothing more.  The screenplay might have worked if Haynes had written
Slade as effectively bastardly as someone like Chad in Neil LaButes In
the Company of Men, but he reveals no level of talent that would allow
coherent writing to last for more than just a couple of minutes.
Adding insult to, well, insult, Velvet Goldmine attempts to link the
movements of its protagonist to the great Oscar Wilde, with dismal
results.  Since Todd Haynes has failed to create anything worthwhile
himself, he takes a couple of people who made successes of themselves,
and then tries to make the film successful.  If either actually cared
about this awful little film, David Bowe would sue, and Oscar Wilde
would turn in his grave.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Head On (1998)
HEAD ON
Cast: Alex Dimitriades, Paul Capsis, Julian Garner, Tony Nikolakopoulos,
Elena Mandalis, María Mercedes
Director: Ana Kokkinos
Screenplay: Andrew Bovell, Ana Kokkinos and Mira Robertson, based on the
novel 'Loaded' by Christos Tsiolkas
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
My first reaction after viewing Head On was to take a long, deep breath.
Ana Kokkinos' fiery Melbourne-based film is a tense and bold character
study - one that is almost haunting in its realism.  Perhaps the most
daring of its production assets is the film's dramatic script, which
positions its protagonist in various off-putting homosexual,
confrontational and drug induced acts.  Disturbing stuff, that's for
sure - and Kokkinos knows it.  The reason why Head On is so
uncomfortable to watch is because its director knows how to use
unsettling images for intrigue, not for shock appeal.  This is a
powerhouse Australian film that is in many ways more confronting than
the likes of Saving Private Ryan, for the reason that it depicts issues
that are very real in today's society. Kokkinos boldly looks at
sexuality, ethnicity, drugs and gender in a raw and explicit manner.
With tight editing and a rigid, unusually urban cinematography, Head On
is a grating piece that explores the dissatisfaction of youth, and
society in general.
Ari (Alex Dimitriades) is a nineteen-year-old Greek bisexual, who is
confused by life and constantly searches for a path to happiness.  He
doesn't find it in drugs or alcohol, nor does he in regular and
unsatisfying sex.  The film chronicles one day in Ari's life, an intense
twenty-four hours full of pain and occasional joy.  Ari realizes the
pathetic state of his life but fails to do anything about it - one gets
the feeling that he is so far down and out that he will never quite be
able to regain status.  Ari has pushed on, day by day, meeting men and
women, and not thinking about what life might offer him.  He is too busy
taking everything a step at a time in the busy city of Melbourne (at one
moment, much to my delight, there are shots of Flinders Street Station
and Crown Casino).
Ari's character works because of the revealing screenplay (which was
adapted from the novel 'Loaded') and Alex Dimitriades' gutsy
performance.  I thought that Russel Crowe's choice of role in 1994's The
Sum of Us was game, but compared to this it looks ordinary. Dimitriades
is one hell of a brave actor.  Limiting the emotional success of this
story is its lack of characters; aside from Ari, there is really nobody
else the audience can relate with.  But perhaps this is done
intentionally, as Ari alone provides the basis for an intriguing
character study since he is such a complicated person.  His actions are
not always understandable - but that's how people are sometimes.
Whenever his life seems to be lightening up (if only for a few moments),
we are brought down once again into his depressing state of affairs.
Some of the final words spoken by Alex Dimitriades are cynical and
somber considering all that we have witnessed his character go through,
yet they express the moving and painful expression that this film
generates.  "I'm sliding toward the sewer, not struggling, I can smell
the shit - but I'm still breathing.  I'm gonna live my life.  I'm not
going to make a difference, I'm not going to change a thing."
If you're feeling brave, take a long, deep breath and watch Head On.


Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
It may surprise some people to know that Berry Levinson, the director who
brought us Donnie Brasco and Wag the Dog, has ventured into Stephen Spielberg
territory with one of Michael Crichtons less known novels  Sphere.
After the opening credits we are hastily introduced to Dr. Norman Goodman
(Dustin Hoffman), a calm psychologist with an intellect and common sense that
more than matches the specialists around him.  Unfortunately, his credibility
isnt always dependable.  In the 1980s Norman sold the government a top-secret
report explaining what to do if alien life was ever encountered.  Also on the
report were the names of biochemist Beth Halperin (Sharon Stone), mathematician
Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson) and astrophysicist Ted Fielding (Liey
Schreiber).  The problem is, the report was hastily put together because Norman
needed the cash  and borrowed material from famous writers to meet his needs.
So when a three hundred year old alien vessel is found buried deep in the ocean,
Normans report is followed like a bible.  Much to his surprise, all of people
he specified (as well as himself) are gathered together and sent to investigate
this mysterious ship.  But, as would be predicted in this sort of film, when
they are stuck hundreds of meters below the surface things start to go wrong.
A funny little character called Jerry, based inside the vessels computers, pops
up and begins to create chaos for Norman and his crew.  But all is not what it
seems, and as the film delves into the psychological aspects of its characters,
tension begins to rise and things start to hot up.
In quality and concept, Sphere is much like last years Event Horizon.  They both
created interest from the audience, but when they had it they failed to do
anything original or engaging with it  and at times its incredibly annoying to
be witness a potentially great film resort to using clichi characters and
confrontations.
Its interesting to note that the vast percentage of Spheres footage has three
of the same characters appear on the screen - and whilst this is not necessarily
a bad thing, if limited amounts of characters are going to successfully hold the
audiences attention they really need to be something special.  In this case,
they certainly are not  Norman somehow seems to be the most intelligent even
though he asks the stupidest questions, the ships commander Barnes Barnes (Peter
Coyote) is the diplomatic dork that no body likes, and Samuel L. Jacksons
character serves as an excuse to whip up some amusing dialogue.  So even though
Sphere doesnt produce the most rewarding characters, its great fun to see them
all shoved into situations that have more to do with common sense rather than
PHDs.
Yes  Sphere succeeds as a not-to-be-taken-seriously film, but this is not what
Levinson was after. Psychological thriller it should have been  but
psychological mediocrity it is.
I would love to announce Event Horizon and Sphere as great films  heck, I enjoy
so many things about them  but they both get so bogged down in a sea of Weve
this his all before material that they hardly become a worthwhile experience.
But this isnt the main thing that bothers me  being Sci Fi movies, these two
films lost sight of what they should have achieved  rather than thrilling the
audience, they merely scare the audience.
But on the up side, Sphere is a treat to watch and the special effects are
appropriately impressive. I can not, however, forgive it for watering down such
a spectacular concept into a pedestrian (and very Hollywood) flavor.
As for the three dependable actors  Hoffman, Jackson and Stone  they do look
great together, and Sharon especially is certain to arouse male interest with a
notably tight singlet/shirt. But at the end of the day, when these three people
are resorted to driving a film stuck in neutral, one must wonder why Jim Carey
or Mike Myers werent cast as the alien vessels comic reliefs.  At least then
we could laugh at them, and not the film.
As it so happens, the day after I saw Sphere I watched Basic Instinct on TV.
And lets just say, Sharon Stones vessels were moving much more appealingly in
the later film.


Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE
Cast: Gwyneth Paltrow, Joseph Fiennes, Geoffrey Rush, Colin Firth, Ben
Affleck, Tom Wilkinson, Imelda Stuanton, Judi Dench, Simon Callow,
Rupert Everett
Director: John Madden
Screenplay: Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and half stars
Shakespeare in Love's recipe for success is a simple one.  Due to the
film's superb screenplay and sound acting, director John Madden is able
to pick and match the best parts of three different genres.  Clever
comedy, charming romance and absorbing drama fit neatly into this period
piece, which has a distinctly contemporary feel.  Ordinarily it would be
fair enough to point out that a director probably shouldn't attempt to
have the best of both worlds (so to speak); but here, Madden has the
best of three.
Will Shakespeare (Joseph Fiennes) has writers block.  He's just begun
working on a proposed play titled "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's
Daughter," but struggles to find inspiration to express himself.  But,
like the play's title, Shakespeare's life soon changes for the better.
He finds motivation in the form of Lady Viola (Gwyneth Paltrow), who is
destined to marry the snobby Lord Wessex (Colin Firth) at the command of
Queen Elizabeth herself (Judi Dench, in a cleverly arrogant
performance).  Shakespeare and Viola live out their doomed romantic
fantasy, whilst the formalities (and informalities) of producing a
theatrical production blare in the background.
Those interested in Shakespearean times will appreciate the film's
suggestions and insights into what happened during this era.
Shakespeare in Love suggests how the mysterious death of famous
playwright Christopher Marlowe (played by the always dependable Rupert
Everett) occurred, and hints at how the prohibition of women on the
stage was eventually revoked (during the era, men had to play women in
drag).  On the other hand, those who desire two hours worth of solid
entertainment will get more than they paid for. Comic performances from
Geoffrey Rush as a struggling theatre owner and The Full Monty's Tom
Wilkinson as the play's producer aid the film in keeping it accessible
for everyone.
Joseph Fiennes and Gwyneth Paltrow shine in the two meatiest parts.
Scenes in which Shakespeare puts pen to paper work better than you may
expect; each bringing a magical touch and an involving atmosphere.  As
he writes, we can almost feel the love that inspires him.  Paltrow
delivers one of - if not the - best performances so far in her career.
She has always had enough talent to make a difficult part work, and
should have made a performance like this a long time ago (her roles in A
Perfect Murder, Hush, Sliding Doors and others restricted her charisma).
With so many films nowadays that try to tell too much in too little time
(or, alternatively, films that tell too little in too much time), here
is one that never oversteps the mark.  There are so many paths the film
could have taken, but Madden focuses almost entirely on the central
relationship and the first ever production of "Romeo and Juliet."
Shakespeare in Love's recipe for success is a simple one, but not an
easy one to pull off.  Its carefully crafted screenplay interlaces
drama, romance and comedy smartly and efficiently in this charming and
passionate tale.  Shakespeare in Love has a big heart, but never loses
its grasp on reality or the tragedy of forbidden love.  Not only does it
work as an upbeat period piece, but also as just about anything you want
it to be.


Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
Cast: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giustino Durano, Sergio Bini
Bustric, Marisa Paredes, Horst Buchholz, Giorgio Cantarini
Director: Roberto Benigni
Screenplay: Roberto Benigni, Vincenzo Cerami
Australian theatrical release: December 26
In Italian with English subtitles
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and a half stars
For the first forty-five minutes or so of Life is Beautiful, the setting
is Italy in the late 1930's.  For Italian Jew Guido Orefice (Roberto
Benigni), a lovable and quick-witted goof, life is fun.  Life is full of
pleasant surprises, romance and adventure.  Life is beautiful. "X years
later," things take a severe turn for the worse.  Orefice's surroundings
are no longer blissful, they are hostile.  Signs on shop windows
indicate that Jews and dogs are not allowed inside, and graffiti marks
decorate the walls of Jewish shops.  Life is not easy, but Orefice's
spirits are far from buried.
By the time Life is Beautiful reveals its dark core, Orefice is married
to Dora (Nicoletta Braschi), a Gentile, and they have a cute
five-year-old son named Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini).  When World War II
is nearly over, this charming family of three is imprisoned in a German
concentration camp.  Instead of revealing to his son the hopelessness of
their situation, Orefice pretends that they are involved in a harmless
game of hide and seek.  Giosue must avoid the men "playing the really
mean guys," or else him and his dad might not become "the winners" of
the make believe competition.
The remarkable thing about Life is Beautiful is that whilst it is a
holocaust movie, it is also a comedy, and a hilarious one at that.
Benigni's character is introduced during a long set of slapstick comedy
scenes, all of which resemble the work of Charlie Chaplain or even Mr.
Bean.  These are colorful and light-hearted moments that are - in their
most basic form - exceptional comedic work.  As we giggle, though, the
film's tone is changing, and we can feel it.  Benigni (also the director
and co-writer) does not give his audience an easy way out by defining
when the moment of emotional impact will occur. While we laugh, our
stomach begins to churn.
That is why Life is Beautiful has become the victim of a widely
conceived misguided criticism.  Due to the film's comedic nature, it has
been accused of ridiculing the Holocaust.  Never since critics dubbed In
the Company of Men as being just about men being cruel to woman has such
a ludicrous allegation occurred.  Strange as it may sound, but Life is
Beautiful would have actually been less powerful had it not had its many
moments of joy.  If it had just focused on the concentration camp, we
would not have had a period of time to compare it with.  Films like
Saving Private Ryan delve straight into the war itself, whereas Life is
Beautiful makes sure we know what kind of life its characters are
missing out on.
Roberto Benigni's performance as the extravagant Orefice seems at first
simplistic and one-dimensional.  But as the story moves along, an
interesting development occurs: Benigni simultaneously becomes the films
comedic character and its tool to evoke emotion.  Benigni shows unusual
talent for displaying a man who hides his fear and hatred, for the sake
of comforting his son.  Just dubbing this accomplishment as one of the
year's best performances probably doesn't give him justice; this is one
of the most unique acts you'll ever see.
If there is a definite fault in Life is Beautiful, it would lie in its
script and the way Benigni handles it.  On occasions, Benigni seems
unsure of where he wants to go, so he ponders more than he pursues.
That's fair enough when you imagine all the choices he would have had to
make - when to develop the "serious" side of his tale, when to tickle
the funny bone - but overall his direction is unmistakably brilliant.
So too, is this film.
Despite its depressing overture, Life is Beautiful is a beautiful
experience. Roberto Benigni doesn't just mix drama and comedy; he often
hides drama in the comedy.  In that way, we cry while we laugh, whilst
we celebrate a powerful and mesmerizing film achievement.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
FORCES OF NATURE
Cast: Sandra Bullock, Ben Affleck, Maura Tierney, Steve Zahn, Blythe
Danner, Ronnie Cox, Meredith Scott Lynn
Director: Bronwen Hughes
Screenplay: Marc Lawrence, Ian Bryce, Donna Roth
Australian theatrical release: May 6, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
A considerable portion of Forces of Nature feels like a 90's remake of
Plains, Trains and Automobiles, with only a couple of notable
differences.  Whereas Steven Martin desperately tried to make it home
for thanksgiving in 1989, Ben Affleck is engaged to be married and is
battling against time (and a fear of flying) to attend his wedding
ceremony.  From trailers and posters, it's no secret that this is a boy
meets girl film, but again, there are couple of exceptions.  This is not
your average Hollywood romantic comedy since its two principal
characters carry weighty emotional baggage with them.  Whilst there is
nothing drastically wrong with Forces of Nature - a very likeable
piece - it ends up stabbing itself in the foot by trying to be too smart
too quick.  There will undoubtedly be many smiling faces walking out
from the movie; others, like me, will feel a little cheated.
Affleck plays Ben Holmes, a man who is about to get married and
everybody is telling him how marriage is a bad idea.  His best man is
demanding that he sleep around before committing himself, and his
agitated parents hardly provide a welcoming example of holy matrimony.
On his way home, Ben's plane skids off the runway and he quickly finds
himself forming a partnership with a sexy, mysterious lady named Sarah
(Sandra Bullock) as they fight traffic, police and, yes, forces of
nature to get to their destinations.  Sarah's gorgeous looks and
fearless spirit tempt Ben, but he soon realizes that there is more to
her than she would like him to believe.
Much of Sandra Bullock's character is purposely self-explanatory, but
it's hard to grasp where she is coming from and what she is after.
Sure, she works on more levels than just pleasing eye candy for the
guys, but this doesn't substitute the fact that she is not properly
digested by the film's screenplay.  Consequently, this slightly hinders
Bullocks appealing performance and the believability of Sarah and Ben's
relationship.  Affleck has a better grasp on his material, and he
delivers his lines with the kind of goofy sincerity that made Steve
Martin a star.
This is quite a funny, and definitely likeable film littered with many
cynical jokes about marriage and relationships.  Look out for some
impressive work by cinematographer Elliot Davis, who gives the film a
lively visual feel - he even succeeds in making a rain storm the basis
of one of the film's best choreographed sequences.  With so much
romantic fluff, it's a wonder why director Bronwen Hughes decided on a
rather cynical novelty ending that is poorly staged and written.  Love,
it seems, carries confusion with it, and this is quite a confusing
completion to an otherwise simplistic story.  Forces of Nature succeeds
in giving viewers plenty to talk about in the car ride home, but this is
one film in which an unexpected ending works to its disadvantage.  Not a
bad film, in fact it's quite a good one.  But Forces of Nature tries to
be too smart too quick, when it should have been dumb but enjoyable.


Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
REVIEW: What Dreams May Come
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Robin Williams, Annabella Sciorra, Cuba Gooding Jr., Max von
Sydow, Rosalind Chao, Jessica Brooks, Josh Paddock
Director: Vincent Ward
Screenplay: Ron Bass based on the novel by Richard Matheson
Cinematography: Eduardo Serra
Australian theatrical release date: October 15, 1998
Of the recent visual cinematic journeys - the dark obscurity of Dark
City, the tranquility of City of Angels and gawky lavishness of
Armageddon - none have been more revealing than the surreal environments
of heaven and hell; depicted in What Dreams May Come.  When Hollywood's
latest flavors of the month seem to be disaster sagas and teen slashers,
it's probably a good thing that post-death scenarios might well become a
hip new narrative. With this film, the above mentioned City of Angels
and 1997's Spawn, we've seen beautiful, imaginable and disturbing
afterlife images.
And trust Robin Williams to jump on the bandwagon.  It was Australian
director Peter Weir who originally took him away from comedy and placed
him in Dead Poets Society, and since then he hasn't avoided comedy so
much as he has chosen more meatier roles.  Williams is not as good in
this film as he was in The Birdcage and Good Will Hunting (two of his
finest films), but he sure tries hard.  Probably a little too hard, in
fact, since his frowning eyebrows and wrinkled forehead oozes a genuine
love for acting.
Director Vincent Ward pieces together the film in a way that hasn't been
done before, using lush visuals and stunning realism to fulfill the
daunting task of creating a believable heaven and hell (and everything
that lies in between).  In the past, when computer generated effects
haven't been as remarkable, filmmakers have often reverted to afterlives
on Earth (Ghost, City of Angels, and countless others) or yielded ones
that don't look entirely believable (Bill & Ted's Bogus Journey).  The
colorful world of the protagonist's personal heaven is wonderful to
watch, and a hell with hundreds of heads stuck in the ground is a
positively chilling experience.  Again, Ward tries a little too hard,
pulling off stunning eye candy but lacking a good amount of emotional
intrigue.
Chris Neilson (Robin Williams) is a children's doctor who dies by an
oncoming car when he assists someone caught in an accident.  Years
earlier his two children died in similar circumstances, leaving his wife
Annie (Annabella Sciorra) in mental turmoil.  Chris discovers that his
personal heaven is a world inside one of Annie's paintings, and is
guided around this wondeful place by a former mentor, Dr Albert Lewis
(Cuba Gooding Jr.).  Back on Earth, Annie commits suicide and gets a one
way ticket to hell.  Upon hearing the news, Chris is bound by love for
his wife to search her out and bring her to heaven, at the risk of
losing his own mind in the process.
Quite an intriguing idea, really, thanks to the writing skills of Ronald
Bass, a man who taught himself to read at the age of three and wrote his
first novel at seventeen.  Bass is good at his craft, but his love for
writing probably exceeds his talent for it.  He is competent enough to
yield a clever scenario, but fails to keep the screenplay witty and
shrewd.  Thus the film becomes far too lose and unstructured, as Bass
resorts to letting characters tell Chris what he can and can't do, what
he should and shouldn't do, and how he could go about doing it.
Frankly, I would have liked Chris to discover a few things for himself.
Over acting aside, Robin Williams is quite pleasing in the title role,
as is Cuba Gooding Jr. and Max Von Sydow (who plays hells tour guide).
Annabella Sciorra is the best of the bunch, giving a strong fell of
humanity to her role - although her performance is far from faultless.
Other cast members feel a little out of place, including Josh Paddock
and Jessica Brooks, who play the two children.
Both Robin Williams and Vincent Ward were obviously keen to make What
Dreams May Come work as well as it possibly could, and they have created
a good film; not the brilliant one it longs to be.  And the answer to
making it better isn't to try harder.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
Cast: Jackie Chan, Chris Tucker, Tom Wilkinson, Elizabeth Peńa, Tzi Ma,
Julia Hsu, Philip Baker Hall
Director: Brett Ratner
Producers: Roger Birnbaum, Jonathan Glickman, Arthur M. Sarkissian
Screenplay: Jim Kouf, Ross LaManna
Australian theatrical release: January 14, 1999
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
Rush Hour's advertising posters read "The fastest hands in the East meet
the loudest mouth in the West," and that's probably the best description
of this film that you can get.  Chinese spectacle Jackie Chan is given
yet another action vehicle to revel in, but this time his partner is
comedian Chris Tucker, who often steals the show.   The Chan/Tucker
combination is a memorable screen partnership, and is sort of a mix
between the buddy relationship of Tim Robbins and Martin Lewrence in
Nothing to Loose, and the dynamic John Travolta/Nicholas Cage chemistry
in Face/Off.
The only difference here, of course, is that Chan's character is from
the East, and Tucker's the West.  That is emphasized emphatically by
director Brett Ratner, to the point where Rush Hour becomes a humorous
look at a clash of cultures with action scenes to boot (rather than the
other way around).
The calm and constructed Inspector Lee (Chan) and the loud, obnoxious
James Carter (Chris Tucker) form an unlikely partnership after being
brought together by a kidnapping case.  They are both cops - Lee from
China, Carter from Los Angeles - but have very contrasting ways to work.
Lee and Carter soon find themselves in all sorts of trouble, as they
bumble through the streets of LA, trying to find an eleven year old girl
and bring her kidnappers to justice.
Like most Jackie Chan films, Rush Hour relies largely on choreography
and physical stunts.  Chan's screen maneuvers are once again
spectacular, and even after more than thirty years of work, he hasn't
shown any signs of slowing down.  Ever since Rumble in the Bronx and
First Strike exhilarated Western viewers, it seems that even in
Hollywood nobody quite does action like Jackie does action.  That's why
it was just a matter of time until Chan signed on to a big budget
blockbuster.  In doing so, he has made some notable sacrifices: Rush
Hour does not take full advantage of his physical capabilities, and
Chan's subtle comic work is overshadowed by Tucker's loud presence.
When there are so many good reasons to see Rush Hour, it's a pity that
there are also quite a few reasons to give it a miss.  Brett Ratner
never knows exactly how to handle his two exceptional actors, so neither
of them are able to effectively develop on their stereotypical
characters.  Give Chan most of the action and Tucker most of the comedy,
and you have a great partnership, right?  Wrong.  When both actors could
be comedians, and both the action stars, it seems a bit of a cop-out
that their roles are pretty much limited to one or the other.
Fortunately for Ratner, he is far from incapable of making 90 minutes of
solid entertainment.  In fact, occasional moments of Rush Hour seem
almost magical and remind us of the film it could have been.  One scene
in which Lee and Carter share their different skills with each other is
a wonderfully high moment; a time when character and culture are
explored without viewers even noticing.   Most of Rush Hour's other
great moments do not rely on Ratner's direction, but rather the energy
that his two protagonists generate.  A memorable screen partnership is
usually enough to make a passable action film; and in the case of Rush
Hour, it is - although the finished product is not the classic it should
have been.  With any luck a sequel will be made, and Rush Hour 2 will
feature Jackie Chan and Chris Jackie at their best.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
STAR WARS EPISODE 1:
THE PHANTOM MENACE
Cast: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Samuel L. Jackson, Oliver Ford Davies, Terence Stamp,
Pernilla August, Frank Oz, Ahmed Best, Kenny Baker, Anthony Daniels, Ray
Park
Director: George Lucas
Screenplay: George Lucas
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
I'm convinced that George Lucas is not the same acute, sharp-witted and
earnest-to-goodness Star Wars creator that perhaps he was twenty years
ago.  Either that, or he has become so infatuated with his phenomenally
successful franchise that he has lost the sense of what it takes to make
a good movie.  Thin representations and special effects have replaced
three-dimensional characters and an exciting story line, so the result
is a package that is visually impressive but ultimately soulless. Under
pressure, George Lucas has succumbed to the dark side of formulaic
filmmaking.
To be fair, anything that he created would have been criticized in some
way.  After all, how can the most hyped film in history live up to its
expectations?  Simply, it can't, but The Phantom Menace is a great
disappointment because it is ridden with elements that the other Star
Wars films generally avoided: a cliché script, wooden performances and
style over substance direction.  Granted, there are some very nice
touches in the film, but relatively every moment is over-worked by
Lucas' intrusive direction and John Williams' excellent but often
overpowering score.  When the movie starts and that familiar text and
audio begins, I'm sure that many viewers will feel the same kind of
adrenaline rush and excitement that I felt.  It is wonderful to feel
like a kid again, and this is the tactic that Lucas effortlessly uses to
immediately captivate his audience.  He sets us up, and all he has to do
is knock us down.  Easy, right?  Wrong.
The plot synopsis of The Phantom Menace reads a lot like a Star Trek
film: Jedi master Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and his faithful apprentice
Obi-Wan (Ewan McGregor) are sent as ambassadors to negotiate between The
Trade Federation and Naboo, which is ruled by Queen Amidala (Natalie
Portman).  The negotiations do not go well, and the two Jedi's soon find
themselves rescuing Amidala from capture.  Escaping from the clutches of
robots and a strange alien race, the Jedi's flee to the desolate planet
of Tattoine and damage their ship in the process.  When he tries to buy
spare parts from a shady salesman, Qui-Gon meets a young boy named
Anakin (Jake Lloyd).  He senses that the force (for those who don't
know, is the almighty power "that binds the galaxy together") is
unusually strong will Anakin, and bargains for the boy as well as parts
for their ship to fly home.
Predictably, our heroes encounter some distractions on their mission to
protect the queen.  Qui-Gon accidentally saves the life of a
fish/bird-like creature named Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best), who is
dedicated to saving his life in return; Anakin volunteers himself to
partake in a high stakes "pod race;" and Darth Maul (Ray Park), the evil
apprentice to Darth Sidious (Peter Serafinowicz), is intent on wiping
out the Jedi.
Yes, the special effects are state-of-the-art, but contrary to many
reports I don't think that they're the best we've ever seen.  On many
occasions the vivid and obvious computer animation works to the film's
disadvantage, making it look like a sort of spectacular light show
rather than an exhilarating movie experience.  The pod race scene is too
long and predictably staged.  It bears very loose similarities to the
forest chase scene in Return of the Jedi, but this one is entirely
derivative.  By far the best moment that The Phantom Menace has to offer
comes towards its completion, in which the two Jedi's face off against
Darth Maul.  It's a riveting and exciting high in the film, but even
here Lucas doesn't manipulate his material to good effect.  Instead of
pacing the scene well and building momentum and suspense, he continually
cuts to different scenes and plays Williams' score at a distracting
sound level.  This light saber duel is spectacularly shot but its
editing is too tight and rigid.
Also lacking in The Phantom Menace is a spectrum of intriguing
characters.  Whilst Queen Amidala is convincingly played by Natalie
Portman, whose dialogue helps her come across as a wise leader, almost
everybody else (and their characters) fall short. This is primarily due
to the film's script (also by Lucas) which under-develops its
characters, and implies their personalities rather than examines them.
Darth Maul was a potentially menacing enemy but he barely speaks a word,
so his costume design is as frightening as he gets.  There's also that
hideously annoying creature, Jar Jar Binks, who is obviously marketed
towards those whose shoe size exceeds their age.  A lovable and fun
character like Han Solo is sorely missed, as is a truly sinister bad guy
like Darth Vader.
Occasionally, The Phantom Menace reveals Lucas' infinitive vision of the
Star Wars universe with imagination and color.  But he is a pretentious
filmmaker, who seems to think that he can throw absolutely anything into
a movie so long as it has a Star Wars label to it.  What else could
explain this film's obvious parallels to Christianity, ranging from a
virgin birth to the freeing of slaves.  Maybe it's true that the movie
will make more sense once the rest of the series has been completed, but
I saw precious few things in the film that reminded me of the wonder and
inspiration that the original Star Wars series evoked.  The Phantom
Menace misses out on the sense of adventure of A New Hope, the emotional
resonance of The Empire Strikes Back or Return of the Jedi's highly
satisfying climax.  It's a star wars film, sure, but The Phantom Menace
feels like a video game that you just can't get properly working, no
matter how much money you put into it.


Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
The rubber faced antics of Jim Carey have delighted and even disgusted 
audiences worldwide since the dawn of his career.  Perhaps impressing more 
people as an animated "mask" rather than a Pet Detective, Carey has earnt many 
loyal fans in his short lived in Hollywood spotlight - and expectations were 
high.  For the number one actor in Hollywood, the dismal success of the Cable 
Guy hurt his career badly, as he plundered down in fame and credibility.  Now 
the stakes have fallen, and it is a great time for a great comeback, which will 
in turn gain more fans than he ever had before.
Fletcher Reed (Jim Carey) is not your typical lawyer.  He isn't afraid to bend 
evidence to the needs of his case - not to mention lie, hurt and deceive his 
way to the top of his profession, crushing opponents and even those who care 
about him along the way.  Although some say he indeed fits the description of 
the typical lawyer, Fletcher's character is definitely appealing to the general 
population - and Carey is perfect for this role.  Fletcher's son Max is the 
person who is most affected by his unorthodox and inconsiderate life style, he 
loves his father but hardly gets to spend any quality time with him.  So when 
his birthday comes along, Max makes a simple wish - that his father cannot lie 
for a day.  Surprise surprise, it comes true.
Some hilarious, witty scenes are to follow as Fletcher slowly discovers that he 
is able to tell nothing but the truth - which spells doom for an involving 
court case that he must win for the benefit of his career.  Reed then finds 
himself resisting beggars, insulting strangers, smashing into concrete walls 
and even wrestling a blue pen to discover the error in his ways and ultimately 
change his life for the better.  And after discovering that Max and his ex-wife 
are moving to Boston, Fletcher is now caught up in a race against time to save 
his family and his soul.
The critics have has their say against this movie, but at the end of the day 
the fact remains that it is brilliantly funny and consistent throughout.  
Really the only major fault I could find in this film was the possibility that 
you won't hear some of the dialogue due to severe laughter around you, which 
was true in my case and I'm sure many others too.  Jim Carey is nothing but a 
delight to the film, showing that he can not only do his usual overacting 
routine but also proving to critics that he can provide genuine heart felt 
acting.  In all honesty, Liar Liar is simply the best of its kind, and I would 
think twice before I say that Carey will produce a better film later on in his 
career.  Liar Liar has been a worldwide success because this is, simply, 
brilliant - in all senses of the word.
4 = STARS
Jim Carey, a simple yet effective plot and continuous chuckles is the perfect 
ingredient for success 


Title
Review for Hana-bi (1997)
Cast: 'Beat' Takeshi Kitano, Kayoko, Kishimoto, Ren Osugi, Susumu
Terajima, Tetsu Watanabe, Hakurya, Taro Itsumi, Makoto Ashikawa, Yuko
Daike
Director: Takeshi Kitano
Screenplay: Takeshi Kitano
Australian theatrical release: September 3, 1998
>From its gentle opening images to the final, terrifying moment, it is
clear that Hana-Bi has skillfully avoided the not so subtle subtleties
of American cinema.  Japanese media star "Beat" Takeshi Kitano wrote,
directed, starred in and edited this film, and this is the first Kitano
movie ever released in Australia.  The screenplay has plenty of guns and
violence, but the counterpart is an emotional element unlike any other
in recent memory.  Its protagonist is often an aggressive, deadly and
obnoxious character, but he also provides the basis for an exquisite
insight into human endeavors of loss, redemption, courage and faith.
Hana-Bi means "flower" and "fire," but when converted into English you
get Fireworks.  That's a pity, because the conversion loses the dual
meaning of Kitano's title.  I have a feeling that the dialogue in
Hani-Bi has suffered from the same loss of coherency; perhaps a little
less so, but it's still evident none the less.  Although, it was a wise
move to edit subtitles into the English version, and not have it dubbed.
John Woo's 1989 thriller Die xue shuang xiong (known in western
countries as The Killer) demonstrated how ridiculously simplistic
converted dialogue can be.
For most of the film, former cop Nishi (Kitano) and his wife Miyuki
(Kayoko Kishimoto) barely speak a word; their silence says more than
anything else could.  Miyuki is dying of Leukemia, and Nishi is
determined to do as much as he can to make sure that her last moments on
Earth are cherished.  Other dramatic elements complicate his life,
including his best friend Horibe (Ren Osugi) becoming a paraplegic after
an unprecedented assault.  "Working is all I have known my whole life,"
Horibe says, now on a wheelchair outside his seaside home.  To pass the
time, Horibe takes up painting, whilst Nishi resorts to crime - robbing
a bank in order to pay for an exotic holiday for him and his wife.
The above synopsis may sound a little wanky and sentimental, but that's
the best insight I can give into a film which cannot be defined or
categorized.  It would be easy to label Hana-Bi as a drama, an
action/drama or an action/drama/comedy, but none prove to be
satisfactory definitions.  Though in Japanese, Kitano has written
Hana-Bi in a universal language.  The language of loss, redemption,
courage and faith.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER AND UNCUT
Featuring the voices of: Trey Parker and Matt Stone
Director: Trey Parker
Screenplay: Trey Parker & Matt Stone and Pam Brady
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut is exactly what concerned parents
have feared that television and film would produce.  It is insulting,
dirty, sexist, racist and obnoxious; it's unapologetic and in your face.
Yet millions will flock to see the film, and most of them - myself
included - laugh at the sight of Saddam Huessein holding a fake penis,
trying to entertain the devil who is, at the time, lying in bed next to
him.  Perhaps it's reassuring to know that whilst there are plenty of
warped minds in the world, there are also the minds of Trey Parker and
Matt Stone, who have taken their cult TV show to the next step of
popularity and censorship tolerance.
'Longer and 'uncut' are appropriate words considering the trouble that
Parker, the director, has gone to, to ensure that his film performs on a
level that perhaps the television show - which looks tame in
comparison - always aspired to.  The good news for all you South Park
fanatics is that the movie, which is by no means a cult classic or a
must see, delivers the jokes and delivers them well.  Which is
convenient, because this film has more profanities than Eddy Murphy on
ecstasy, and for unsuspecting viewers will be more off-putting than Mal
Colston on a bad hair day.
Our four unlikely heroes are Kyle, Stan, Cartman and Kenny, four young
kinds growing up in a small American town.  Trouble begins when the boys
attend a screening of  "The 'Terrence and Philip Movie," which I will
simply explain as a continuous collection of swearing and fart jokes.
Sure enough, these impressionable kids soon scream all kinds of
profanities around town, and all the other children join in.  Before you
know it, teachers at school are teaching how not to swear, and many of
the town's parents - including Cartman's mum (Mary Kay Bergman), who is
described "a dirty slut" - search for whom to blame.  After a catchy
music track titled "Blame Canada," the US does exactly that and war is
declared. Meanwhile, Saddam Huessein and his boyfriend, Lucifer, plot to
take over the world.
South Park is laced with cynicism and sarcasm at every corner, and in
that regard, it's not the piece of trash that some may have believed it
to be.  Yes, there is a little depth in South Park, even though you
might have to dig down deep to find it.  It's this film's humor that
makes it an appealing piece of modern television culture, produced in an
era where animated programs can carry just as much weight as any others.
Many of these shows rely on flowing dialogue rather than impressive
animation, and comical impersonations rather than profound political
insights.  South Park certainly doesn't rely on its animation - most of
which could easily have been made twenty years ago - so it's the film's
darkly humorous dialogue that gives it its edge.  If Parker and Stone
have proved anything, it's that there is nowhere they will not go, and
no gag they not will implement - regardless of how cheap the joke might
be.
Strangely enough, South Park is appealing as an eighty-minute collection
of gags and silly songs.  I found the film to be ten times more
satisfying and entertaining than one of its television episodes, and a
thoroughly amusing comedy if accepted on its own merits.  Thank heavens
that South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut amused me.  It could have been
accused of openly contaminating the minds of children, if Cartman didn't
say it first: "this movie has warped my fragile little mind."
 ----------------------------------------------
Review Š copyright Luke Buckmaster

Title
Review for Black Dog (1998)
Cast: Patrick Swayze, Meat Loaf, Randy Travis, Gabriel Casseus, Brian
Vincent, Graham Beckel, Brenda Strong, Rusty De Wees
Director: Kevin Hooks
Producers: Mace Nuefield, Robert Rehme, Gary Levinsohn, Mark Gordon
Screenplay: William Mickelberry and Dan Vining
Cinematography: Buzz Feitshans
Music: George S. Clinton
One of the reasons why last year's excellent action/thriller Breakdown
worked so well was that it genuinely yielded a scenario which was
entirely plausible and imaginable, making sense of its advertising line
"it could happen to you."  The films main star, Kurt Russel, accurately
conveyed the character of an average bloke thrust into unfair mayhem and
turmoil.  The Black Dog bears some distinct characteristics: there's a
lot of big, beefy trucks, many chase scenes and a whole lot of pressure
inserted onto one individual.  In fact, it's a wonder why it bears such
a silly title - The Big Black Truck would have been a much more fitting
name for the film.
The fact that Patrick Swayze is now in the spotlight doesn't bother me,
but his character - a macho man trucky - is so full of testosterone
packed stunts and attributes that he has lost all hope of fooling us
into believing that his adventures could happen to anyone.
Swayze is all over the place as Jack Crews - a gliding, clinging and
recklessly driving individual who we are expected to believe is an
ordinary guy.  Crews agrees to drive a truck (which he doesn't know is
full of artillery) for ten thousand big ones when him and his wife
(Brenda Strong) are unable to produce enough funds to keep their house.
The babbling and ironical bible quoting "boss" (Meatloaf) sets the
operation up, but there is more to his twisted plan than simply deliving
the weapons.  Thus, Crews enters a (yawn) web of deceit,
double-crossing, mendacity and murder.  Naturally, the head bad guys are
left to last, and Cruise's family is an obvious target for bribery.
The many action scenes - which are, no doubt, the films core and selling
point - are surprisingly dull, repetitive and boring.  They focus on
Crews and his small band of idiots, who attempt to rid the road of the
many bad guys out to kill 'em. Much to the viewers annoyance, it just
goes on and on and on, without doing anything distinctly different.
For many years I've found myself enjoying corny action flicks, but The
Black Dog pushed itself way beyond the boundaries of my passion.  It not
only failed to impress, innovate or engage me - but it actually made me
wonder why I liked these types of films in the first place.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
STEPMOM
Cast: Julia Roberts, Susan Sarandon, Ed Harris, Jena Malone, Liam Aiken,
Jason Maves
Director: Chris Columbus
Screenplay: Gigi Levangie, Jessie Nelson, Steven Rogers, Karen Leigh
Hopkins and Ronald Bass, based on a story by Gigi Levangie
Running time: 125 minutes
Australian theatrical release: January 21, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
It appears as though everybody and their dog wanted to contribute
something to Stepmom.  What other reason could explain the seven
scriptwriters (one not credited) and eleven producers involved in the
production?  It is ironical, then, that the greatest fault in this film
lies in its screenplay.  Despite solid efforts from an ensemble cast,
there is only so much that actors can do.  Julia Roberts and Susan
Sarandon tried desperately to make Stepmom work, only to find themselves
with too much screen time, and too little to say.  Blunder blockbuster
Armageddon suffered from a similar problem, with nine writers and no
hint of a coherent storyboard.  At least this time, director Chris
Colombus occasionally builds some worthwhile dramatic moments.
With Stepmom Colombus departures from his trend of lightheaded movies;
the best known being Home Alone, Mrs. Doubtfire and Nine Months (that's
why this "serious" film didn't have "by the director of Home Alone" on
its posters).  When Stepmom drifts into drama and confrontations, you
get the sense that Colombus is unsure as to how to handle his material.
Many moments go way too long and are emphasized over sufficiently, and
much of the dialogue could have been said in far fewer words.
Consequently, Stepmom loses interest in scenes that could have been
edited into something tighter and more structured.  With so much speech,
a good half-hour could have been slashed from its 124 minute running
time.
Isabel (Julia Roberts), a professional photographer, is the girlfriend
of workaholic lawyer Luke (Ed Harris), a divorced father of two
children.  She regularly takes care of Anna (Jena Malone), who has just
started dating, and Ben (Liam Aiken), a little kid with an aspiration to
be a magician.  Luke's ex-wife Jackie (Susan Sarandon) dislikes Isobelle
and sees her as a threat to the family, so naturally she is quick to
find fault in every mistake Isabel makes.  But Jackie is soon forced to
reevaluate her views on life and love upon the news that she has cancer,
and not long to live.  The two women form an unlikely friendship and
respect for each other whilst Luke fades into the background, presumably
working on an important case.
Allow me to stress that Luke - the most important male character (with
the possible exception of Ben) - performs an annoying disappearing act.
Lead female roles in film are not easy to find nowadays (though we've
had some good ones lately with My Best Friend's Wedding and There's
Something About Mary), but the novelty of having Julia Roberts and Susan
Sarandon dominate the screen is quickly worn off.  The always-reliable
Ed Harris is given enough ground to make a solid performance, but not
enough screen time to make a memorable one.  As Harris performs his
disappearing act, something even greater than a gifted actor vanishes -
the film's father figure is also missed.  Whilst it's great to see a
couple of talented women star in movie that is primarily theirs, it is
foolish to ignore a male actor when one is desperately needed
(especially one of the caliber of Ed Harris).
For everything that it is not, Stepmom at least provides realism and
maturity.  The seven scriptwriters take a good shot at looking into
sensitive family themes, which consist primarily of divorce and
re-marriage.  The film is most painful when it looks through the eyes of
the children, although some of their pain is a little exaggerated -
yelling and crying is one thing, subtly examining their desire for love
and acceptance is another.  I guess this is something that one writer
could do better than seven, twenty or a hundred. Chalk that down as a
message to the makers of Stepmom: hire fewer people and do a better job.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or for any inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
Cast: Cate Blanchett, Geoffrey Rush, Joseph Fiennes, Richard
Attenborough, Christopher Eccleston, Jamie Foreman,Edward Hardwick,
James Frain, Emily Mortimer, Kelly MacDonald, Amanda Ryan, Kathy Burke,
Terence Rigby, John Gielgud
Director: Shekhar Kapur
Screenplay: Michael Hirst
Australian theatrical release: October 22, 1998
It's somewhat of an irony that the first English speaking film directed
by Shekhar Kapur is, indeed, very English.  Set in the 1500's, it's the
true story of the reign of Elizabeth I, Queen of England.
My philosophy regarding period dramas is simple: if a production crew is
going to bother to dress up in old clothing and film in periodic
settings, make it worthwhile.  Don't just look the part and frolic
around wearing leggings and tights, or - god forbid - we might get
another Sense and Sensibility.  But thanks to some tightly woven
screenplays, there have been times when period dramas can prove
blisteringly powerful.  Wings of the Dove, for example, developed its
setting and characters hand in hand and proved to be an excellent
experience.  As was The Crucible - an adaptation of the classic play -
which reeked of raw energy and almost overwhelming tension.  Elizabeth
does nothing remarkable, and only a few things wrong.
After the death of Queen Mary (Kathy Burke) the crown is passed along to
her sister, Elizabeth (Cate Blancett).  England is in a disastrous
state - bankrupt, has no army, and is under threat from the French.
Chief advisor Sir William Cecil (Richard Attenborough) urges Elizabeth
to marry - either the French Duke of Norfolk (Christopher Eccleston) or
her dead sister's husband, King Philip of Spain - to secure the future
of England.  But Elizabeth is enjoying a steamy romance with her
childhood sweet heart Robert Dudley (Joseph Fiennes).  She values the
opinions of her Master of Spies, Sir Walsingham (Geoffrey Rush), even
though he is disliked at court.  With the responsibility of a nation of
aggressive Protestants and Catholics, Elizabeth must steer her country
out of a crisis, and exposure those plotting against her.
Michael Hirst, who has been writing screenplays for around fifteen
years, penned Elizabeth's script with a messy innocence, of which is
often greatly simplistic.  A considerable portion of this film is
dedicated to the romance between Elizabeth and Dudley, and Hirst makes
it clear that the attraction between these two is based on social
status - the queen having a jolly time seducing a young man, and vice
versa.  We are amply told why they are attracted to each other, but
given no insight into what they actually feel for each other.
Rush's Walsingham eats up another portion, a dark and enigmatic
character who gives a good amount of credibility to the picture.  The
paradox of his personality is given in one moment when Walsingham
explains to a young boy that he has all of his life ahead of him, just
before neatly slicing his throat.  It's that sort of irony which gives
infinite possibilities to his character, but Kapur fails to complete the
difficult task of really bringing him to life.  Geoffrey Rush is well
suited to the role and gives a plausible if not pleasing performance,
looking carefully restrained without appearing as lifeless.
Speculation has risen over Cate Blancett's performance as "The Virgin
Queen", and Polygram Filmed Entertainment is pouring millions of dollars
into promoting her for an Academy Award.  She is bound to please many
viewers, but for me, she never quite fitted the bill.  Blancett has a
look of opaqueness and transparency, and plays her part bit by bit,
seemingly waiting for her next chance to look opaque and transparent.
Critics are no doubt going to praise Elizabeth for its obvious
excellence in visuals and a few very good scenes (balancing some pretty
awful ones). But as people after the media screening began consulting on
how good they thought it was ('That was brilliant, just brilliant,' I
caught one critic saying), I was left cold. I hadn't been able to invest
emotionally in the protagonist because I didn't understand her motives
I didn't know where she was coming from, or what she was after. That's
strange, since Elizabeth is largely a character study, and if I didn't
get a good insight into the main character, it could have only been
moderately successful.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
MEET JOE BLACK
Cast: Brad Pitt, Anthony Hopkins, Claire Forlani, Jake Weber, Marcia Gay
Harden, Jeffrey Tambor
Director: Martin Brest
Screenplay: Ron Osborn & Jeff Reno and Kevin Wade and Bo Goldman
Australian theatrical release: March 11, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
Meet Joe Black often borderlines on becoming a technical mess.  The
script fumbles, the direction is passive and the editing seems almost
non-existent.  But somehow, I find it hard to hate this film.  Meet Joe
Black has a sort of goof sincerity, a feeling that the production crew's
hearts and minds were in the right place, but they have ultimately
failed to package their product successfully.  There are many rewarding
features on show here, but every one of them is exaggerated and
sensationalized until they become faintly tiresome.  With a running time
of almost three hours, director Martin Brest (Scent of a Woman) never
knows exactly when to call it quits.  During his extravagantly long
creation, however, Brest hits upon some worthwhile lessons of life and
love.  It's just a pity that it takes patient ears to listen to them.
Media tycoon William Parrish (Anthony Hopkins) has not got long to live.
In fact, Death himself has struck a bargain with Parrish: if he shows
him the wonders of life, he will prolong his death until he is no longer
interested in human behavior.  Parrish grudgingly accepts, and
introduces death (with the newly acquired body of Brad Pitt) as "Joe
Black."  Black experiments with simplistic human treats like peanut
butter, and ponders over the meaning of the phrase "as certain as death
and taxes."  Before long, though, his experimentation becomes more than
just skin deep.  Parish's daughter Susan (the lovely Claire Forlani)
takes a shining to Black, and before long an uncertain relationship
builds between them.
In my review of 1998's The Mask of Zorro, I said that Anthony Hopkins
was "one of the true masters of American cinema," and Meet Joe Black
strengthens my belief.  On paper, his characters might seem cliché and
his scenes might seem witless, but Hopkins gives them credibility.   In
this case, the character of Bill Parrish could easily have appeared as
cold and inaccessible.  Fortunately, Hopkins gives him warmth and a
heart, whilst also providing a cutting-edge authoritarian presence.
Parrish is not unlike Disney's Scrooge McDuck; they are both smart and
shrewd, but have a lovable core that makes everything they do
intriguing.  Brad Pitt's presence is often wooden, but he is playing an
out-of-environment character so I guess it's intentional.  It is almost
as if Pitt only chooses roles that have a reason to be bad - he was a
vampire in Interview with the Vampire, a dopey stoner in True Romance, a
nut case in Twelve Monkeys, and in Seven Years in Tibet he wasan
Austrian.
Meet Joe Black is modeled in the old-fashioned style of grand cinema.
The screenplay was loosely based on 1934's Death Takes a Holiday, and
the qualities of yesteryear are on show here.  The film takes a lot of
time - in fact, way too much time - to build a climax which, naturally,
ends in an explosion of fireworks.  Whilst it is often hard to accept a
film with such a slow pace, it is also hard to resist it.  The central
romance between Pitt and Forlani is a nice bit of romantic fluff: it's
instantly forgettable but enjoyable at the time.
What is unforgivable about Meet Joe Black is that all it achieves could
have been made in half the time.  The three hours of footage were not
made because the plot is especially complex, but rather because almost
every shot is over-filmed. The dialogue is drawn out and loses much of
its interest, and there are more than a few scenes that could have been
axed all together.  Still, amongst all this cinematic mayhem, Meet Joe
Black is a film with a heart.  It takes risks, and although many of them
do not pay off, they are generally pleasing experiences.  I could
imagine that Meet Joe Black would make a good subject for a film school:
how to take a potentially excellent film and exaggerate it to the point
where it pushes the boundaries of acceptance.


Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
It's true how the saying goes - "if you want reality, look out the
window."  The fascinating thing about watching a Neil LaBute film is
that they serve as the windows, peaking into lives of disillusioned
oddballs; people who represent different elements of society, all
trapped inside LaBute's narrative prisms that reflect different parts of
ourselves back at us.
LaBute's astounding debut film In the Company of Men quickly glided in
and out of selected Australian cinemas last year, suffering from more
than just a few negative reviews, and presumably relied on audience word
of mouth for the few people who were fortunate enough to see it.  The
film was meticulously plotted and sharply directed by LaBute, who laced
every one of its scenes with dark - some might say twisted - humor, not
before developing a screenplay that functioned both as a character study
and a manifestation of the director's biting views on corporate life in
America.   He turned a roller coaster of a screenplay into a power house
film; a movie that builds blazingly fast physiological momentum in the
minds of those who watch it, before the inevitably nasty conclusion that
puts a new resonance on everything that preceded it.  It's an experience
that's hard to shake.
Also hard to shake - but on a different level - is Your Friends and
Neighbors, which, like the film before it, promises to tell us as much
about its characters as it does ourselves.  In essence, the film is very
much like a stage play in that its settings and backdrops are not
crucial to its plot; for instance, LaBute often films in a supermarket
or a bookstore because, heck, these are places for us simply to listen
to his characters talk.  And they do talk.  The vast majority of the
film is dialogue based, and this ensures lengthy conversations between
the five principal characters.
It was hard to write a synopsis for this film, since no character's name
is ever mentioned in all of its running time - the characters talk to
each other as if they are strangers (my kingdom for a festival press
kit!).  Only after the film could I find out their names.  Drama teacher
Jerry (Ben Stiller) is told to "shut the fuck up" during sex by his
girlfriend Terri (Catherine Keener) - it appears he talks too much.
Jerry's best friend Barry (Aaron Eckhart, who played Chad to perfection
in In the Company of Men) is having sexual difficulties with his wife
Mary (Amy Brenneman).  He is not worried about the situation, however,
because Barry firmly believes that no woman can make love to him quite
like he can.  Jerry and Barry's pal Cary (Jason Patric) is a ruthlessly
honest and aggressive womanizer.  All the characters search for
happiness in the form of sexual bliss, and none of them can seem to find
satisfaction (LaBute includes a lesbian, a couple of affairs and a
retelling of a homosexual encounter for good measure).
Your Friends and Neighbors is really about a failure of communication in
society, in an age where sexual innocence has not only been lost, it's
been trampled on.  It's hard to pinpoint the foundations of the film's
themes - exactly where it is coming or what it is trying to achieve -
but that's all part of LaBute's confronting direction.  With tight
camera shots that seemed shoved right in front of the actors faces, he
brings us right into the picture, then tells us everything we think we
need to know, only for us to later realize that he really didn't tell us
much at all.
That's not to say that the dialogue in Your Friends and Neighbors is
shallow, instead, it's just very restrained, and flows awkwardly with a
strong sense of familiarity - a sense that we've talked about similar
things ourselves, even though the truth might be that we've never
mustered up enough courage to ask our friends about the best fuck
they've ever had (and, if this is a frequent topic in your
conversations, chances are you'll have never heard anything quite like
Jason Patric's post-gym shower story).  With so much talking but so
little reflection on their own lives, we must presume that sometime
off-screen the characters are doing the real talking, the soul-searching
within themselves.  We must presume this because otherwise the
characters become too robotic, too cold to be intimate with, but so damn
ruthless that we can't help but enjoy watching and being disgusted by
them - they're all Mr Hydes and no Dr Jekles.  We can presume, safely,
that much of LaBute's power comes from the things he doesn't tell us.
He is certainty a glass-is-half-empty kind of director, but it would be
naive to presume that he doesn't have reason for being so.  LaBute's a
director without subtlety, and a writer whose screenplays are tight,
somber and aggressive in tone.  Whilst Your Friends and Neighbors is not
the incredible film that In the Compmany of Men was, it's an
experimental piece that's works on similar levels (although toned down a
few notches in comparison).  LaBute does take some missteps on the way,
including allowing his narrative to become a little too void of action,
and the film - although scripted precisely and sharply - feels a little
messy upon completion.
Without going into too much detail - I am already pushing my word
limit - the film's cast all contribute excellent performances.  Ben
Stiller displays a confident yet reserved charisma as the scheming
Jerry, and Aaron Eckhart and Jason Patric are also fine.  The women fare
less well, mainly because the men took the meatiest parts.
"If you want reality, look out the window."  Screw that.  Open the door,
and climb inside the world of Neil LaBute.  You know you want to.  Just
don't come running back to me and don't, whatever you do, say I didn't
warn you.


Title
Review for In the Company of Men (1997)
If there were ever such a thing as the opposite of a chick flick, In the
Company of Men would be it.  Working with a mere budget of US $25,000 yet
achieving the filmmakers trophy from the 1997 Sundance Film Festival, this is
truly an independent and very daring drama fueled by the desire to showcase
exactly how destructive people can be.
Chad (Aaron Eckhart) and Howard (Matt Malloy) are two corporate businessmen who
have been mucked around with by women a few too many times.  One night in a bar
room they decide that in order to reek revenge on women in general, they will
target a vulnerable lady, take advantage of her and break her heart.  Shell be
reaching for the sleeping pills within a week, Chad says to Howard, And you
and me will laugh about this until were very old men.
Soon after their arrival in an unnamed town, where they spend 6 weeks working
out business affairs, Chad meets a charming and beautiful deaf woman named
Suzanne (Stacey Edwards).  He immediately picks her out as a perfect target, and
both guys overwhelm the young lady by dating her and giving much needed
attention.  Suzanne begins to fall for Chad, and feel sorry for Howard.
What becomes of this platter of charm, emotional power and verbal violence is
really quite extraordinary.  In the Company of Men shows more than anything else
that the power and dexterity of the spoken word is back, and is very much alive
in independent films.  As Aaron Eckhart said during an interview last year: It
s not that Hollywood cant do it, I just dont think they can trust it.
Newcomer director Neil LaBute has shown astonishing skill in creating what
should be known as the best film to slip past the realms of mainstream cinema
since last years Sling Blade.  Its dangerously powerful, impeccably acted,
sharply written and so corporately controversial that it may be simply too
overwhelming for some audiences.
The integrity, and the skill, that is so shrewdly evident all throughout means
that it will not be quickly forgottenand I know it will lurk in the dark alleys
of my mind whenever I see a couple together on the silver screen again.
Enjoy it on its entertaining merits  there are plenty of them - but beware: its
riveting, disturbing stuff.  And its utterly brilliant.


Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
RUSHMORE
Cast: Jason Schwartzman, Bill Murray, Olivia Williams, Seymour Cassel, Brian
Cox, Mason Gamble, Sara Tanaka
Director: Wes Anderson 
Screenplay: Wes Anderson, Owen Wilson
Australian theatrical release: February 25, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 
4 stars
Their are quirky films, and then their is Rushmore, a film that is intent on
deviating from the norm of filmmaking. The "hero" of this story is unlike any
other in recent memory. Geeky but sort of cool Max Fischer (Jason Schwartzman,
in a bold debut performance) is a wacky protagonist, a guy with a mean
attitude but a soft center.  Playing alongside Schwartzman is Bill Murray (in
one of his better roles of recent years), who has an equally peculiar
character.  Murray and Schwartzman live out every comedian's dream: they get
to act simultaneously smart and silly, and receive a whole lot of laughs in
the process.  To further compliment the production, Wes Anderson directors
Rushmore intelligently and humorously, whilst not stripping his intelligent
moments of humor, and not making his humor particularly intelligent.
Max is a 10th grader at Rushmore Academy, and for him, school is his life.  He
is involved in numerous extracurricular roles, ranging from captain of the
fencing and debating teams to the founder of the Double-team Dodgeball
Society.  With his thick rimmed glasses, blazer and quick thinking mind, Max
is often thought of as a kid genius.  Truth is, he's a lousy student and is
under constant threat of expulsion.  Max falls in love with a first grade
teacher named Miss Cross (Olivia Williams), and tries to win her over by
hatching various plans.  When Latin classes are about to be replaced by
Japanese, Max cleverly makes the subject compulsory for all senior years;
later, he attempts to construct an aquarium on Rushmore's baseball field.
For help raising money, Max consults school benefactor Mr. Blume (Bill
Murray), a seedy millionaire who appears to be in the middle of a mid-life
crisis.  Blume is attracted to Max's energy and eccentric ways, and the two
become good friends.  But when Max discovers that Blume is also in love with
Miss Cross, a mean war initiates between the two (at one stage, Blume runs
over Max's bicycle, so Max removes the brakes from his car).  As Max
desperately attempts to act like an adult, Blume finds excitement in acting
like a child.
Almost all of Rushmore's oddly timed humor relies on its characters.  Whilst
we develop a good understanding of Max and Blume's personalities, they are
never predictable and never boring.  The relationship between these two really
needed to work, and it does, much to the credit of Jason Schwartzman and Bill
Murray. Schwartzman's first film performance is a memorable one, and is
skillfully played with a mixture of nastiness and goofy sincerity.  Murray has
received great but small roles recently in Wildthings and Kingpin, but his
work in Rushmore is much closer to what he is capable of achieving.  Murray is
a brilliant comic performer and this film channels his capabilities, producing
a nice bit of whimsical acting.
It's the winning formula of offbeat comedy and drama that makes Rushmore such
a delight to watch.  Wes Anderson's and co-writer Owen Wilson's screenplay is
smart and original - they understand how to craft extraordinary characters,
and have fun doing so.  Though some scenes in Rushmore have little or no
point, the film is always amusing enough to warrant an audience.  Rushmore has
reinvented the teenage comedy genre (similar to what The Breakfast Club did in
1985, and what Can't Hardly Wait attempted to do in 1998) by giving itself a
quirkiness and originality that is rarely found in contemporary cinema.  There
are more reasons to see Rushmore other than its originality, but none are
quite as refreshing.  


Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
There is nothing more compelling then watching a think about it film; and its
obvious that director John Genry wanted to give us something distinguished to
contemplate in his latest epic The Ice Storm.
Set in the mutable period of the 1970s, sexual and sociable change takes place
between adults and children who dont realize the full repercussions of their
actions. Thus a storm brews, but this films focus is definitely not on the
harsh weather that adds to (but does not make) the icy cold feel from start to
end.
Ben Hood (Kevin Kline) is having an affair with Janey Carver (Sigourney Weaver)
behind the back of wife Elena (Joan Allen), who is trying not to notice the
obvious signs that their marriage is falling apart.  Meanwhile their 14-year-old
daughter Wendy (Christina Ricci) is testing the limits of adolescents by
sexually experimenting with both Janeys sons Mike (Elijah Wood) and Sandy (Adam
Hann-Byrd).
Wendys older brother Paul (Toby Maguire) narrates the story, and at the same
time pursues his own sexual interests and desire to lose his virginity; chasing
a local girl with no idea how to achieve, well, what he is after.
When Ben and Elenas relationship begins to fall about, and they attend a
partner swapping party, many issues about a changing society are raised.
Sometimes the shepherd needs the comfort of the sheep, the town reverend
states to Janey. I'm going to try hard not to understand the implications of
that, she replies.
A chain of events occur to all the main characters where they desire something,
yet their selfish cravings hurt others around them and cause breakdowns in
people  and situations (and very occasionally, the film).  Whilst these
character relationships can be crowned as The Ice Storms greatest asset, many
would also argue them to be its most obvious weakness.  This is due to the
shallow and emotionless feelings that the characters portray - its almost as if
John Genry wants us not to care for them.  If only he had taken the risk of
veering the plot off the straight and narrow path that The Ice Storm
continuously follows - perhaps then we would truly have a classic to be
remembered.
With the exceptions of Ben Hoods only outburst of emotion and relationship
problems between the married couples, the films unique style is often to avoid
direct conflicts between characters yet at the same time make the scenes feel
tense and neurotic.
Please dont get me wrong - The Ice Storm is a rare experience and its
excellence will appeal to many audiences, but if you are not interested in what
youve heard from me so far there is little chance that the film will please
you.
As to the amount of fulfillment the icy cold characters can give is purely a
matter of opinion.  I would, however, go as far to say that they appear to be so
emotionless that when the film rears its frosty behind into tragic and climatic
situations, we are left staring blankly at the screen, hoping that its next move
would be a show of emotion that lasts more than 30 seconds.
Thankfully, The Ice Storm never makes the same fatal mistake featured in films
such as Her Majesty Mrs Brown, where the films main focus is an attempt at a
loving relationship that ends up looking detestable and off putting.  No  this
film is put together carefully and sharply, where the main message is definitely
something intended to make you think.
Although the film ends up splintering itself by the very foundations that makes
it unique, The Ice Storm is an intriguing story of change and transformation
inside a world of harsh realities and consequences.


Title
Review for Thousand Acres, A (1997)
I found it amazing - no, astonishing - that A Thousand Acres is amongst
fellow pulitzer-prize winning novels-turned-films as The Diary of Anne
Frank, Driving Miss Daisy, The Age of Innocence and To Kill a Mocking
Bird.  Somewhere along the line - and I suspect it's the conversion to
the big screen - Jane Smiley's tale of two sisters' traumatic family has
been drained of emotion, passion and heart.
Larry Cook (Jason Robards) owns 1,000 acres of fertile land in Iowa,
USA.  The farm, irrigated by his grandfather and father - and passed
down through the generations - has given him respect in the community
and a pessimistic attitude towards life and relationships.  Troubles
starts to brew when Larry, realizing that his days on Earth are
numbered, decides to divide his land between his three daughters - Ginny
(Jessica Lange), Rose (Michelle Pfeiffer) and Caroline (Jennifer Jason
Leigh).  Ginny and Rose are eager to inherit part of their family
heritage whilst Caroline remains uncertain as to the success of this
venture.
But when a closet of dark family secrets is opened, and memories of
tormented childhood's and chilling experiences are revealed, the three
daughters and their menacing father will take a turn for the worse.
For most of its hollow duration, A Thousand Acres ultimately angered me
for this simple reason: it is very easy for an average action flick to
be insulted for its obvious flaws, yet these sorts of family "tear
jerkers" often slip past criticism because they look so much classier
than they actually are.  Have a couple of high profile actors, a slimy
romantic plot/subplot and a tear shed here and there and what do you
have?  A potentially great film?  Perhaps.  A definite "good" film?  No
way.
There were many things that irritated me about A Thousand Acres.  To
start with, the relationship between Rose and Caroline - the films
central focus - never once convinced me.  As the unfortunate viewers, we
are expected to believe that these two women have a deep understanding
and love for each other - yet at one stage, one of them completely cuts
off all contact from the other - not speaking or writing for years.  But
of course, a couple of scenes later, they are together again with no
mention of what the hell happened to them previously.
A slab of utterly trashy scenes occur upon the introduction of "Jess
Clark (Colin Firth)", a character that this very 2D film attempts to
bring into another dimension of love, lust and greed.  Unfortunately,
any scenes that could have allowed us to have a greater understanding of
the characters needs have been completely avoided - it almost seems that
director Jocelyn Moorhouse has gone out of her way to create a set of
dull predicaments.  And it's those sorts of ludicrous thoughts which
plagued my mind from start to finish - making myself search for a reason
that would explain exactly how a pulitzer-prize winning novel could end
up so ordinary as a motion picture.
What saves A Thousand Acres from total failure is its adequate
performances from Pheipher and Lange (adequate, simply because the
dialogue would not allow an in depth understand of the characters) and a
music score that belongs on Easy Listening 3MP.
A thousand triumphs?  No - a thousand tears of boredom.


Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Cast: Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman, Leelee Sobieski, James Cromwell
It's not surprising that the 60's and 70's style disaster flicks are now
back in the Hollywood scene, with Deep Impact being the first
"collision-course-to-Earth" film to be released in 1998 (Bruce Willis'
Armageddon is coming out later on in the year).  What is surprising, is
what Mimi Lee (whose directorial credits include The Peacemaker)
includes in the package: a study of apocalyptic conditions, love amongst
chaos, the survival of hope, and some grueling space sequences.  Oh, and
there's also that Meteor hurtling towards Earth.
But the question is - as tyrannical as it may be - does Deep Impact
flourish in these ambitious, creating the supreme Sci Fi indulgence of
disaster and "real" drama?  The answer, sadly, is no.  But there are not
many science fiction films nowadays that can work on more than just
"science fiction" levels; last years Gattaca was one of them, Space
Odyssey another (yes, that is a gap of about 30 years). Deep Impact is
great as a Sci Fi, but terrible as a drama.
When reporter Jennie Lerner (Tea Leoni, of TV's The Naked Truth)
investigates what she believes to be a White House sex scandal, she
finds herself on hot pursuit of the greatest news scoop in history.
Trouble is, she doesn't know what she's chasing.  She does recognize
that it's big - really big - when she bumbles into an interrogation with
President of the USA Tom Beck (Morgan Freeman).  In 48 hours, he
addresses a dignified speech to the nation, announcing that a Meteor is
on a crash-collision course to Earth.  And that over the previous 2
years the world's biggest ever space shuttle, "The Messiah," had been
constructed by the USA and Russia to destroy the troublesome rock with
nuclear technology.
The world "hopes for the best and prepares for the worst," constructing
massive underground caves in the confidence that life will go on even
after collision.  As Deep Impact's promo posters read: "Oceans Rise,
Cities Fall, Hope Survives."
The primary problem with Deep Impact lies with its central character,
portrayed insipidly by Leoni - a hazy, almost petulant actor who really
does belong as a sitcom character only.  Her role as an arrogant and
presumptuous reporter has been done to death; picking journalist
characteristics ranging from Lois Lane to Harry Shearer in Godzilla -
and all the common cliches are unveiled.  James Cromwell delivers a
fitting line: "I know you're just a reporter, but you used to be a
person, right?"
As far as a capable cast is concerned, this is not a problem with Deep
Impact, having three Oscar winners and two Oscar nominated actors.  But
they all tend to look overrun and imbecilic - struggling to maintain
respect whilst muttering overly ambitious and unsatisfying dialogue.
Although Morgan Freeman is often buoyantly powerful as the aristocratic
Beck, when was the last time we saw him in his true, Oscar deserving
form?   Certainly not in his recent run of films - Hard Rain, Amistad,
Kiss the Girls and Chain Reaction.  In fact, it's been five years since
Freeman has selected a truly impressive character to play (in The
Shawshank Redemption); with the possible exception of the alluring
detective William Somerset in Seven (and his replica performance in Kiss
the Girls).
Robert Duvall, grasping "hero" status in the film, is the only other
actor worthy of a mention - giving an amicable presence as an astronaut
brought out of retirement to lead The Messiah.  One of his featured
scenes, a quest to destroy the Meteor using nuclear devices, brings back
memories of better times - of times of A Space Odyssey - and is a minor
triumph in itself.
But even with Deep Impact's moments of gripping cinema, forming superb
Science Fiction framework, it fluffs up too many times to make it a
credible experience.  The film comes nail bitingly close to being a
worthwhile epic to add to this years blockbuster tally, but Mimi Lee
seems never able to keep it in capable, focused control.
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback


Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
NOTTING HILL
Cast: Julia Roberts, Hugh Grant, Hugh Bonneville, Emma Chambers, James
Dreyfus, Rhys Ifans, Tim McInnerny, Gina McKee
Director: Roger Michell
Screenplay: Richard Curtis
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
Recently cinema looked at what happened when an ordinary man rose to
instant stardom in EdTV, and in Notting Hill the premise is almost
reversed: what happens when a man whose mother barely remembers his name
becomes romantically involved with the world's most famous actress?
Surprising, not much.  Richard Curtis, who has established himself as a
fine comedy writer after Four Weddings and a Funeral and his work in
Blackadder and Mr. Bean, penned this gentle romantic comedy that takes
few risks and lacks a steady pace.  The highlights (and there are many)
of the picture do not come from Roger Michell's glossy direction, but
rather Curtis' sense of what type of humor works and when.
Hugh Grant plays William Thacker, owner of a travel bookstore in Notting
Hill, described as a "small village in the middle of a city."  He lives
with the "roommate from hell," Spike (Rhys Ifans), a lovable but
repulsive man who'd just as soon eat mayonnaise as he would yogurt.
Thacker lives a quiet, reasonably lonely life until our woman in
question, Anna Scott (Julia Roberts), walks into his shop and buys a
book.  Through a lucky coincidence (actually, there's quite a few in
this film), the two bump into each other again (literally), and love is,
um, in the air.  Of course, Thacker experiences a few problems with
dating the world's hottest star, ranging from a Hollywood boyfriend to
the paparazzi.
Hugh Grant reprises the style of acting that made his rise to fame
formidable.  His gentleman-like manners coupled with humorous dialogue
is an agreeable combination, and Grant, whose reputation has suffered
somewhat over the last few years (remember that incident with a
prostitute, anyone?) would be well advised to choose more roles of this
nature.  Julia Roberts really plays Julia Roberts, and does so with such
a loud sense of fame that she becomes a little irritating.  A cleverer
move would have been to cast Roberts' character to a relative unknown.
This would enable Anna Scott's fame to feel more original and fresh,
rather than forced.   I'm convinced that Roger Michell took the easy way
out.
But there's still plenty of things to like in Notting Hill, none of
which are quite as refreshing as the film's supporting characters.
William Thacker's group of friends are a delightful bunch.  One of them
fails to recognize Scott and, upon hearing that she is an actor,
explains that it is a low-paying profession ("So how much did you make
from your last film?" "Fifteen million.").  There's even a scene near
the end that positions most of them in a car, racing against time, all
screaming and screeching.  The driver stops the car and exclaims, "James
Bond never had to put up with this shit!"  Once again, Richard Curtis'
comedic sense is right on.
Although Notting Hill boasts fun characters and funny jokes (nowadays
its quite rare to find a romantic comedy that's actually funny), at its
heart is a relationship that's almost passionless.  I suspect that this
is largely due to Michell's direction, which seems to imply the romance
rather than develop it.  I got the sense that perhaps the best romantic
parts of Notting Hill were left on the editing room floor, or perhaps
they just weren't there to begin with.  Either way, Grant's
performance - though very enjoyable to watch - doesn't help.  He must
have something against revealing any emotion in his dialogue.  But
besides this rather major fault, let me stress again that Notting Hill
is a pleasing and often involving film.  And, if you can, I suggest that
you duck out of the cinema five minutes early to avoid a dreadful final
reel.


Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
RONIN
Cast: Robert De Niro, Jean Reno, Natascha McElhone, Stellan Skarsgard,
Sean Bean, Skipp Sudduth, Jonathan Pryce, Michael Lonsdale, Katarina
Witt
Director: John Frankenheimer
Screenplay: J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
The plot of Ronin relies heavily on a valuable briefcase.  As in Pulp
Fiction, the contents of this briefcase are never revealed, for the
simple fact that what is inside of it is insignificant to the film's
overall meaning.   The briefcase is a tool - or, if you like, an
excuse - to give characters the chance to entertain us.  That theory
pretty much works with all that Ronin has to offer.  Director John
Frankenheimer (who has had more than forty years of experience in the
field) sacrifices a potentially powerful film for the sake of
individual, insignificant moments.  Ordinarily that might work in a
simplistic action flick, but in one that tries to tell as much as Ronin
does, success is somewhat limited.
On paper, Ronin certainly has all the assets of a great action film.
The past has proven that great action films often do not have great
action stars, but rather, solid dramatic actors having a little fun in
slightly easier roles.  The gripping crime saga Heat positioned Al
Pacino alongside Robert DeNiro, and equally peculiar combinations were
found in Face/Off (John Travolta and Nicholas Cage) and The Negotiator
(Samuel L. Jackson, Kevin Spacey).  I was pleased to see DeNiro and Jean
Reno (two actors who have proven that they can do more than just look
tough, which they do pretty well anyway) form a solid partnership,
although they end up twiddling their thumbs with too much screen time
and too little to do.
An international team of covert operatives are hired to retrieve a
mysterious briefcase.  The smart and smug Sam (Robert DeNiro) becomes
the obvious leader of the group.  When asked if he had ever killed
anybody, Sam answers "once I hurt somebody's feelings."  The other
operatives are French coordinator Vincent (Jean Reano), driver Larry
(Skipp Sudduth), weapons specialist Spence (Sean Bean, best known for
his role as 006 in Goldeneye) and hi-tech gadgets specialist Gregor
(Stellan Skarsgard).  Holding the team together is employer Deirdre
(Natasha McElhone), who is equally as cold as the people working for
her.
Ignore the stylish backdrops and sophisticated European settings - Ronin
makes little sense.  Its screenplay by J.D. Zeik and Richard Weisz
sprouts various developments, ranging from betrayal to even a hint of
romance.  There's a surprise bad guy, another surprise bad guy, a good
guy, another good guy, a coward, and so forth.  Before Ronin develops
its primary characters, more characters are introduced.  Before Ronin
allows us to absorb the seriousness of its scenarios, another one is on
the way.  This makes for tense and often gripping moments, but I feel
that the film would have benefited from a little more breathing space.
Enemy of the State staged a similar intensity, but this was done
intentionally and intelligently, whereas Ronin seems to try too hard to
keep viewers on the edge of their seats.
Frankenheimer deliberately refrains from developing his central
characters.  You will walk away from Ronin not knowing much about who
they are or what motivates them, with the exception of some minor
details (Sam is there purely for the money, that's for sure).  For the
most part, the coldness and bitterness of the film's relationships work
on exactly the right levels.  Even when Sam and Vincent develop a loyal
friendship, you get the feeling that something is holding them back.
Their professionalism is unshakable; if one saves the life of the other,
their initial reaction is not to show their appreciation, but to return
the favor.  DeNiro and Reno give convincing performances in the most
likeable parts, and the bittersweet supporting cast get their moments to
shine.
In a silly little voice over at the film's completion, Frankenheimer
almost seems to be asking us not to condemn his film for its lack of
emotion.  Whilst I appreciated the way Ronin captures the spirit of the
killer for hire industry, Frankenheimer spells it out to us in big
bright letters, rather than allowing viewers to walk away with a
personal interpretation as to how it works.  The industry is cold.  C -
O - L - D.
"A thinking man's action pic" is the general description that many have
given this film. My two cents says that its creators certainly did think
about what they were doing, but tried to make too much out of too
little.  Ronin certainly has many rewarding moments (including a couple
of eye popping chase scenes), and a handful of performances of an
unusually high standard.  But Frankenheimer never lets his settings or
characters come alive in the way they should have.  Not only does he
sacrifice a potentially powerful film for the sake of some exciting
moments, but also a wide range of intriguing characters for a wide range
of inaccessible ones.


Title
Review for Go (1999)
GO
Cast: Sarah Polley, Desmond Askew, Jay Mohr, Scott Wolf ,Taye Diggs,
William Fichtner, J.E. Freeman, Katie Holmes, Timothy Olyphant
Director: Doug Liman
Screenplay: John August
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
5 stars
Ronna: I need a favor.
Todd: Wow, I didn't know we'd become such good friends, because if we
had, you'd know that I give head before I give favors, and I don't even
give my best friends head so your chances of getting a favor are pretty
slim.
Out of nowhere comes filmmaker Doug Liman's 'Go', a movie that contains
almost everything that Generation X moviegoers tend to fetish over: zany
characters, hilarious conversations, unpredictable scenarios and a
blazingly fast pace.  Liman worked with a script from debut screenwriter
John August, and it's a screenplay that is tight, well rounded and
beautifully integrated.  It's also masterfully manipulated by Liman, who
makes a film that is terrifically entertaining and immediately
intriguing.  In other words, 'Go' is one hellava time at the movies.
Why do critics and viewers persist in comparing films like 'Go' to 'Pulp
Fiction', even though it was made over four years ago?  It seems that
nowadays these kinds of films will inevitably be contrasted to
Tarantino's work whenever their characters delve into meaningless
conversations about such things as foot massages or cheeseburgers, or
when the use of guns become outrageous pieces of black comedy, or even
when a film's narrative doesn't follow a chronological flow.  'Go'
implements all these things, this time delivered by a young cast, who
give a fresh, youthful feel to the genre.
Todd: You come to me out of the blue asking to buy twenty hits of
ecstasy, twenty being the magic number at which intent to sell becomes
trafficking?
Ronna: Todd I would never fuck you like that.
Todd: How would you fuck me?
The story is separated into three distinct sections, each based around a
character's perception of the events that take place.  The first - and
probably the best - revolves around Ronna (Sarah Polley), who works as a
supermarket checkout and is under threat of being evicted from her home
unless she produces some serious dough fast.  So, she plans to sell
twenty hits of ecstasy to Adam (Scott Wolf) and Marcus (Taye Diggs), who
are friends of Simon (Desmond Askew), one of Ronna's fellow supermarket
employees.  The deal goes awry and Ronna is forced to make money by
ripping off people at a rave, with surprising results.  The second part
of the story centers around Simon and his friends as they create havoc
in Las Vegas, Simon especially having the time of his life before
landing himself into danger.
Simon's friend: Just so we're clear, you stole a car, shot a bouncer,
and had sex with two women?
The third section, more relaxed in pace and tone than the others,
regards Adam and Marcus, and a rather peculiar Christmas dinner in which
they dine with a strange policeman and his wife, whose absurd motives
for having them over gradually become evident.  Katie Holmes, of
'Dawson's Creek' fame, also has a part as Ronna's best friend Claire.
All cast members contribute energetic and thoroughly entertaining
performances, especially the gorgeous Sarah Polley, who stunned
audiences in Atom Egoyan's 'The Sweet Hereafter.'  Each actor gets at
least one hilarious and memorable moment.
'Go' is equipped with electric editing, paced to the rhythmic beat of a
rave.  It's the closest thing to a cinematic equivalence of Ecstasy that
I've ever seen - Go is vigorous, upbeat and bordering on the edge  of
brilliance; it's a Rockefeller Shank of a movie, powered by a script
that unfolds like clockwork and direction that's virtually seamless.
Intricately plotted and visually breathtaking, 'Go' is a great way to
spend a couple of hours at the movies, with a breadth of quirky
characters who always make you feel like you're in good company.  My
favorite movie so far in 1999 boasts a pulsating effectiveness in all
production aspects, and achieves a feat that some of the early efforts
of Tarantino also accomplished - it's an instant classic of the genre.
Todd: Ronna, I just gave you a favor.
Ronna: Here and I just thought you gave me head.


Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and a half stars
Over the last decade films have stumbled over themselves in their
attempts to be "politically incorrect," and many have lost sight of the
reality that they intended to display.  Happiness, by independent
filmmaker Todd Solondz, never falls into that trap.  The film grounds
itself in the bleak and unforgiving modern world of its dozen or so
principal characters, and Solondz never relents from making his cold
surroundings feel that much colder.
Yes, the title is intentionally ironic, and yes, the film is very sad.
One scene, in which a character bitterly masturbates whilst ringing
random numbers in a phone book, speaks volumes about the isolation of
society as it approaches the new millenium.  Controversial, off-putting
and uncomfortable are three words that can describe Happiness, but
there's much more to it than that.  I propose that Happiness is not just
a brilliantly constructed social commentary piece, but one of the most
sarcastic, unapologetic and indirectly insightful black comedies ever
made.
The film regularly cuts to each of its characters lives, all of them
with distinguishable and quite unlikable personalities.  Perhaps most
tragic is that of Bill Maplewood (Dylan Baker), a married man who is
also a pedophile, and is attracted to his eleven-year-old son Billy's
(Rufus Read) friends.  Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), Bill's wife, is a
sister of Joy (Jane Adams), an aspiring songwriter who struggles to
maintain a happy spirit through emotional tribulations.  Successful
author Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), also a sister of Trish and Joy,
receives obsessive phone conversations from neighbor Allen (Philip
Seymour Hoffman), who longs for her whilst being oblivious to similar
feelings towards him from Kristina (Cynthia Stevenson) a few doors down.
That's without mentioning Joy's boyfriend (Jon Lovitz), who doesn't
react well after being dumped, and the sisters' father (Ben Gazzara),
who abandons his wife in search for contentment in life.  Each of them
pursue their desire to be happy, in expense of everybody else, but delve
deeper into a world of uncertainty and despair.
Make no mistake about it; this is a painfully sad story.  Interestingly
enough, the film's dramatic side arrives second place in terms of focus
and ingenuity to its incredible sarcasm and wit.  The result is a
dialogue driven film that is both unnerving and at times very funny, in
a sadistic, glass-is-half-empty kind of way.  It's a neat trick that
Solondz uses to great effect, leaving viewers simultaneously shocked and
amused, scathed and entertained.
Exceptional performances are contributed from all cast members, who
dissect their characters with appropriately somber mannerisms,
displaying the sadness of a world corrupted by greed and populated by
people whose foremost desires are to pursue happiness.  During all of
Solondz's ranting and raving - his biting views on relationships, his
misanthropic philosophies on the togetherness of society, and even his
graphic shots of seamen - the film remains coherently structured, and
maintains audience interest for all of its running time.  Don't
underestimate the importance of Happiness.  See it, if not just to say
that you've witnessed the bleakest film this side of a Shakespearean
tragedy, and laughed guiltily whilst the actors in front of you sobbed
miserably.


Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
PUSHING TIN
Cast: John Cusack, Billy Bob Thornton, Cate Blanchett, Angelina Jolie,
Jake Weber, Kurt Fuller, Vicki Lewis, Matt Ross
Director: Mike Newell
Screenplay: Glen Charles & Les Charles
Australian theatrical release: July 22, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
1 and a half stars
"Pushing tin" is a term that refers to the ability to move planes
quickly, but don't be deceived by the film's trailers - it's not so much
about controlling air traffic, but rather the controllers themselves.
Writers Glen and Les Charles have an obvious interest in the
high-pressure job of their central characters, but ultimately this is a
very simple story about human relations and traits; jealousy, I suppose,
the key one on show.  The really bad news is that the vast majority of
this humdrum drama - advertised as if it were the year's most exciting
film - is awkwardly paced and far, far too conventional.  Consequently,
it's boring.  Booorrrriinnng.  Pushing Tin begins promisingly, but it's
a down hill ride.  The film systematically topples over itself again and
again, destroying the already crippled plot elements it depended on.
I mentioned the word "conventional" in a disapproving context, which is
rightfully so because I want to make it clear that Pushing Tin does not
lack in the flow its narrative due to the prevalent style its
screenplay - marriage dilemmas are perhaps too common in film nowadays -
but rather the continually obvious and quite uninteresting plot elements
at work.  The Charles' have developed a screenplay that takes familiar
formulas from different genres and sticks them together.  As a whole,
the film is not entirely predictable, but contains many scenes that are
laced with cliches; the kind of cliches that were bad even when they
first appeared oh so many years ago. I found myself constantly wanting
to be involved and entertained by the picture, but my frustration
dominated as the story generally worsened.
Nick Falzone (John Cusak) is an ace air traffic controller - a real
hot-shot in the industry - who is challenged to give up his legendary
status at work upon the arrival of Russel Bell (Billy Bob Thornton).
Russel is even greater a hot shot - he "pushes tin" - thus Nick gets a
severe case of green-eyed jealousy.  So much so, that both parties
suffer marital problems with their wives (Cate Blancett and Angelina
Jolie) that result in some bitter confrontations, and (yawn), some life
lessons.
"This is pretty boring," the person sitting next to me said, and I think
we both had that reaction when the formalities of the story became
tedious.  If Hollywood will insist on reissuing cliches again and again,
surely they can stage them in the right context.  The moral of the
story - scenes and dialogue in a screenplay should not be there simply
for the narrative to keep jumping as the plot proceeds.  Don't write
dialogue for the sake of it being heard, write it for enjoyment and to
sustain interest in the story.  The dialogue in Pushing Tin is very
average, and the film's pacing is very awkward - it seems to be
constantly trying to build up momentum, only to slow everything down
again.
The cast list of Pushing Tin is certainly an impressive one.  I believe
John Cusak and Billy Bob Thornton are two of better, if not best, actors
working today.  Cusak is a rare find, an actor who effortlessly conveys
subtle absurdity in many of his roles, and somehow manages never to look
bad in the process.  I could almost say the same thing about Thornton,
although he usually looks for something a little more deep.  His
incredible debut in Sling Blade, his jokingly serious part in Armageddon
and his riveting performance in A Simple Plan made him a reliable choice
for a difficult dramatic role.  The strange thing is, these two actors
bored me in Pushing Tin, due to a lack of chemistry between the male
leads.  Cusask's very intentionally charismatic acting becomes
irritating, and Thornton is supposedly portraying a wise, mysterious
character, but he appears like one of those annoying people whose every
spoken word is an attempt to prove their supposed intelligence.
Veteran director Mike Newell, whose credits include the messy but very
enjoyable Four Weddings and a Funeral and Donnie Brasco, doesn't find a
good rhythm in Pushing Tin, and doesn't drive his narrative into enough
intriguing scenarios.   There are some worthwhile parts in the film,
most of which occur inside the air traffic control headquarters.  But
that's nowhere near enough.  Call me fussy, call me pretentious; but if
one more person makes an artsy-fartsy joke at my expense, I'll be forced
to hibernate through the winter and re-emerge when next year's Oscar
contenders arrive at Christmas.  So please refrain from giving me crap.
There's plenty of that at the cinema.


Title
Review for Spawn (1997)
Comic books are often the origins to some very entertaining films.  Which, when 
you think about it, makes a lot of sense.  After all, who wouldn't appreciate 
seeing Batman battle some bad dudes or an agency of Men in Black protecting the 
Earth from intergalactic warfare?  For me, comics are a source of entertainment 
and fun.  But the creation of a film based on Todd McFarlane's popular hero 
"Spawn" is unfortunately never much fun at all.
Bearing a definite resemblance to the sets from the Batman series; the dark and 
gothic surroundings of Spawn help prepare us for the depressing time that lies 
ahead, where the question "Why did I come and see this again?" will be asked 
one too many times.  
The film (and the comic series) is based around the peculiar experiences of Al 
Simmons (Michael Jai White).  Being one of the finest professional assassins in 
the world, Simmons is more than aware of his talents yet underestimates those 
of the people around him.  So after a stylish assassination at the beginning of 
the film (which incidentally was one of my favorite parts), he makes it 
perfectly clear that he "cares" about innocent people losing their lives.  This 
alone is an unforgivable mistake.  Michael Jai White wants us to believe that 
this soon-to-be hero can be as emotional and sensitive as anybody else.  He has 
no problem in firing missiles or using impressive artillery, but later on 
complains that people's lives were in danger.  Even if we push aside the fact 
that no one really wants to see an 
emotional-at-times-and-ruthless-at-other-times hero, White gives Spawn about as 
much emotion as a prison meatloaf - which you could imagine is not terribly 
impressive.
Anyway, after a sudden outburst of emotion and ethics, Simmons soon finds 
himself burned to death with a face that looks like a toasted Pop Tart.  He 
then goes on his merry old way to the fiery realms of hell (which, by the way, 
is fabulously animated) and makes a pact with the devil: he is able to return 
to Earth to see his beloved wife Wanda (Theresa Randle) if he agrees to lead 
Hell's Army in a battle to destroy mankind.  As you may have guessed, Simmons 
heartily agrees and finds himself back on Earth - 5 years after his apparent 
death.
However a few things have changed.  Wanda is now married to Simmons' former 
colleague Jason Wynn (Martin Sheen) and are producing sons and daughters whilst 
living a happy family life.  And if this wasn't enough to get used to, he is 
rapidly introduced to the devil's number one assistant Clown (John Leguizamo) 
and Cogliostro (Nicol Williamson), who helps Simmons harness some new fighting 
abilities and works along side him in many fiendish battles.  So as Simmons 
discovers that he is no longer human and always dressed in a mysterious black 
suit and red cape, he struggles to decide whether he should let the forces of 
evil prevail or to defend the Earth at any cost.  Born into darkness and sworn 
to justice, Spawn is a hero to be reckoned with.
It doesn't take many brains to guess that Spawn is not going to get much more 
complicated than the old good versus evil skit; and although it wants us to 
feel for the character of Al Simmons, most audiences will be looking forward to 
the fighting scenes but not much else.  To save the film from total failure, 
Spawn's dazzling eye candy is state of the art computer generated effects. The 
team from Industrial Light and Magic has once again distracted us from a fairly 
weak film by placing us in the middle of a special effects bonanza of the 
highest degree.
Fans of the comic books will get a thrill to find their hero right in front of 
their eyes, and the impressive sets of Spawn give a perfect conversion from the 
dark, gloomy comic artwork.  But director Mark Dippe went no further than this, 
and Spawn fails to achieve many interesting aspects that would create fans 
rather than reward them.  
It's interesting to note that the film spends all of its time explaining how 
the hero emerged, so in the grand scheme of things the end of the film is 
really right at the start of the comic series.  Which is actually something 
pleasing considering that Spawn is a fairly modern character and unknown to 
many - so the possibility of a sequel or a series of films is not unlikely.
Spawn seems to me to be a movie you can like a lot better when you look back on 
it, where you remember how good the special effects were but not really care 
when you're watching them.  The film is solid and consistent with average 
action, a below average plot, dismal acting and great special effects.  Is it 
worth seeing?  Well the cinema, when I got out of my chair and began to walk 
out, I asked myself "What kind of people would really love that film?"  Of 
course, the answer hit me almost suddenly when one of my friends blurted out 
"Wasn't that awesome!"  You got it - teenagers.
2 out of 5 stars
Spawn's dazzling screen mayhem will appeal to some teens, but most people 
should wait for this one to hit the video shelves so they can fast forward to 
the semi entertaining battle scenes and a creative depiction of the undead.


Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
REVIEW: Saving Private Ryan
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Matt Damon, Edward Burns, Jeremy Davies,
Vin Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi
Director: Steven Spielberg
Screenplay: Robert Rodat
Australian theatrical release date: November 19, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 5
stars
Only hours after viewing this film, horrifying images of war and
sacrifice haunt my mind.  I know these will last for days, maybe weeks.
Steven Spielberg's Saving Private Ryan is as much about the devastation
of war as it is the nature of human sanity.  This off and on director
challenges the influence and power of contemporary cinema, pushing the
boundaries of his medium as far as he can go and stops just before
bursting into horror and trepidation.  Spielberg pulls all the right
cinematic strings, but ultimately Saving Private Ryan is more of an
experience than it is a movie.
The first half-hour or so is undoubtedly one of the finest pieces in
film history.  It is an excruciating scene set in Ohama Beach, Normandy,
at the time of the D-Day massacre. Cameras pans across the shoreline and
land, capturing American soldiers fighting as they try to reach the
offending troops, many gunned down from higher ground.  The tension is
almost unbearable.
Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) is the commanding officer of a team
consisting of eight men.  They are assigned to an unusual mission: to
find and retrieve Private James Ryan (Matt Damon), whose mother has
received telegrams and a visit from the priest after her other three
sons were killed in action.  General George Marshall decides that Ryan
will make it home, so Miller and his crew contemplate risking their
eight lives to save one.  Rationalizing between the mission and the men
is never an easy thing for Miller to do; but this time, the mission is a
man.
The sheer visceral force of Saving Private Ryan is enough to evoke all
sorts of reactions, but Spielberg's intentions are more than just to
shock his audience.  With the aid of writer Robert Rodat's (Fly Away
Home) potent screenplay, he examines all aspects of war, whilst never
losing sight of developing character and setting.  This makes the battle
of governments and tactics appear as something much more individual, as
each of the eight men convey their unique demeanors and try to make
sense of a ludicrous war.
Even after his expert performances in Philadelphia, Forrest Gump and
Apollo 13, Tom Hanks has managed to step up a few notches.  Hanks plays
Miller deliberately restrained; he doesn't look like a glorified hero,
he looks like an ordinary man outside of his comfortable environs. Rodat
has crafted Miller as a mysterious leader who is bound by personal
motives to earn his way back to his wife, back to civilization.  "Each
person I kill makes me feel further away from home," Miller explains, as
his feelings begin to unravel.
Jeremy Davies is painfully realistic as Cpl. Upham, a translator who has
never been in combat before.  His harrowing portrayal of a weak willed
man is amongst the film's finest.  Tom Sizemore gives a strong
performance, as does Matt Damon, as does Edward Burns, as does Barry
Pepper.  The entire cast is electric.
Even more impressive than the performances is the stark cinematography
by Janusz Kaminski (Schindler's List, The Lost World) and the tight
direction from Spielberg.  In many scenes hand held cameras were used to
great effect, and they stylize the film with a mixture of clarity and
radiate an overall look of uniqueness.  Saving Private Ryan's visual
overture is fast paced and convincing, as if the events on screen were
as realistic as the war itself.
Deliberately more sentimental that Spielberg's other World War II
masterpiece Schindler's List, Saving Private Ryan is actually an epic
movie, packaged as very much an American flick by the identical opening
and closing images - an US flag waving in the wind.  As one of the great
directors of our time, Steven Spielberg has re-assured us that a picture
can tell a thousand words, and it is those pictures of war and sacrifice
that will continue to lurk in my mind.  Saving Private Ryan almost
beckons us not to label it as a film.  It's an experience.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Real Macaw, The (1998)
Cast: Jamie Croft, Jason Robards, Deborra-Lee Furness, Joe Petruzzi,
John Waters
Director: Mario Andreacchio
Screenplay: Bruce Hancock and Matthew Perry
Cinematography: David Foreman
Australian theatrical release date: 17 September (Victoria and
Queensland), 24 September (other states and territories)
Even after the high expectations generated from Babe and Napoleon - two
friendly Australian pet comedies - the production team of The Real Macaw
have a good reason to be congratulated.  The screenplay by Bruce Hancock
and Matthew Perry is intelligently written so that it's accessible to
all ages, Mario Andreacchio's direction is firm but fun, the editing by
Edward McQueen-Mason leaves no room for boredom and David Foreman's
cinematography shows beautiful shots of exotic locations and urban
Australia.  And that's without mentioning the exquisite music
composition and a bunch of finely tuned performances. Indeed, The Real
Macaw is a cinematic eye opener, with enough talent attached to it to
sink the Titanic.
Mac (voice of Daniel Murphy) is a squawking talking smart alec parrot.
A 149 year old one, in fact, who lives with Benjamin Girdis (Jason
Robards), a grandpa who is fascinated by the wonders of life.  When
gramps finds himself in serious debt, his grandson Sam (Jamie Croft) and
Mac come to the rescue, in search of buried treasure in the Coral
Islands.  They are tailed every inch of the way by Dr Lance Hagan (John
Waters), a ruthless academic who will do anything to get his greasy muts
on the loot.
It doesn't take a Will Hunting to figure out where the plot ends up, as
there is only really one way it can give a rewarding pay off.  We know
that the bad guy will eventually be caught out, the parrot
(sorry...macaw) will keep on squawking and the treasure will be found.
What we don't expect is the level of maturity that Andreacchio gives to
his material; and as a consequence, the many family movie cliches are
handled not so much as formalities but simply things that happen along
the way.  This gives a loose and energetic feel to the film as it moves
swiftly, freely and amusingly along its parrot perch of finely tuned
comic capers.
Jason Robards is charming to watch, and he fulfils the requirements of
his role with a wonderful amount of vibrant talent that so obviously
comes from many years' experience.  Jamie Croft also does a good job in
his very demanding role, reacting to his winged buddy's actions with
appropriate comedy mannerisms.  Mac was played by Tango the parrot with
three stunt doubles - Tango, Harpo, Groucho and Chico.  Together, Mac
looks beautiful as a blue and gold macaw parrot, and often kept me
staring at him when I should have been taking more notice of the human
characters.  But compared to Mac, they're a pretty lifeless bunch.
Whilst it is refreshing to see an original and very worthwhile buddy
adventure, it's also refreshing to see a real family flick.  The Real
Macaw shows kids strong family values, but thankfully avoids preaching
about them.  It's a real charmer of a film, a surprising bundle of rich,
lavish cinemaand a whole lot of fun.  Here's to the production team who
gave us it all.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
Cast: Michael Madsen, Natasha Henstridge, Marg Helgenberger, Justin
Lazard, Mykelti Williamson, George Dzundza, James Cromwell
Director: Peter Medak
Screenplay: Chris Brancato
Australian theatrical release date: July 9
The premise of Species 2 is not much different from the first: a hybrid
alien/human is on the rampage in the US, screwing any and everyone it
encounters in order to reproduce.  Wisely put by Michael Madsen, "It
could fuck the human race out of existence."  And if this isn't an
example of cinematic dopiness in its prime, I don't know what is.
Returning from Species is Natasha Henstridge, playing a half-human,
half-alien government creation named Eve.  Also returning is Dr. Laura
Baker (Marg Helgenberger), who conducts cruel experiments on Eve, and
Press Lennox (Madsen), an ex-military assassin.  Lennox joins with
astronaut Dennis Gamble (Mykelti Williamson), and chases another
astronaut, Patrick Ross (Justin Lazard), who has been infected with
alien DNA on a recent trip to Mars. Patrick has cross-country sex,
impregnating hookers and, for that matter, almost anyone he encounters.
Thus aliens burst out of the women's stomachs, and in no time Patrick's
hideaway is chock a block with cocoons, ready to spit out fully grown,
deadly reproductive killers.
Generally speaking, Species was a largely entertaining piece.
Henstridge's seductive alien character Sil was tantalizing to watch; she
was dazzling when she took her shirt off, and spine chilling at the same
time.  Though it sometimes pushed itself to the edge of acceptance, most
of Species was guiltily enjoyable as a popcorn flick.  Dopey, yes.  But
obliging and exciting - and that's what really mattered.
Species 2 quickly finds itself full of the cliches and witless formulas
that its predecessor only narrowly avoided.  The characters appear as
lifeless textbook creations, the action scenes look amateur and the
special effects are dull and somber.  It's a pity that the screenplay by
Chris Brancato (Hoodlum) has not been able to defy all odds, and make a
film with a silly initial idea become a film with a worthwhile Sci Fi
flavour, letting us suspend disbelief for the parts that don't make much
sense.  But Brancato's writing is so consistently sluggish, so
consistently stale that it ends up not only being a terrible Sci Fi, but
also a terrible drama and a terrible action adventure.
But whatever it is, Species 2 is definitely not a terrible comedy.  It's
just a shame that the most funny parts - and boy, there are quite a few
of them - are it's most important, "serious" parts.  At the media
screening, howls of laughter flew over the audience; with seemingly
everyone eager to mock the film's pitiful dialogue.  It may not have
been widely enjoyed, but people sure did enjoy not enjoying it.  Simply,
because it is that bad.
I cannot understand why James Crowell decided to play the degrading part
of Patrick's father, Senator Ross.  It's hard to believe that this is
the same man who was Oscar nominated for his memorable performance in
Babe, and who delivered a dynamic role in L.A. Confidential.  And for
that matter, why Ben Kingsley played one of the main parts in Species.
As for the other cast members, Michael Madsen looks good on the screen
in his relaxed role, but there's not much else he can do with a script
as bogged down as this.  Justin Lazard is as stiff as a board and twice
as boring, whilst Natasha Henstridge performs adequately but ultimately
serves simply as something nice to look at.
I can't say that I couldn't have seen this coming.  When I informed my
local video clerk that the film was a disaster, he replied "You mean you
needed to see it to know that?"  But even if, like me, you did enjoy
Species, some valuable advice would be to stay far away from its sequel.
Species 2 is without a doubt the worst written, and most horrifically
sluggish film so far this year.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
THE MUMMY
Cast: Brendan Fraser, John Hannah, Rachel Weisz, Arnold Vosloo, Stephen
Dunham, Jonathan Hyde, Corey Johnson, Kevin J. O'Connor, Tuc Watkins
Director: Stephen Sommers
Screenplay: Stephen Sommers
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
Sure, there's plenty of action, a lot of cool special effects and some
good looking leads, but somewhere along the line The Mummy lost my
winning vote. Perhaps it was the film's absence of a good villain and a
thrilling climax, or maybe it was because the whole darn thing was just
too exhausting.  During the first hour or so of the film, I was
convinced that it embodied few elements of standard Hollywood big-budget
movies.  But sure enough, The Mummy does eventually succumb to formulaic
filmmaking and, to make matters worse, draws its climax out so long that
you begin to forget what the hell the heroes were fighting for.  There
are plenty of scenes of pure carnage - all of which are staged quite
nicely - that brought back faint recollections of a far superior film,
>From Dusk Till Dawn, which succeeded in almost revolutionizing the
horror genre due to its total disregard for conventional filmmaking.
Well, The Mummy hasn't exactly done that, but it didn't need to.  It's
one of those films that are so obviously written to be commercially
successful - often at the expense of any artistic merit - and usually
leave most audiences content after viewing the plot elements that they
have come to expect and appreciate.  But The Mummy did not always
entertain me, and only occasionally intrigued me.  A couple of good
reasons to see the film are its special effects, which bring atmosphere
into the picture, and Brendan Fraser's comically heroic performance
which indeed reminds us that we will be seeing a lot more of him in the
future.  You might enjoy seeing The Mummy just for its special effects,
but on these merits, The Phantom Menace is a masterpiece.


Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
Cast: Gwyneth Paltrow, John Lynch, John Hannah, Jeanne Tripplehorn,
Douglas McFerran, Zara Turner
Director: Peter Howitt
Screenplay: Peter Howitt
Australian theatrical release date: July 30 1998
The gimmicky setup of Sliding Doors is exactly that - a gimmick.  The
film followers two different stories, whilst still containing the same
actors, characters and settings (and often, only slightly different
situations).  It stars Gwyneth Paltrow and Gwyneth Paltrow, John Hannah
and John Hannah, John Lynch and John Lynch, and, well, you get the
message.
The film plays on the idea that one split second could change an entire
life. Sure enough, when Helen (Paltrow) just manages to catch a train as
it leaves the station, she returns home to find her boy friend, Gerry
(John Lynch) in bed with another woman.  But of course she also misses
the train, returns home, and is unsuspecting.  Whilst on the train she
meets a charismatic man, James (John Hannah), who always seems to blurt
out the perfect observation whenever given the chance.  When she doesn't
catch the train, she begins to experience relationship problems with
Gerry, who is feeling guilty about cheating on her but continues to do
it anyway.
The cleverest thing about Sliding Doors is that it manages to trick the
viewer into believing that they are watching something better than they
actually are.  One can't help but be intrigued when the film first
splits into two parts, as it rewinds itself for a brief moment, then
changes a small detail to illustrate the seemingly insignificant
separate of plots.  But this intrigue is lost as the two stories
develop, and in no time we not only have one fairly ordinary romance
film, but two.
I'm starting to really enjoy watching Paltrow on the screen, and if it
were not for her elegant, graceful yet sophisticated workin-class-woman
performance, Sliding Doors probably wouldn't have had enough appeal to
last its duration.  She carries the load of the film on her shoulders -
creating a much more demanding role than what we've seen in some of her
other performances.  She showed great skill in Great Expectations and
Se7en, but both probably would have still succeeded without her.  She
gives a remarkable effort in Sliding Doors, but the screenplay limits
her acting stamina, as her character is often reduced to pulp at the
most crucial of all times.
Still, this is ultimately a pleasing flick, which will probably attract
most of its viewers due to its unique method of conveying character and
story.  Sadly, the different scenarios fail to give new dimensions to
the characters, as they appear to have almost identical personalities
even after experiencing "life changing" events.  Many believe that hard
times build character in a person, but the only characters that are ever
built remain the same from start to finish.
As the film draws to a close, it first appears like a dramatic change in
pace has occurred.  Yet a messy and faintly realistic scenario is
avoided, and not surprisingly, it ends up winking at the notion of
destiny rather than fate.
Not a very satisfying piece, but more often than not Sliding Doors is
enjoyable as a romantic comedy with a twist. Would my life have been
drastically changed had I not chosen to see the film?  Probably not, but
I'm still glad I saw it - and for what its worth, the gimmick worked
well enough for me to stop and consider the consequences before I board
the next train.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
AMERICAN HISTORY X
Cast: Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Beverly D'Angelo, Avery Brooks,
Stacy Keach, Fairuza Balk, Jennifer Lien, Elliot Gould, Guy Torry, Ethan
Suplee, William Russ
Director: Tony Kaye
Australian theatrical release: May 6, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 stars
American History X is the story of one man's redemption in a world where
you can't dance with the devil and be left unscathed.   The film boasts
many meaningful - if not fascinating - social-political insights, but
one scene puts everything into perspective.  You'll know it if you see
it; it's a moment that is as moving and disturbing as Spike Lee at his
best.  Debut director Tony Kaye looks at a profound evil, making it
accessible through characters with radical but understandable views.
Labeling these characters as simply "Neo-Nazis" or "racists" doesn't
give them the depth they require.  In the case of American History X,
the two protagonists are people who have been dealt a rough hand in
life.  In no way does this excuse the sins of the past, but Kaye knows
that - and this unforgiving but sympathetic view on American society is
why American History X succeeds in packing a powerful emotional punch
when it goes in for the kill.
Derek Vineyard (Edward Norton) has just been released from prison after
serving a three-year sentence for killing two black men during an
attempted car theft. On the day of Derek's return, his younger brother
Danny (Edward Furlong) is assigned by his school principal (Avery
Brooks) to write a special essay on the events that led to his
incarceration.  Before his jail sentence, Derek was an eccentric
Neo-Nazi leader whose racist views were spawned after his father was
killed by a black man. Whilst serving time Derek became friends with a
black man, and slowly realized the error of his ways.  When he is back
on the streets his primary concern is to save Danny from following the
same ill-fated path as he.  But after taking a strong moral stance,
Derek's life is in jeopardy by vengeful African Americans and the group
of which he was once a leader.
Derek's drastic change in personality is surprisingly very believable,
thanks largely to Edward Norton's Academy Award nominated performance.
In 1996's Primal Fear, Norton brandished his character with an evil but
simultaneously sympathetic edge, and here he does a similar trick but on
a different level.  Norton projects a performance that is frightfully
realistic - unflinching and unrelenting, he's an actor that will have
you shifting in your seat.  Derek, as a character, is also frightfully
real.  The scariest thing about him is not the Neo-Nazism symbol
tattooed on his chest, nor his menacing shaved head appearance.  It is
that his racist views begin to make sense.  A passionate believer in
white supremacy, Derek is no Pauline Hanson - for every bit of fear he
generates through his appearance, an equal amount is matched through
what he says and how he says it.  At a time of emotional struggle, Derek
is asked a painful question: "has anything you've done made your life
better?"  He shakes his head whilst refraining from crying, knowing that
the path to redemption is much more difficult to walk down than the path
to evil.
Like the surprise hit Pleasantville, American History X slightly
sensationalizes and simplifies its themes so that all audiences can
respond to them.  For the most part it works well, but the film does
become sentimental in its final moments, and that's a notable mistake.
In a film about a cold and unforgiving world, why have a warm ending?
Perhaps this is what led Tony Kaye to publicly denounce the film,
stating that the final product did not reflect his original version.
Whilst one can only wonder what changes Kaye was upset about, American
History X is one of the finest American offerings so far this year.
Rather than opting for singular disturbing scenes or characters, the
film crafts a powerful and disquieting view on society in general.
Don't be put off by the title - American History X has universal
meaning.  It's a film that will linger in your mind and force you to
reevaluate the term "racism."


Title
Review for Grease (1978)
Cast: John Travolta, Olivia Newton-John, Stockard Channing, Jeff
Conaway, Barry Pearl, Michael Tucci, Kelly Ward, Didi Conn, Jamie
Donnelly, Dinah Manoff, Eve Arden, Frankie Avalon, Joan Blondell, Edd
Byrnes, Sid Caesar, Alice Ghostley
Australian re-release date: July 2nd
This review is also available with pictures from the film and extra
production information at the following address:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au/Reviews/Grease
A daring thought, if I may: Grease in the 70's is no where near as
impressive as Grease in the 90's.  Whilst the film; first released in
the beginning-of-the-end of "the psychedelic era", may have been a
spectacular, vivid musical celebration back then, I sense that it means
so much more now.  Not only is it a celebration, but it's a
retrospective celebration.  It's a journey back in time to when leather
jackets clearly defined the cool from the nerdy, when Jimi Hendrix
rocked on and when sex was safe.  It looks genuine, because it is.
Through the span of twenty years, Grease has lost none of its charm and,
if anything, is more magical now than ever before.  In summary: it was
great back then.  It's even greater now.
John Travolta (at that time, famous for his role in Saturday Night Live)
stars as the now legendary character of Danny Zuko, who had the perfect
summer romance with Australian Sandy Olsson (Olivia Newton-John).  But
school comes all too soon for the two, and they split paths - mistakably
thinking that they will never see each other again. On the first day at
Rydell High we find Danny with a slick, leather jacketed image as the
leader of the "T-Birds."  The rebellious T-Birds comprises of Danny and
his friends - Kenickie (Jeff Conaway), Doody (Barry Pearl), Sonny
(Michael Tucci) and Putzie (Kelly Ward).  Meanwhile, the T-Birds female
counterparts - the "Pink Ladies" - welcome Sandy (who transferred
schools to Rydell) to the school.  It doesn't take long for Danny and
Sandy to meet again, but this time Danny has a reputation to live up
to - so things don't go as well as he would have liked.
As the couple begin to appreciate each other again, different subplots
emerge as the Pink Ladies' Rizzo (Stockard Channing) has the possibility
of being pregnant from a rousing night with Kenickie, and Frenchy (Didi
Conn) quits Rydell to go to beauty school.
If I did have a gripe about Grease, it's a small one: occasionally, the
films conversion from spoken dialogue to sung is not as good as it
should be.  In one scene, involving Frenchy and her "guardian angel," a
rendition of "Beauty School Dropout" is included simply to add another
song to the track list.  It may be enjoyable, but it isn't entirely
appropriate - the best types of musicals are those that feel exactly
like one, not just a collection of scenes with musical slabs meshed in
to create a higher entertainment level.  But on the whole, Grease's
lyrics are wonderfully written, and the unashamedly 70's style dialogue
is charming and easy to absorb.
I have no doubt that the same people who have ignored Grease's
flourishing existence will dodge the re-release at all costs.  But for
many - fans and spectators alike - Grease should still be the word as we
remember, with loyal respect, such a screen wonder that paved its way
through two grueling decades of film - looking better with every year
behind its back.
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Movie Zone:       http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au
Mostly Movies:         http://welcome.to/mostlymovies

Title
Review for Simply Irresistible (1999)
SIMPLY IRRESISTIBLE
Cast: Sarah Michelle Gellar, Sean Patrick Flanery, Patricia Clarkson,
Dylan Baker, Betty Buckley, Larry Gillard Jr.
Director: Mark Tarlov
Screenplay: Judith Roberts
Australian theatrical release: April 29, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
Who would have thought that a film about Sarah Michelle Gellar learning
how to cook would be as fun and amusing as Simply Irresistible?  Yup,
it's true.  Long time producer Mark Tarlov reveals a lively energy in
his first attempt as a director and creates a film that is, pretty much,
irresistible.  It would be pretentious to consider any of this film's
elements as fresh or original, but they certainly feel that way thanks
to Geller's appealing performance and Tarlov's direction.  The film
comes together very well, with a cute central romance that is a nice
blend of passion and fun, with a little touch of magic thrown in for
good measure.
Amanda Shelton (Sarah Michelle Gellar) is the owner and chef of a small,
homely restaurant that she inherited from her mother.  The restaurant is
about to go bust because Shelton's cooking skills leave a lot to be
desired.  Tom Bartlett (Sean Patrick Flanery) is a suave executive for a
famous department store, and the two first meet at a food market thanks
to help of a mysterious crab seller.  Sure enough, they bump into each
other again and love is in the air.  Suddenly, Shelton can now cook, and
cook very well.  Her dishes are so irresistible that Bartlett's boss
(Dylan Baker) chooses Shelton to cook for an important corporate dinner
at the launch of a new department restaurant.  Shelton begins to grasp
her unique ability to evoke emotion through her food, and an outrageous
night of chaotic dining unfolds.
Simply Irresistible is film colored by bright and adorable performances
and shaped by a screenplay that never makes the mistake of taking itself
too seriously.  The relationship between Shelton and Bartlett is too
shallow to be believable, but it's a cute bit of fantasy fluff that
doesn't feel dated or too modern.  Though sometimes frustrating in its
simplicity - the film purposely frustrates viewers by prolonging the
final get together - watching Gellar and Flanery in these flatteringly
good-natured roles is a treat.  Simply Irrisistible is a surprisingly
enjoyable picture with a kind-hearted temperament and a sweet,
sentimental aftertaste.  It restores faith that there is a little bit of
magic in life that, like love, doesn't always make a lot of sense.
Neither does this film, I suppose, but you won't hear me complaining.


Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
APT PUPIL
Cast: Ian McKellan, Brad Renfro, Bruce Davison, Elias Koteas, Joe
Morton, David Schwimmer
Director: Bryan Singer
Screenplay: Brandon Boyce based on the novella by Stephen King
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and a half stars
Standard horror films keep characters and their actions in check.  They
produce shrieks and squeals from violence that is either meaningless or
irrelevant, and rarely look at what motives evil actions.  It is sort of
an irony that Stephen King - whom you may expect would produce this sort
of stuff - wrote the novella on which Apt Pupil is based.  Brandon Boyce
has skillfully adapted King's work and made it accessible for the big
screen, while director Brian Singer (who astonished audiences with The
Usual Suspects) and the film's performers give it impact.  The result is
a subversive and gripping experience; one that crawls under your skin
and stays there.  Sometimes disturbing, at other times merely
entertaining, this is a solid piece that grounds itself in a truly
frightening subject matter, but occasionally deviates into ordinary
urban scenarios.
Todd Bowden (Brad Renfro) is an apt pupil.  He is a straight A's student
who is destined to top his class.  After a week of learning about the
Holocaust, Todd is fascinated - so much so that he immerses himself in
extra-curriculum study of the era.  In his research, he discovers an
incredible secret that nobody else has: Nazi war criminal Kurt Dussander
(Sir Ian McKellen) has been quietly living in Todd's hometown under the
assumed name of Arthur Denker.  Denker has lived a quiet, uneventful
life - until now.  Todd confronts Denker and blackmails him with a deal
he can't refuse - Todd will keep silent about his true identity, and in
return Denker must tell him about the atrocities he committed in the
war.  Thus a dangerous relationship begins, in which Todd learns
valuable lessons about having the upper hand.
The character of Kurt Dussander is one of the most fascinating in recent
years.  His fragile elderly body is deceiving, as is his serene
existence.  As Todd unlocks Dussander's memories, he also unlocks the
man's true character - his sinister actions have obviously only been in
hibernation.  Sir Ian McKellen brings Dussander to life with eerie
skill, and Brad Renfro is also great as a teenager whose world is turned
topsy-turvy.  McKellen and Renfro first appear to be a hostile odd
couple, but as the plot goes along Singer draws parallels.  There is no
hero in this story, nor is there a bad guy.  Apt Pupil makes it quite
clear that everybody has the capacity for evil - the temptation to
perform wicked deeds is as much alive in Nazi war veterans as it is in
youth.
The film's most chilling moments are when we learn of Dussander's dark
past.  In one scene he explains in explicit detail what the gassing
chambers were like - though it is purely dialogue, a painful visual
illustration is carved.  Had the film followed this rapid psychological
momentum, it may have been a mind-rousing classic. But Singer deviates
too often from his exhilarating central plot.  In comparison to the
nightmares of war told by one of its fomenters, the slip of Todd's
school grades seems woefully uninspired.  But still, this film is often
a powerful examination on what drives people to commit evil actions.
Apt Pupil is a must see for anybody who ever thought a horror film can't
have a brain or a heart.  Though far from perfect, this film evokes a
morbid fascination that is hard to shake.


Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
Following the success of popular teen flicks Billy Maddison and Happy Gilmore,
Adam Sandler now combines his singing and comical talents alongside Drew
Barrymore in The Wedding Singer.
Whatever standards Sandler ever earned in the past are more than met: the loud
voice that shouts nothing in particular, the face that looks like a school kid
in mischief, and the overall manner that seems like a blend of Eddie Murphy and
Mike Myers.  But hes good  very good  with his new role as a hip wedding
singer in the 1980s.
Sandler plays Robbie Hart, the wedding singer, who loves his job and has a
natural gift for it.  Also a love of his, is seeing newly wedded couples
together, strengthening their relationships and celebrating in the festivities
that follow.  That is, until his own wedding arrives.  When Robbie is standing
at the altar reading to get married, he is stood up by his finance Linda (Angela
Featherstone).  Now disheartened and demoralized with the marriage scene, he
quits his much-loved job after a rendition of Love Stinks.  Meanwhile, he gets
to know a new waitress named Julia (Barrymore) and begins to fall in love all
over again.  The only problem is, she is set to be married to a womanizing
sleaze bag.
Anyone who is capable of reading this review will be able to figure out what
eventually happens to these two forbidden lovers.  Like most romantic comedies,
the ending is cheerful and predictable  but strangely satisfying.
By far the most enjoying parts of The Wedding Singer are its moments of song
and comedy  it is through these fabulously entertaining scenes that we truly
feel like we have been taken back a decade.  What fills the gaps in between
these moments, however, fail to give any creativity to a film that at first
seemed to be incredibly original.  Luckily, watching Adam Sandler and Drew
Barrymore on the screen together is just enough to keep the film attractive and
easygoing.  But, surprisingly, most of the films laughs come from its
supporting cast  namely Steve Buscemi as an idiotic best man and an old
alcoholic played by Carmen Filpi.
Mona Mays (Clueless, Romy and Micheles High School Reunion) costume design is
eerily eighties, and brings back awkward feelings of fashions we thought wed
seen the last of.  And not only that, but the movie has also brought back an
assortment of so-so 80s music in an attempt to make the mood feel ever more out
dated.  Its a pity that they had a whole decade to select music from but
somehow managed to stuff it upthe recent Jackie Brown proved to have much
greater taste not only in the choice of music but also the influence it had on
the film.
OK, the films sets and costumes do look superb  but if my mother taught be
correctly  its whats inside that counts. In the case if The Wedding Singer,
listening to Adam Sandler raise his voice whenever he desperately wants us to
laugh can only be funny for the first few hundred times.  You get the feeling
that Sandlers humor has been somewhat refined than what we have been exposed to
in some of his previous films; and although the comedy occasionally comes off as
a trifle lame, its generally clean cut and well executed.
The Wedding Singer is no Jerry Maguire or My Best Friends Wedding  but could
you imagine Tom Cruise in a bright blue suit, singing and entertaining in Hebrew
at a Bar Mitzvah?  I think not.


Title
Review for Borrowers, The (1997)
If youre reading this review, the chances are youve seen the posters and
perhaps even trailers for The Borrowers.  So Ill address the question that
everyone wants answered: what exactly are they?  Do they bear close similarities
to the mouse in Mouse Hunt, or are they perhaps a Home Alone Macaulay Culkin
type being?  Well theyre a little bit of both.
The Borrowers like to consider themselves as cautious, alert, inconspicuous and
good at climbing.  But if this is the case, why do they end up being chased
across the town by a greedy lawyer, a clumsy exterminator, a smelly hound and a
big-eyed kid on a bike?
Pod (Jim Broadbent), Homily (Celia Imrie) and their kids, Peagreen (Tom Felton)
and Arrietty (Flora Newbigin) are our Borrowers.  They live under the
floorboards of a big house and borrow items from the residents living there.
But when the human being familys Aunt dies (who previously owned the house),
the greedy and self righteous lawyer Ocious Potter (John Goodman), tells the
family that a will was never found and the house was now officially his.  As
they begin to move out, the confused Borrowers get tangled up in these human
matters and stumble into danger when Peagreen and Arrietty get up to mischief
and attempt to foil the evil Potters plans.
It came as no surprise to me to find The Borrowers a fairly ordinary collection
of thrills and spills for kids, with a few exceptions.  One of my obvious
highlights was a tense scene involving a couple of borrowers, John Goodman, a
light bulb and ruler.  Sound exciting?  Probably not, but is a treat to see
simple everyday household items turned into life saving objects for these tiny
little people.
Although The Borrowers may seem at first to be a delightfully different kids
flick, but really its very similar to what weve seen many times before.  The
bad guy, John Goodman, will chase the little critters all over the place  but
when he finally catches them, rather than simply stepping on them hell conjure
up some evil and deranged death plan. Of course, as he turns his back on them
they will miraculously escape to freedom just to be caught again later on.
But poor John  the first time he gets caught out by these tiny beings is his
last  thats kids flicks for you, eh?


Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Every now and then a truly memorable character enters the movie scheme.  In
1995, audiences couldnt help but feel sympathy for the slow-witted Forrest
Gump. Last year, Billy Bob Thortons character __ made us think twice about our
place in society.   This year a horror of a human being (with a compulsive
disorder) will somehow manage to nudge his place into our hearts.
Melvin Udall has a love for simple pleasures.  Cleaning his hands meticulously,
only ever drinking bottled water and scoffing down a huge breakfast every
morning are as important to Melvin as life itself.  Racist, sexist, unreasonable
and repulsive, he seems to suit the title of a demented grouch perfectly.
Working as a romance novelist, Melvin keeps to himself for most of the time and,
although his daily traditions are just they way he likes them, ultimately leads
an unhappy life.
A dedicated romance novel fan asks Melvin How do you write women so well?  I
think of a man, he replies, and I take away reason and accountability.
If what you have read so far tends you make you believe that Melvin is somewhat
of a tough cookie, youre absolutely correct.  And when this type of guy gets a
crush on a young, sweet and caring lady, interesting situations will no doubt
occur.  Our young lady is Christine Cookie (Helen Hunt), who is Melvins
favorite waitress at the local restaurant.  Well, favorite is an under
statement  he simply wont eat his morning feast unless Christine is there
taking his order.  So when she is unable to attend work due to a severe illness
of her sons, Melvin does everything in his power to make sure she is at work
the next morning  and funds all of Christines doctor and hospital bills.
An unlikely relationship forms between the two, and Melvins gay neighbor Simon
(Boof Gert) gets thrown in amongst the emotional chaos.  Thus a three-way search
for happiness begins, where each character craves their own set of desires.  Our
man Melvin does what mainstream cinema would expect: realizes the error of his
ways and begins to change into a nicer human being.  As he says to Christine
during dinner, You make me want to be a better person.
If youre not impressed by the engaging character that is Melvin, As Good as it
Gets wonderful acting and a plot that unravels with beauty and well-placed
comedy; there is another factor that seems to have the greatest significance of
all.  It starts with J and it ends with S.
Although the media spotlight may focus on Jack Nicholson as the selling point
for As Good as it Gets, director James L. Brooks also deserves to take much of
the credit.  His directing career has not gone unnoticed, but there is no doubt
that this film is clearly his best work in the 90s.


Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Cast: Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Will
Patton, Steve Buscemi, Owen Wilson, Peter Stormare, Keith David, Michael
Duncan, William Fichtner
Director: Michael Bay
Screenplay: Jonathan Hensleigh and J.J. Abrams
Australian theatrical release date: August 20, 1998
Hotshot producer Jerry Brukheimer is all too familiar with corny,
underdone and translucent action flicks.  Thankfully, he's also headed
the production of some spectacular cornballs, most memorably The Rock
and Con Air.  This time, he's handed the directing reigns to Michael
Bay, one of the few directors this year who hasn't been suckered into
treating his material incorrectly.  Mimi Leader tried too hard to pull
off an effective emotional substance in Deep Impact, and Roland Emmerich
was up to his usual mainstream garbage with the massively disappointing
Godzilla.  Trouble is, he doesn't bother to change the pace or form of
the film and, although his material is treated with the precision and
care of a capable director, an on going sense of repetitiveness found so
regularly in Armageddon becomes tiresome and monotonous.  And frankly, a
little insulting.
An asteroid is descending quickly upon Earth, so a NASA team of experts
(including Billy Bob Thorton, the leader of the pack) smartly decide to
hire oil diggers to solve the problem. Just after a few demands are met
(including "no taxes againever") the team is ready to blast off and
save the world from destruction at the hands of Harry (Bruce Willis).
Everything runs quite smoothly during the opening scenes, with plenty of
explosions and car wrecks to satisfy most special effects hungry
viewers.  That's the first thing that separates Armageddon from the
similarly thought of Deep Impact: Bay is not at all hesitant to use his
computer-generated eye candy, but Mimi Leader let it all build up into
an exhilarating climax. I'm not sure which one is better - whilst I
enjoyed watching the opening scenes of Armageddon much more, I can't
help but feel that Deep Impact introduces its scenario, and its
characters, much more effectively.  Talking about introducing
characters, we first meet Harry when he's whacking golf balls into Green
Peace protesters, then gets a shotgun and attempts to shoot his
daughter's boyfriend (Ben Afflick).  And that's the sort of idiocy you
can except from these whimsical characters later on, especially when
they're, um, saving the world.
When the film is set on Earth, it's actually quite enjoyable.  The fast
paced, snappy venture into the lives of these idiots and the developing
of Thorton's character is all fun and games.  But it's when we witness
Bay's joy ride onto the Asteroid that things go dreadfully wrong for the
characters and our entertainment levels.  A brainless, dumb and utterly
boring collage of scenes follows, where every and any possible mishap
occurs to our inane astronauts.  In "the action film of the year" I
actually, literally, fell asleep for a brief moment just to be awoken by
one of the annoying demonstrations of digital sound.  I found myself
wishing that the Earth (read: the US) could kill two birds with the one
stone: that is, get rid of the Asteroid and, oh please, get rid of Bruce
Willis.
Most of the laughs come from Steve Buscemi, a weird little actor who's
played the Weird Little Funny Guy role so many times that he's almost
perfected it.  But honestly, can't he try to vary his talents a little
further?  Buscemi's Armageddon performance is a replica of his other
roles in The Wedding Singer, The Big Lebowski and Con Air, amongst
others.
Potentially, this film is a great 90-minute flick with a ludicrous 144
minute running time.  I can forgive Bruce Willis for looking like a
dopey yobbo, by I can't forgive Armageddon's editors for making me feel
like I was watching Titanic Special Edition in Space.  In all fairness,
it has a super ending - courageous, uplifting, joyful, etc etc.  But by
that time my eyes were barely remaining open and my ass bones were
aching just enough to warrant a wise thought: "Arma-gedden-outa-here."

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
REVIEW: The Sweet Hereafter
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Ian Holm, Sarah Polley, Bruce Greenwood, Tom McCamus, Gabrielle
Rose, Arsinee Khanjian, Alberta Watson, Maury Chaykin
Director: Atom Egoyan
Producers: Atom Egoyan and Camelia Frieberg
Screenplay: Atom Egoyan based on the novel by Russell Banks
Australian theatrical release: July 16
In The Sweet Hereafter, Atom Egoyan has tackled one of the most daring
and hard to pull off methods of filmmaking, which most directors would
crumble at the sight of.  His messy, but beautifully interlaced
narration is utterly stunning to say the least.  Although not as sharply
written as Wag the Dog or The Ice Storm, this is in no way a bad thing:
Egoyan resists the temptation to tighten the screws and wrap the film up
in a neat package.  It is, with all the odds stacked against it, a
tragically extraordinary and utterly unforgettable piece.
Devastation strikes a small town in British Colombia when a school bus
crashes off the side of a road, killing twenty kids.  As can be
expected, the town is awash with grief, and produces a mixed array or
irate parents.  Each parent deals with their sorrow in a unique way; and
when visiting attorney Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm) begins to search for
who to blame (and of course, who to sue) he becomes a welcomed intruder
for many and a painful visitor for some.  Mitchell perhaps cares so much
about this tragedy due to the loss of his own drug-addicted daughter,
facing fear each time his cellular phone rings ("This is my daughter
ringing, or it could be the police telling me that she's dead").
I haven't seen any other of Egoyan's films, but from what I've heard,
the setup of The Sweet Hereafter is a not a change in style for him.
Twisty, twirly, fast paced and pieced together like a puzzle that only
looks right at the very end.  It's actually quite ingenious; a skillful
way of handling tough material to cover, and a wonderfully visionary
form of directing.
Although I thought that I had also seen no films featuring Ian Holm,
looking at his profile, I've no doubt seen his face many times before
(starring in, amongst many others, Alien and Chariots of Fire).  He
gives an effulgent performance; adding multiple dimensions to his
character - Mitchell is a comprised man who structures himself so that
emotions can be conventionally pushed aside.  It is only when he meets
one of his daughter's old friends that we get a glimpse of the heart
inside this seemingly apathetic character. Without a doubt, he strikes
me as one of the most intriguing on screen personalities so far this
year (tying in top spot with Robert Duvalle's "The Apostle EF" in The
Apostle).
A bunch of memorable scenes help the film keep its stride, and maintain
an engaging level of interest.  Strangely enough, they appear at the
most unexpected times: a car wash is the stage for a striking
introduction to Mitchell and his daughter, and a rendition of "The Pied
Piper of Hamelin" becomes a necessary to the film's narration.
Charming and passionate but, at the same time, terrifying and tragic,
The Sweet Hereafter is one of those unique cinematic gems that you just
don't see all that often.  Stirring emotions is one thing, but
manipulating and confusing them at the most unexpected times is another.
A shattering but rewarding, complex but complete piece of irregular film
making.  If this is an example of how a less sharp and pointed edged
film is conceived, then bring 'em on.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
REVIEW: There's Something About Mary
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Ben Stiller, Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Chris Elliott, Lin Shaye,
Lee Evans, W. Earl Brown
Directors: Peter Farrelly & Bobby Farrelly
Screenplay: Ed Decter & John J. Strauss and Peter Farrelly & Bobby
Farrelly
Australian release date:  September 3 1998
Hysterically funny, brilliantly crafted and un-apologetically repulsive.
Just in case you want me to go on, allow me to announce that There's
Something About Mary is one of the funniest comedies so far this decade.
The Farley brothers, responsible for Dumb and Dumber and Kingpins, bring
forth their wicked visions to the screen with absolutely no subtlety:
the film makes fun of the mentally handicapped, gays, blow jobs,
masturbation, murder, drugs, elderly people, head jobs, architects, the
physically handicapped, masculinityget the drift?
There's not only something about Mary (Cameron Diaz), there's everything
about her - she's good looking, loves beer, sports and helping the
community.  That's why Ted (Ben Stiller) hires shady insurance claims
investigator Pat Healy (Matt Dhillon) to track her down after not seeing
her since prom night, thirteen years ago (when he managed to get his
family jewels stuck in his zipper).  But Pat begins to fall for Mary,
Ted begins to long for Mary and a collection of other sitcom-like
characters all want to be with her.
The good news is that the Farleys have taken all of societies most
sensitive themes and meshed them into one despicable, unrelenting comedy
that had me almost choking on my own laughter.  To subside for the fact
that the film is basically plotless, every ounce of its boisterously
entertaining story is milked for the gags, and there are five or six key
comedy sequences.   All of the cast shine in their undemanding roles,
with Ben Stiller looking especially good as both a teenage loser and an
adultloser.  Cameron Diaz is also splendid; she's a talented actor who
looks gorgeous on the screen, and is able to give a reasonably refined
performance in an incredibly unrefined film.
After a long, long time without any really funny comedies (As Good as it
Gets came close, tough) it's so refreshing to see something so
ridiculously amusing, so ashamedly enjoyable.  It's up there with The
Birdcage and Nothing to Lose for the best comedies of the 90's and it
is, undoubtedly, hysterically funny, brilliantly crafted and
un-apologetically repulsive.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Flubber (1997)
Robin Williams' eccentric excuse to bounce around the silver screen side to 
side with a comical green bloc is a remake of the 1960's hit The Absent Minded 
Professor (starring Jerry Lewis).  It was great then, and it's great now.
Phillip Brainard (Williams) can be described perfectly using the title of the 
1960's film - yes, a very absent-minded professor.  Though he is unmistakably 
brilliant in his own demented way, Phillip has invented many remarkable and 
ground breaking gadgets in the name of science.  The only fault in his 
phenomenal mind is that the science of daily life eludes him.
So after forgetting to attend his own wedding on two separate occasions, 
finance Sara Jean Reynolds (Marcia Gay Harden) has chosen to forget about her 
first two attempts at marriage and gives Harry a third-time-or-nothing deal, 
vowing that she will not marry him unless he attends the wedding at 6:30 in the 
evening.  But that night Phillip, accompanied with flying robot invention 
"Weebo", stumbles across the most amazing of his discoveries yet.  In the form 
of a gooey green substance, the flying rubber (hence, Flubber) which he has 
created almost seems to have a personality and life of its own.
As Phillip's watch alarm rings, he breaths a sigh of relief - its only 6:30the 
next morning.
>From then on Phillip and Flubber are on their own and get tangled up in many 
comical adventures including applying energy to the local basketball team, 
taking care of a couple of dim witted goons and giving the car and air born up 
date.  Whilst this is taking place, Phillip fights to win his woman back and 
save where he teaches from being shut down.
Flubber is great fun.  Robin Williams' physical maneuvers are alone worth 
seeing; and the collection of scenes which make up this radical experience are 
high quality entertainment.  The kids will have a wonderful time jumping, 
shouting and pointing at Flubber's amusing antidotes whilst adults will have no 
problem in twisting their faces into a cheerful smile and appreciate the more 
subtle jokes.
Flubber has got to be one of the most enjoyable films I've seen this year.  
Easy going, stress free and awesome fun for young and old.


Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
REVIEW: La Confidential
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and a half stars
Curtis Hanson, the director of River Wild and The Hand That Rocks the
Cradle, now features two of Australia's finest actors in his latest film
LA Confidential.  Bursting of class and realism, the film is set in "The
City of Angels", Los Angeles, in the chaotic 1950's.  But all is not
well in paradise - as an apparently gleaming city is corrupted with mass
murdering, drug dealing and high-class porn - all types of organized
crime.  The law enforcement's aren't much help either, as the image of
fat cops accepting pay offs is spreading quickly whilst high ranking
authorities and the corruption they deal in is rotting away the
structures of society.
Although set long after the days of Al Capone and The Untouchables,
little has changed in both the city and the situation of the film.  Cops
are either crooked or abnormally honest, so it's clear to see what sorts
of characters are going to develop from the slick opening scenes of the
film.  But the mechanics of the film, the real oomph, is hidden behind
twists and developments in the tricky and often very involving plot.
The two most intriguing characters, Ed Exley and Bud White, are played
by Aussie sensations Guy Pearce and Russel Crowe who successfully give
the "good cop bad cop" routine a much needed polishing and end up
looking simply sensational as two very different screen detectives.
Exley, a by-the-book and very noble officer, is not afraid to conceal
the truth - even if that means ratting on one of his colleagues.  On the
other side of the spectrum, Bud White is a brutal and relentless member
of the force who will stop at nothing to make sure that justice is
served.  With a particular grudge against women bashers; White becomes
quickly known as someone to keep friendly with, although he serves his
fellow officers with respect and perhaps even admiration.  Along with
Jack Vincennes (Kevin Spacey), the celebrity cop who never forgets to
bring a camera on stake outs, Exley and White quickly become involved in
a web of murder, blackmail, deceit and intrigue.  But as the plot
thickens, and the search to find the "man that gets away with it"
continues, Exley and White eventually realize that the only way to
uncover the mystery is to work as a team.
LA Confidential, a movie of class and quality, has added itself
successfully to this year's most impressive Hollywood line up.  I should
be said that some people may not find this film to be as special as I
did - but everyone can admire the way LA Confidential steers clear of
main stream ideas and characters and presents us with intriguing
situations and personalities.
In its worst moments, the more subtle viewer will notice LA
Confidential's excessive use of violence to demonstrate the era it's set
in, but in its best moments the word "excellence" is taken to new
standards.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback

Title
Review for Tea with Mussolini (1999)
TEA WITH MUSSOLINI
Cast: Joan Plowright, Maggie Smith, Cher, Judi Dench, Lily Tomlin,
Charlie Lucas, Baird Wallace, Claudio Spadaro
Director: Franco Zeffirelli
Screenplay: John Mortimer and Franco Zeffirelli based on "The
Autobiography of Franco Zeffirelli"
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 stars
I gathered two meanings from the title "Tea with Mussolini."  The first
one refers to an actual, real-life event in which a character in the
film does indeed sit down and have a cuppa with the legendary Roman
leader himself.  The second, as I interpreted it, has a slightly
ironical overture.  The word "tea" brings to mind visions of calmness
and peace, and whist these are the overriding message of this film (it's
subtlety belt into your forehead by director Franco Zeffirelli), it
strives for more than just a story devoted to the kinship between its
central characters.  There's another message in the film that relates to
the political nature of war, as observed by a group of elderly,
respectable women.  Whilst Zeffirelli doesn't go wildly in depth into
war events - usually he shows a few clips of mild carnage and distress
then moves on - he does do it on enough occasions to jerk his narrative
out of flow, which leads to his one major misstep: he tries to cover too
much.  Unsatisfied by the breath of his lovable and beautifully
developed characters, Zeffirelli goes for a universal meaning, when
individual growth would have been good enough.
That's probably as cynical as I can get about this very likeable film,
and I've said it all in the first paragraph.  Although similar ground
was covered to greater affect in Roberto Benigni's much acclaimed 'Life
is Beautiful,' 'Tea with Mussolini' proves its right for theatrical
existence by first supplying quality production elements.  The film is
gorgeously shot by cinematographer David Watkin ('Memphis Belle') who is
privileged with the already stunning environment of Florence, and the
sixty-something actors all play their parts convincingly, bouncing off
each other with talent and authenticity that many years of experience
have given them.
Based on an autobiographical novel, the 'Scorpioni' were a small group
of eccentirc English ladies living in Florence.  The story begins in
1935, when Mary (Joan Plowright) brings a young boy, Luca (played as a
child by Charlie Lucas then later by Baird Wallace), into the circle of
friends.  Luca is encouraged to appreciate all kinds of art by Arabella
(Judi Dench), and is taken care of and loved by the members of the
group.  Lady Hester (Maggie Smith) is the undeclared leader of the
Scorpioni, whose dry humour and cynical comments at every corner keep
the group in stride.  All this is really just an inflated prologue, as
the centerpiece drama unfolds as World War II breaks out and, when Italy
sides with Germany, the Scorpioni find themselves in the wrong country
at the wrong time.
I suppose the surprise member of the cast is Cher, who plays a wealthy
and glamorous American (so far from reality, huh?) and fits in quite
nicely with the talent that surrounds her.  She proves that she is
strong enough, to live without music videos.  That said, Joan Plowright
is close to perfection as the lovable and wise Mary, and Maggie Smith
delivers her lines with a cool, dry wit that makes her one of the film's
most entertaining actors.  Judi Dench is also strong, but then again, so
is everybody.  'Tea With Mussolini' reassures us that, no matter how old
the protagonists of a film may be, basic characteristics of acting don't
change.  The film's characters are vivid and engaging, thanks purely to
these performers and, to a lesser degree, their dialogue, which flows
quite nicely and even contains some quaint English humour.
Tea With Mussolini looks, sounds and feels like an Oscar contender that
has arrived unexpectedly, and considerably earlier than usual (the
fierce competition usually begins in November or December).    I think
it's one of those films that most people will consider "good" but not
"great," it's a strong serve but it isn't an ace.  Zeffirelli, at times,
seems like he's taking his material a little too seriously, but that's a
problem that's pretty much unavoidable, considering the nature of the
picture, its context and its characters.  It's pretty serious stuff;
it's all about hope, and faith, and devotion, and togetherness, and
inspiration, and love andboy, this does sound like an Oscar contender.
Many of the heights in Tea With Mussolini occur when the picture relaxes
and allows its characters - rather than its setting, or its Place in
History - to interact with each other.  When this occurs, the film
soars.  If Zeffirelli had kept his narrative intimate and close but
still mildly threatening, this good film could have been a great one.
In his attempts to cover world history, Zeffirelli lessens the impact of
his skillfully etched characters, but still includes enough of the good
stuff to make Tea With Mussolini an entertaining and sometimes moving
picture that aspires to achieve a little more than it actually does.


Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
When Stephen Spielberg took a break from creating rampaging dinosaurs, hungry
sharks or wacky aliens, he came up with Schindlers List.  Now his second
serious film is Amist-ake, which destroys part of his reputation as an
unbridled genius of the directing industry.
Onboard the ship La Amistad (in 1839), 53 African slaves whom were held captive
take over the ship and viciously slaughter all but two of the crew.  Intending
to go back to Africa, they are tricked by the white survivors and end up on the
coast of Long Island.  The Africans are soon captured and charged with murder.
The question is, whom do they belong to?  Are they the property of the people
who purchased them, various governments whom own the lands they have been on  or
do they have the rights to their own freedom?
Abolitionists Theodore Joadson (Morgan Freeman) and businessman Lewis Tappan
(Stellan Skarsgerd) hire young real estate lawyer Roger Baldwin (Matthew
McConaughey) to defend their case.  This seemingly insignificant trial becomes a
symbol of human rights, and as Baldwin desperately tries to defend the Africans
their situation becomes ever more complicated with communication problems and
the threat of civil war if the slaves are released.
Led by Cinque (Djimon Hounsou), the Africans learn about different aspects of
American society as President Martin Van Buren (Nigel Hawthorne) wishes to
sacrifice them to please other world leaders including the 11 year old Queen
Isabella of Spain (Anna Paquin). Former President John Quincy Adams (Anthony
Hopkins)  a son of one of the founding fathers, helps defend them after much
persuasion when the case is taken to the Supreme Court. What kind of a land is
this, Cinque questions, Where you almost mean what you say? Where laws almost
work?
The real problem with Amistad is not that it fails to achieve brilliance or
potency, its that it does so very sparsely. When we are treated to its
occasional moments of gripping cinema they serve as a reminder of what should
have been rather than what Spielberg delivers on a continuous basis.
Anthony Hopkins performance as the wise John Quincy Adams is simply stunning
and the obvious highlight of the film; he looks and sounds so impressive that
Amistads viewing quality sky rockets whenever he takes the spotlight.  I would
go as far to say that he deserves an Oscar for this stellar performance  but
unfortunately his screen time is limited.  As for Morgan Freeman, this is the
first time I have ever seen him looking like an out of work actor desperately
seeking some lines to recite.
Djimon Hounsou is the only other main actor worthy of a mention, but is often
very annoying to watch as the use of sub titles is very inconsistent.  Half the
time we understand what he is saying (that is, when it is convenient), and the
other half he sounds like a wild ape rambling on about something to do with
freedom.  This is not an insult to the African language, but rather to
Spielbergs awkward choice of communication to the audience.  And John Williams
(whose composer credits include all three Star Wars films, Schindlers List and
Jurassic Park) music score is noticeably annoying and often far too
overpowering.
As an educational video, Amistad would be excellent.  But as a motion picture,
it teases us with a magnificent story put together in a far too ordinary way.
All through the films two and a half hours we are never quite sure whose story
it is  the characters of Cinque, John Quincy Adams and Roger Baldwin all have
interesting stories to tell yet Spielberg doesnt give any of them enough time.
This may sound terrible, but it is my opinion that American people will probably
appreciate Amistad more than most others.  After all, everyone likes to be
reminded that their country has made the right decision at one stage or another.
If this was a tactic that Spielberg used to disguise a fairly weak film, it sure
as hell didnt work on me.
2 stars out of 5
A film that doesnt give its fascinating true story the credit it deserves


Title
Review for Crackers (1998)
Australian theatrical release date: July 9
As partly a drama, partly a comedy and partly a ridiculous sitcom, how
Crackers got the go-ahead is anybody's guess.  No doubt last years The
Castle gave inspiration to this Aussie backyard adventure, and whilst it
is nice to see another Australian comedy wrestling with the big guys,
Crackers fails to have the low brow, witty sense of humor that its
predecessor was loved for.
Although I'm a little sick of seeing cliché Australian "blokes and
sheilas", I couldn't help but enjoy the line up of characters that
Crackers delivers.  You've got your misinterpreted young lad, Joey
(Daniel Kellie), his eccentric great grandfather Albert (Warren
Mitchell), Joey's mum Hilary (Susan Lyons) and her boyfriend Bruno
(Peter Rowsthorn).  There's also Bruno's bully son, Angus (Christopher
Chapman), plus a dog, Joey's grandfather, grandmother, great aunt, and a
rooster.
Sound interesting?  Well it issort of.  These characters are fairly
enjoyable to watch, but not enough development is given to any one of
them.  We can never fully understand the troubled mind of Joey - the
script leaves us behind locked doors with no key to get inside.  Albert
is without a doubt the film's most fun character to watch, as he prances
around the screen driving recklessly, drinking whiskey, and even
creating a brawl in a local pub.  When he is not on the screen, Crackers
searches desperately for other gags to use, and ends up resorting to
ridiculous situations including barbecuing a dog and creating an offbeat
affair between two family members.
The screenplay is confused and flirts between genre to genre,
consequently being funny without being entirely a comedy, and dramatic
without being entirely a drama.  Whether or not that is good or bad is
not entirely relevant, because director David Swann has made sure that,
although sometimes at sparse occasions, there is a laugh included for
most audiences.  I guess that's the difference between The Castle and
Crackers - The Castle stuck to the same hilarious style of gags, but
Crackers tries to suit too many people and ends up losing out in the
end.  At times, we can laugh ourselves silly in recognition that we have
experienced something that the characters are doing, and at other times
we shake our heads in disbelief, amazed at how sick the jokes are.
Swann seems to have had lots of fun in creating this loose,
extraordinary comedy.  Both the film and its characters appear so
offbeat that it's perhaps reasonable to dub them as a weird, distorted
family portrayed in a weird, distorted film.
Enjoyable at many occasions but far too loose and inconsistent, Crackers
may be able to wrestle with the big guys, but it's likely to be pinned
down for its obvious flaws, and no doubt will be beaten by more
satisfying ventures.
-----------------------------------
Review Š copyright Luke Buckmaster
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
REVIEW: Babe: Pig in the City
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Magda Szubanski, James Cromwell, Mary Stein, Mickey Rooney, and
the voices of E.G. Daily, Gleanne Headly, Steven Wright, James Cosmo,
Stanley Ralph Ross, Danny Mann, Roscoe Lee Browne
Director: George Miller
Screenplay: George Miller, Mark Lamprell, Judy Morris based on "The
Sheep-Pig" by Dick King-Smith
Australian theatrical release date: December 10, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
The fundamental difference between 1995's surprise hit Babe and its
sequel, Pig in the City, is a change of tone.  Whilst Babe happily
indulged in occasional "serious" moments, Pig in the City often
surrounds itself in gloom, and its characters are forced to attempt to
emerge themselves through it.  That's quite a hard feat for a family
film to achieve without presenting its characters as equally somber as
their surroundings.  Achieving this much is something that director
George Miller (Mad Max, The Witches of Eastwick) can be proud of, at
least for the most part.
Miller adapted Babe from the novel written by Dick King-Smith (titled
The Sheep Pig), and does the same task for Pig in the City as well as
replacing director Chris Noonan.  He gives an unusual atmosphere to the
film, which is largely to do with the setting - "The Big City."  This is
one unusual place, with Venice like canals and a wide range of sights to
see - the Sydney opera house, the statue of liberty, the Eiffel tower
and the Hollywood sign.  Miller conveys that this fairytale city is not
located anywhere, so much as it is everywhere.
Pig in the City's story caps off directly after Babe's finishes.  Farmer
Hoggett (James Cromwell, who was Oscar nominated for his performance in
the original) and Babe (voice of E.G. Daily, replacing Christine
Cavanaugh) are local celebrities for their astonishing display in the
National Sheep Dog's Championship.  But unfortunately Hoggett takes a
bad fall down a well, thus making him unable to work. The farm soon
faces financial ruin, so Mrs. Hoggett (Magda Szubanski) plans to take
Babe to a state fair in search for enough money to save their home.
They end up stranded in The Big City, and stay at an eerie hotel for
pets.
Pig in the City is an ill-advised sequel.  Babe ended on a wonderfully
high note, pleasing audiences with scenes that were both artistic and
entertaining.  It was a rewarding tale brought to life largely from
Cromwell's performance and Babe's innocence.  Although the pig's
innocence is still very much a part of the sequel, Cromwell is severely
missed.  He was the sane center of the original; everyone acted crazy
around him.  This time Magda Szubanski is the lead human actor, but her
cheerful comic mannerisms are exaggerated to ridiculous lengths, and she
soon becomes more irritating than entertaining.
There is some truth behind the many allegations that Pig in the City is
too depressing and gloomy for children.  Some scenes - namely Farmer
Hoggett falling down the well and Babe saving animals from gruesome
deaths - are distressing to watch.  Although the underlining themes of
the film include friendship, determination and courage, it is only an
uplifting experience on very few occasions.  Pig in the City is
exhausting when it should be uplifting, and annoying when it should be
entertaining.
This is not to say that George Miller has not crafted some excellent
moments and characters.  Thelonius (voice of James Cosmo) is an old and
wise orangutan who always likes to be dressed for the moment.  He is
easily the most intriguing character, as every one of his movements and
words are emphasized by Miller, and the audience subsequently takes
notice. Thelonius is one of the few animals that gives a lasting impact,
and is able to burst out of his gloomy surroundings to create an
intriguing demeanor of his own.
Adults will appreciate the atmosphere that Miller creates more than
children will.  But as a family film, a sequel, and a candidate for this
holiday's box office trophy, Babe: Pig in the City simply doesn't bring
home the bacon.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au
